CHAPTER I.
MY ancestors came from England. They were part
of the persecuted dissenters, who sought an asylum in
the wilds of Americaof those enterprising few, who
landed at Plymouth, in sixteen hundred and twenty.
My great-grandfather, by the father's side, came over
at the time I have mentioned. His name was
Burlinton
,
though we now spell it Burlington. He professed
the presbyterian religion, but it appears, from some of
his papers which are now before me, that he was by no
means rigid. I find that he opposed those severe rules
which were drawn up for the government of the newly
formed church, which they styled The Dominion.
They enforced their laws without mercy, and without
decency. None could be admitted as freemen, jurymen,
or magistrates, but members of the church. In short,
no office could be held by any man in the dominion, who
was not a member of the church. A number of these
papers appear to have been a correspondence between
this gentleman and his more zealous brethren. To
transcribe them all, would take up too much time, and
answer no purpose, as all those who are acquainted with
the history of the times of which I speak, must know
too much of these lamentable truths. As a sample of
those pious bigots, I will, however, copy one letter,
which seems to have been written by a friend of Mr.
Burlington, upon one of these renowned occasions.
Salem
,
July 23, 1681.
Dear Friend
You complain, in your last, of the
violent
proceedings of your town on the old subject; but it
is trifling, compared to the zeal of our minister.
Though my health is little improved, since I wrote you
last, yet I went to hear Mr. Williams, last Sabbath. I
was shocked at the discourse; but, dear Thomas, it
would cost me my life, if this were known. He raged,
he stamped, he foamed at the mouth, and all this for a
mere phantoma shadow. Strange, that our teachers
should set such examples of wrath. I am sure, Christ
enjoins it upon us, to be meek and lowly. But I will try
to give you a plain account of some of the sermon. He
said that the cross of St. George, in the English
colours
,
was a downright popish relict; that it was
Idolatry
,
and popish whoredom, to retain this ensign of
hellish
superstition. But his language would be too
tiresome
to you, and withal, not edifying. So much did his
discourse affect the congregation, that they held a
meeting
,
that same evening, and passed a decree, that it
should be publicly cut out of the colours, and should
never
be seen amongst God's people. I am very
doubtful
that this is not the right waymoreover, our
minister
and another one, by the name of Roberts, had some
very uncivil talk that same evening. This cannot be
the right waywe have lost it, somehow. We are, in
truth, without teachers; for I would put no more faith
in this madman, Williams, than I would in Satan. It
puts me in mind of a saying of Luther's friend,
Mclancthon
,
of Wittemberg. He said that he longed to
be dissolved, and that for two reasonsfirst, that he
might enjoy the much desired presence of Christ, and
the heavenly churchsecondly, that he might be freed
from the cruel and implacable discords of divines.
But I shall not, I trust, be long in this turbulent world.
I am heart-sick of it. What a monster is man! Better
had we remained in England:I could laugh, there;
here I dare not smile. Adieu, dear friend, &c. &c.
1*
All this goes to show, what a horrid thing fanaticism
is, when it attains any considerable degree of power.
In short, the subsequent persecutions, and arbitrary
measures, adopted and pursued, by these people,
entirely
alienated from them the only surviving son of this
old gentleman. He embraced the religion of the
peaceable
Quakers. His name was Thomas. He died in
the prime of life, and very suddenly, leaving but two
children, both of which were sons. One of them was
called Charles, after his father; the other Thomas,
after
himself. Charles was likewise a Quaker. He
pursued
the mercantile business with great application and
success. He married the daughter of the wealthy Mr.
F. She was his only child. By her he had four
children; two sons and as many daughters. Two only
survived him; a son, (myself,) and a daughter. My
mother was likewise of the Quaker persuasion, and I
still have a preference for that religion.
Thomas, his other son, (my uncle,) was younger than
my father, by nine years. He testified great
displeasure
at the authority exercised over him, by my father,
and finally eloped on board a British sloop of war, at
the age of sixteen, and went to the East Indies; where,
as we heard, he died. It was reported that he fought
against his native country, in the revolutionary war; but
how true it was, I cannot tell. My father never saw
him afterwards. He was much afflicted at this
distressing
circumstance, and never mentioned his name without
a sigh.
My father took a very active part in the
revolutionary
war, and was in several engagements; on which
account
he was excluded from the society of Quakers. At
the close of the war, he removed to Boston, and
continued
to follow the mercantile business.
He was very successful, and even might be called
rich, before I was born, which was in the year
seventeen
hundred and eighty-seven. I was his third child.
He had taken several clerks, to assist him in his
counting
house. Amongst these, was one whose name was
Hunter, whom my father found in the streets, when a
lad, naked and destitute of friends. His parents were
both dead, and he was without friends, and without
money, or property of any description. My father
took him to his house, gave him his breakfast, clothed
him, and sent him to school.
When he was sufficiently qualified to write, and do
business in the store, he was removed from school to
the counting-house; where he conducted himself with
the strictest integrity and application. I have heard
my father say, often, that he was the most attentive
clerk he had.
When he became old enough to do business for himself,
my father, who had often told him he would reward his
good conduct, took him as a partner, and lent him two
thousand pounds, in addition to his share of profits, as
a compensation for his services. He took Hunter's
bonds for the money, payable five years after date.
It was agreed, between him and my father, that he
should remove to New-York, where he remained
several
years; during which time, he had risen rapidly in
the world, and still continued a partner of my father.
He made several voyages to Liverpool, in the time, and
supported the character of an upright, active, and
persevering
merchant.
He had never paid my father the money advanced to
him, but then he was good for it, and was ready to do
so, at any time.
At the age of seventeen, my father sent me to
Princeton
College. An old acquaintance of his father, was
at that time one of the professors, which led him to
prefer
that College, to Yale or Harvard. At this
seminary
,
I made but very little progress. My education had
been too much neglected, in the earlier part of my life;
and now, I had neither talents, application, nor taste,
for literary pursuits. Born to great wealth, I looked
down upon my fellow-students, with contempt. No
doubt, they viewed me in the same light. History,
geography
,
astronomy, and a very imperfect knowledge of
the Latin tongue, were the amount of my literary
acquirements
.
At Princeton, I formed an acquaintance with a Mr.
Henry Wilson; the son of a wealthy Virginia
planter-This
young man was nearly of my own age. We
resembled
each other in disposition, temper, and general
principles; but he was greatly my superior in talents,
as well as industry in the prosecution of his studies.
He was liberal, humane, and wholly untainted with
pride or bigotry.
In short, he possessed every virtue, and was free from
every vice. But modesty was his predominant
characteristic
.
Our acquaintance soon grew up to the
tenderest and most indissoluble friendship, which has
remained
to this hour.
In a world like this, where ingratitude, injustice,
fraud, violence, and a thousand other crimes
embitter-society
,
an acquisition of this nature is the greatest of
all possible blessings. Our acquaintance was merely
accidental, having arose from the circumstance of our
both lodging in the same room.
In the first year, Henry Wilson would often reproach
me for my idleness; and this he would do, in language
replete with reason and gentleness. When the
Christmas
holy-days approached, Wilson, with a little
persuasion
,
wrote an excuse to his parents, and
accompanied
me to Boston.
During our stay in that city, our time was filled up
with all sorts of amusement. Balls, plays, sleighing,
and those various amusements which engage the youth
of both sexes, in the winter season, made the time roll
merrily on. But, at length, the day came, when we
were to set out for Princeton.
When we came to take leave, I perceived, for the first
time, symptoms of attachment between Wilson and my
sister. She had just entered her sixteenth year. Her
figure was not striking; it was, however, without
defect
.
She was tall and slender; danced and sung well;
her complexion fair; her eyes a dark blue. In short,
she was reckoned handsome; and, even at this early
age, had many admirers. But Wilson was a new
lover
,
and this circumstance has great sway with most
females
.
In the present instance, however, it was not a
subject of much wonder, the advantages on both sides
being nearly equal.
It may not be improper, in this place, to mention
another circumstance, which, though seemingly
unimportant
in itself, ultimately becomes the pivot upon
which the incidents in the following sheets revolve.
During my residence at college, my father had taken
a new servant into his family, of the name of Horton.
It appears that he had been recommended to my father,
by Hunter. Although not in want of a servant, he
payed that respect to his friend's recommendation, to
which he conceived him entitled. I did not like this
Horton. He had a dark, gloomy, designing
countenance
,
touched with slyness and cunning; but, seeing
that he was a favourite with my father, I kept my
suspicions
to myself, and set out with Wilson, for
Princeton
.
CHAPTER II.
I had
been at Princeton, nearly five months, when I
received a letter from my father, which overwhelmed
me with astonishment and distress. It was as follows:
Dear Charles
So soon as thee receives this letter,
thee will proceed home without delay.I am ruined!
All my effects were seized yesterday, to satisfy Clark
& Co. of Liverpool, vs. Burlington & Co. I do not
understand
this; I am bewildered; something is wrong
in this business. I did not know that I owed that
house aught, except part of the last importation;
but I know nothing, nor can I do any thing. Haste thee
home with all speed. I am very much indisposedthy
mother is distracted; we need thy presence and
assistance
.
The family send their greeting to thy young
friend.
Your distressed Father,
C.
Burlington
.
With a heart full of grief, I took leave of Wilson,
and set off the same evening. When I arrived at home,
I hastened to examine my father's books, and soon
discovered
that Hunter was at the bottom of this
unaccountable
plot. I found that my father had regularly
remitted his share of the payments! Hunter must have
kept it! Hunter must be combined with them! Hunter,
I concluded, was the villain!
But what was to be done, I could not devise; for the
property was to be sold in forty days. The sum
required
was enormousone hundred and eighty-four
thousand
pounds, sterling! I was horror-struck! Every
thing we had, must be sacrificed. In this dilemma, we
held a consultation, the result of which was, that I
should take Hunter's bounds, go to him, and collect the
money, if possible, or get what I could; with a view to
save a few necessaries. I was to set out the next
morning
.
In the mean time, my father called for a candle
and walked into his library. After attempting to
console
my mother and sister, whose distress was beyond
description, I stepped into the library to receive the
bonds, intending to set out before day. When I
approached
my father, he was looking in a small trunk,
seemingly unconscious of my entrance. The bonds
were enclosed here, said he, I saw them not long
ago. Can't you find them, father? No. I
proposed to assist him, and, taking the trunk to a table,
I emptied the contents on it, and then examined every
paper, one by one. No bonds to be found. My
father's
fortitude entirely forsook himhe fainted. I
called for help, and removed him to bed.
As my father sunk under his misfortunes, my mother
seemed to be inspired with fresh courage. She strove to
reconcile him to this new calamity. Charles, said
she, it is the will of Providence that we should be
afflicted
:
thee need not be cast down; remember Job.
Thy family is grown; Charles and Mary can maintain
us; little will do thee and me.
My sister and myself strove to comfort him. Mary
kissed him, and begged him to remember that he
had enjoyed many years of felicity; and that he ought
to be resigned under his present trials; but he was
mute. Nothing could equal the distress I felt; but this
was not the business, and despondency would avail
nothing.
My suspicion respecting the bonds, fell on Horton.
He had quitted my father, without assigning any
reason
;
and had left Boston, a few weeks before the
property
was seized. Although I had little hopes of
succeeding
with Hunter, yet, to gratify my father, who still
retained some opinion of the man, I set out for
New-York
.
When I made my name and business known to
Hunter, he assumed a haughty distant air, and replied,
I am surprised at your father, (raising himself with
unparalleled impudence as he spoke,) I am surprised,
that he should demand a debt long since paid; but it
is nothing more than I expected.
He had scarcely uttered the last word, before I seized
him by the collarYou lie, villain! nor dare to use
such language of my father. You stole the bonds, and
now you deny the debt. He bawled out, Murder!
murder! as loud as he was able. The house was
filled
,
instantly, with people. I attempted to withdraw
from it, but was seized and conveyed before a
magistrate
.
I began, but too late, to reflect on my rashness.
The wretch, thought I, will swear any thing. I have
no friends here. The horrors of a jailmy father,
mother, and sisterthe distress they would suffer,
rushed
upon me at once; but I will not attempt to describe
my feelings. Indeed, I was, for some time, insensible;
nor would any one understand me, who has not
experienced
misfortunes like this. A calamity, so great, so
sudden, and so unexpected, has scarcely a parallel.
Hunter swore that I entered his house to maltreat
him, and that I would have murdered him, had he not
been suddenly and seasonably relieved. It is scarcely
necessary to add, that I was committed to prison, to
await my trial at the ensuing term of the city court;
which was twelve days hence. I happened to have
money enough to fee a lawyer who visited me in prison,
and very candidly informed me that if the same
evidence
was, (as it certainly would be,) admitted in court,
the consequence would be serious. It might be a heavy
fine, and, perhaps, ten months imprisonment.
What was to be done? I felt no concern for myself;
but the affliction of my parents distressed me, beyond
measure. I had written to them on the subject, but
softened
the thing as much as possible, without concealing
the truth.
The lawyer asked if no other person was present
when the affray took place. I told him there was a
servant-maid
,
(as I took her to be,) but what of that?
Hunter would dictate to her. We will risk it, said
he, you cannot be worsted. Say nothing about it,
when you are in court, and I will arrange it.
Accordingly, when we, Hunter, &c. were called
before
the court, I saw my attorney send an officer out,
who soon returned with the servant-maid, whom he
interrogated
privately. Hunter was at this time giving
in his testimony, and was unapprized of her being in
court. The attorney managed to keep the servant
closely engaged in conversation, during Hunter's
examination
,
so that she never heard a word of his evidence.
While he was talking with the girl, I noted down the
testimony of Hunter. He stated, that Charles
Burlington
came into his house, fell on him, without
speaking
a word; beat him, and abused him with the most
insolent
language.
The girl was then desired to stand forth, and was
sworn
Q.
Do you know the prisoner at the bar?
Witness
. He came to our house, week before last.
Q.
Did you see him enter Hunter's house?
Witness
. I opened the door for him, myself.
Q.
Did you see and hear all that passed between him
and Mr. Hunter?If you did, state what it was, to the
court.
Witness
. Last Monday week, (this was Friday,) I
was sweeping the front room, I heard a knocking at the
door. I opened it, and this gentleman came in. I
asked
him to walk into the parlour. He refused, and asked
if Mr. Hunter was at home. At that moment Mr.
Hunter came in. The prisoner asked him if his name
was Hunter. He answered, It is. I have a
letter
for youI believe from a friend of yours. He took
the letter out of prisoner's hand, and asked prisoner to
be seated. He looked at the letter, and said, I am
surprised that your father should send to me for money,
when he has been paid, long since; but it is just what I
expected from a man of his principles. The prisoner
catched Mr. Hunter by his collar, and called him a
villain
.
Mr. Hunter cried out, Murder! and called for
assistance. Some men that were passing the house, ran
in and seized the prisoner.
Q.
Were you present until the prisoner was carried
out of the house?
Witness
. I was.
Q.
Were you summoned upon the first examination?
Witness
. I was not.
Q.
Did you see the prisoner strike Hunter?
Witness
. I did not.
Q.
What were you doing in this front room?
Witness
. I was sweeping it, as I told you, before.
The testimony being got through, the charge against
2
me, was ably and splendidly supported, and I gave myself
up for lost. I thought I could see ten thousand devils
in Hunter's countenance; I felt the pangs of a long
separation
from my parents;I felt wretched. But the
attorney who defended me, had proceeded but a short
way in my defence, before I conceived my innocence
secure
,
and I felt happy.
Those conflicting sensations were the effects of my
inexperience
,
particularly of courts, and pleadings;
though I have since learned that Mr. W, who
defended
me, possessed genius, eloquence, and a consumate
knowledge of the law. A trifling fine, was the end of
this mighty matter, and I left New-York.
Upon my arrival in Boston, I found my parents in
the deepest distress, on account of my absence, and
confinement
.
My father, compelled at last to change his
opinion of Hunter, gave all up for lost. The shock of
this sad reverse of fortune, entirely deranged him; his
vivacity forsook himhe became melancholy, and, in
short, his life was despaired of.
My mother had, by dint of inquiries, whilst I was at
New-York, learned from the servants enough to confirm
the suspicion, that Horton had stolen Hunter's bonds.
One of them, being out late one night, saw Horton
coming
out of the library with a lantern in his hand; but,
thinking he had been sent by his master for something,
never mentioned the circumstance, until it was revived
in his memory by the inquiry for the bonds.
Our situation was desperate. I attempted to borrow
money, but the report that the firm was completely
broken
,
had spread far and wideno one would lend. We
therefore awaited our doom in deep melancholy. We had
not even the consolation of a friendwe had many of
them, in our prosperity; but they all forsook us, at the
time we had most need of them.
The day of sale came; the property went for almost
nothing. I purchased a few necessaries for the family;
but they were not long needed.
My father, who had been almost insensible before the
day of sale arrived, died shortly after it; and my
mother
survived him only six months. She strove to
combat
fortune, while my father lived; but, upon his death,
her fortitude forsook hershe gave way to her grief,
and ended her sorrow in death.
A few days before this best of mothers died, she
called
me to her, desired me to fasten the door, and set down
by her. After doing as she dictated, she thus
addressed
me:My dear Charles, I feel that I shall soon
leave this world. Seeing that I began to weep, she
endeavoured to comfort meIt is no time to weep,
my son; listen to my advice. Thou hast had a good
lesson from the Almighty; I trust thou wilt profit by it.
He has taught thee, (for it is all his doings,) how vain
and transitory are all earthly things. Thy father has
toiled, and laboured, to leave thee and thy sister an
independence
;
but this displeased our heavenly Father,
and it has pleased him to blow it away with the breath
of his nostrils. Learn, from this, my son, what empty
bubbles are wealth and honour. Alas! what can they
do, in the hour of distress! But, above all things, my
child, pity and relieve your fellow-creatures, when in
distressnever turn away from the poor; for God hears
their cry, and he will revenge it on thee. Be humble;
respect the widow's tear and the orphan's cry.
Remember
that thy days are but very few here; lay up,
therefore
,
your treasure in heaven, by loving mercy and
walking
humbly. Thou need not doubt thy Saviour's
ability
to save. Christ has died for thee; therefore thou
canst not be lost; but I warn thee, never boast of thy
piety; keep thy piety to thyself, and let that of others
alone. Never run here, or run there, to hear this or
that great or small preacher. Such is not true
Christianity
;
but love god and your neighbour. True and
vital religion, says St. James, is not in running to night
and day meetings; it is in succouring the widow and
orphan in their distress, and keeping thyself unspotted
from the world. Have no connection with those people
who are noted for running to church, and nothing else.
I have always found them the most unfeeling, cruel, and
hard-hearted of the human race. They have mistaken,
they have forgot, they have entirely misinterpreted
Christ's precepts. Thou wilt find, my Charles, that
those religious bigots have none of the meek, kind, and
loving spirit of Christ; therefore imitate them not. I
have not the presumption to say why this is so; but, I
think it is the fault of the clergy. So long as they can
draw the people to hear them, so long can they rule
them; and if they continue, they will soon be as
despotic
as as the Pope, and, perhaps, not half so
charitable
.
Be not deceived by these cold-hearted,
cold-blooded
professorsremember what this wretch, Hunter, has
done. Perhaps he never would have thought of such a
black piece of treachery, had he not become a professor.
I may be wrong, my son; but, if I am, I have Christ
with me, that charity is the foundation and top-stone of
Christianity. For the rest, my child, I cheerfully leave
this worldI am not afraid to die; far from it. I long
to be with Christ. And now I come to the only
terrestrial
consideration which interests me, at this awful
moment
,
and that is thy sister; love her, sooth her, and
comfort her, when I am gone. Distress like hers, my
Charles, will need comfort. I have kept the worst
concealed
from herI could not see her tears. I leave thee
poor and friendless, it is true; but, he who tempers the
wind to the shorn lamb, will be thy friend. Trust in
him; he will never forsake thee; and, never, oh, Charles!
never abandon thy sister; she will soon have no
protector
but thee.
My mother spoke with a firm, clear, and distinct
voice, until she came to the last sentence. She then gave
way to her tenderness, for some minutes. I pressed her
hand, the only reply I was able to make.
I said thou hadst no friends; but God can raise up
friends for thee, my children;do not be cast down
entirely
only
rely upon thy Maker.
This was the last conversation I ever had with my
mother. I happened to be from home, when she died,
suddenly. When I returned, what was my anguish to
find my mother a corpse, and my sister raving! She
was sitting flat on the floor, her clothes and hair in great
disordershe was pale, and her eyes red with weeping.
No company was with her, except a few indigent
neighhours
.
She was insensibly leaning her head on her
knees, looking at the fire, exclaiming, My brother,
oh! he will break his heart.
Oh, no, said I, as I entered the house, I will
live to protect you, my dear Mary. She flew into my
arms---not a word was uttered, for several minutes.
Though I have since that day experienced every
vicisitude
of fortune, and difficulties that fall to the lot of
but few; yet the bitterness, the heart-rending pangs I
felt, while I pressed my afflicted sister to my breast,
have never been equalled. Those, and those only, who
have experienced similar calamities, will understand my
feelings at that moment;but I drop the curtain.
Lament
,
I certainly did; but I did not abandon myself to
despair. I led my sister into another room, and sat
with her during that day. It required all my skill, and
and all my tenderness, not to reconcile her. (that was
impossible,) but to enable her to support her sufferings.
In our prosperity, few families could count a more
numerous
,
or a more respectable circle of friends; but, where
they were then, I know notnone of them came near
us. Not so Wilson, our friend at college. We had
kept up a regular correspondence from the time I left
Princeton; in consequence of which, he was informed
of our misfortunes. The sympathy and kindness
expressed
by this truly great and generous young man,
ought to redeem the human character from that obloquy
which the conduct of too many has cast upon it. In
answer
to my letter, in which I disclosed to him this last
sad blow, he addressed me as follows:
Very Dear Friend
Your situation is one that admits
of little reliefnothing but time can heal the wounds of
the heart. But permit me to mingle my tears with
yourspermit me to say that I feel for your sufferings,
and that on a double account; but this is too tender a
subject, and yet I cannot forbear. Dear Charles,
forgive
me, for in your breast alone I would repose the
secret
of my heart; but I dare not name itcannot you
guess, oh, dearest Charles? Write to me, quickly, and
let me know. But I am ravingI sat down to console
you, whilst I need consolation myself. I shall see you,
at the end of the term, at all hazardsin the mean time,
2*
let me know whether I may dare to hopeyou
understand
me. Say to your sister, that her sorrows are
mine. You say she weeps incessantly.Oh, God! tell
her it wounds me to the heartnever again write to me
thus. Dear Charles, you have pierced my soul. Say
something to relieve me.Accept the trifle I send you,
until you can make it convenient to return it. Do not let
this mark of my eternal regard for you, wound your
delicacyyou know my heartyou know if I were in
your situation, and you in mine, that I would be proud
to give you this proof of our friendship. Know, from
henceforth, that what is mine is yours. Your very
distressed
friend,
HENRY WILSON.
This letter was of more value to me than the whole
world. I read it to my sisterit cost her a flood of
tears; but from that time her grief seemed to subside.
I saw that the attachment between them was mutual.
When I came to answer Wilson's letter, I asked my
sister
what reply I must make to that part of his letter
which evidently related to her, as it was the only thing
in it to which he entreated an answer. Her reply was
perfectly consistent with her situation, and such as I
would have dictated myself: she said that, had fortune
continued to smile upon her, Wilson would have been
the man of her choice; but, poor and friendless as she
now was, she could not think of accepting a man of so
much worth; that her want of wealth, in a connection
of that nature, would subject her to obligations which
her feelings could not brook; that she was but too
sensible
of the honour of his esteem, and thanked him for
his kind solicitude for her happiness.
This ingenuous declaration of my sister, was highly
gratifying to me, and was precisely the measure that
coincided
with my own opinion. I therefore communicated
the substance of her answer to Wilson, and concluded
by asking his advice. I told him, that I must turn my
attention to some calling for support, and begged him
to give me his opinion. For a lawyer, I thought I was
not sufficiently educatedthe occupation of a clerk,
appeared
my only chance; but something must be decided
on, as there was no time to lose.
In the mean time, I sought an asylum for my sister.
In her distress she had been frequently visited by the
family of a Mr. Simpson who seemed to express some
kindness for her. He had two daughters grown,
tolerably
agreeable. The old gentleman was also very
respectable
.
It was finally agreed, that Mary should
remain
at Mr. Simpson's, for the present, until I could
make other arrangements for her accommodation.
After disposing of my sister, I collected the small
remains
of my father's fortune. It cost me great trouble
and pains to recover small debts, that he had, in his
distress
,
overlooked. In the whole, it amounted to eleven
hundred dollars, only; which was my whole dependence.
Out of this, my sister was to be supportedI
determined
,
however, she should lack nothing, if I had to labour
by the day for her support.
While all this was going forward, I received a letter
from Wilson, stating that his father had recently moved
to Rutherford county, in Tennessee, whither he himself
was to go when his time was expired at college; which
would be in the course of three months; that the
country
he spoke of was very desirablethat it was rising
fast, in reputation; the soil was rich, the climate mild
and healthy, and the navigation promising every
advantage
to be derived from commerce; and finally, that he
would insist upon my accompanying him thither.
I was well pleased with this proposition, telling my
sister that I should leave her in Boston, until I should
visit Tennessee, and provide a place for her in that state,
should her inclination lead her to make it her residence.
I likewise informed her that she was to receive a visit
from Wilson, and at what time.
Having fixed, in my own mind, upon a plan for my
future destination, I felt considerably relieved. My
sister
also became more tranquil.
While I was busily engaged in arranging all my little
matters, in order to be ready for my departure by the
time Wilson arrived, I received a letter from Mr. W,
the attorney who defended me in the prosecution instituted
against me by Hunter. When I left New-York, I
requested
Mr. W to make all possible inquiry into
the affairs of Hunter: How he stood in society?
Whether
the property, (meaning the store held in partnership
with my father,) was sold? Not having heard from
New-York previous to the death of my father, I
addressed
a letter to Mr. W. and empowered him to settle with
Hunter.The letter just mentiened was the answer.
Sir
Agreeable to your request I waited on Mr.
Hunter and demanded a settlement: he said he was
ready
,
and forthwith we proceeded to the place where his
books were kept. Upon examining the accounts between
him and your father I am sorry to inform you that he
brings your father in debt. Upon presenting the account
you sent me, he denied the whole; and made use of
language
that is useless to repeat to you. I do think
myself
that your account is just; but you can get nothing
of Hunter. The property you spoke of was sold a few
days since for the benefit of Clark & Co.: therefore
Hunter is insolvent. It is thought, pretty generally,
that the goods were purchased by his friends and with
his own money. You ask of Hunters reputationhe
has hitherto been esteemed an honest man and a fair
dealer; but since your affair, he has fallen very much in
the esteem of the public. It is hinted here that he laid
this plan of treachery when last in Liverpool; the agent
for that house says he failed for the sum for which the
seizure was made. I am very sorry for your situation,
and have no comfort for you but the very poor ones of
patience and resignation. Should you have any farther
commands in this city I will attend to them with
pleasure
.Yours,
respectfully, &c.
As this was fully expected I was less afflicted at the
news; I therefore resigned myself to my fate.The
three months soon rolled round and Wilson arrived in
Boston; after three days we took leave of my sister and
set out for Tennessee. The parting scene between my
sister and us was truly distressing: but I pass it over!
We both promised to write to her often and to come for her
in the course of a year or two, at farthest. We travelled
the usual rout to Alexandria, and there took the stage
to Abbington in Virginia; where we purchased horses and
prosecuted the rest of the journey on horse-back; after
a tedious journey we arrived at Wilson's father's where
we were joyfully received by the old people. They had
one other son, but he was not at home when we arrived:
he returned, however, the next day. It seems he had
been to the house of a gentleman in the neighbourhood
to whose daughter he was in a short time married.
CHAPTER III.
Wilson's father was, as I have already mentioned, a
Virginian. I had often heard the Virginians celebrated
for their hospitality to strangers, but this was the first
opportunity within my recollection, I had, of deciding.
Whether the remark be true, or otherwise, I pretend not
to say; certain it is that old Mr. Wilson received me
with the same cordiality and friendship with which he
received his son. I saw no difference: every
demonstration
of joy, laughter, tears, and caresses, were lavished
on us, both by the father and the mother. The old
gentleman
seemed to be turned of fifty, and his wife
proportionably
old; he was all frolic and fun; told us old
stories
and would not hesitate to sing a song. The old
lady
was all chat and prattle about her geese, ducks,
turkeys
,
grass-walks, saving seeds, the right time of the
month to give the little negro children worm seed, until
she lost herself in a long dissertation upon the best
method
of rearing calves and lambs. Often has she puzzled
me to follow her in tracing the genealogy of the hundred
leaved rose, and various other curious flowers. The
old gentleman took great pleasure in walking over his
grounds and pointing out the qualities of the different
enclosures, and that one thousand
con'ills
would produce
fo
(four) barrels
mo
(more) here than it will in Old
Virginia, ah! and tobacco here grows
primer
.
He would discuss the method of rearing late and early
colts, and gave me an episode upon the pedigree of the
sober Irishman, the name of a celebrated horse which
he then owned. Indeed the whole of these good
people's
time and talents were entirely devoted to the
amusement and accommodation of their guests. I was
charmed with this country; it was rich, indeed; it lies
in large bodies uninterrupted by hills, marshes, stones,
or any impediment. Those beautiful plains, the
impenetrable
cane-breaks, the numerous smooth, flowing
streams gliding through lofty forests of beautiful timber,
formed the most delightful regions I ever beheld; and
although I have since seen countries to which this is no
comparison in point of beauty and fertility, yet it left on
my mind, impressions not easily to be eradicated.
After
resting myself a week, I proposed to Wilson a ride
to Nashville to see what prospect that town afforded.
On our way thither Wilson proposed to join me in a
store; he thought he would find little difficulty in
persuading
his father to advance the money. This
proposal
,
though agreeable to my wishes, I informed him
was not in my power to accede to, being almost
destitute
of fundsthat nine hundred and sixty-five dollars
was all the cash I could command, and four hundred of
that I owed to him, which through neglect I had not
returned
.
Dont be out of heart, said Wilson; the
money you speak of, I do not want, and if you cannot
lay out your money to more advantage, throw it into the
firm: you can act as clerk to my father or myself, as we
may hereafter agreeyour board in the mean time will
cost you nothing; if you only double your money per
annum
it is better than nothingcheer up, said the kind
hearted Wilson, don't despond, and with this
conversation
we reached Nashville. Nashville was, even at
this early period, 1807, a very handsome town. It
stands on the south bank of Cumberland river, which
runs from east to west, or nearly so, at this place.
Several
elegant brick buildings were erected, and amongst
the rest a handsome college, called Cumberland College!
In short such is the beauty, activity, and commerce of
this town that the whole had the appearance of magic.
Situated as it is at such an immense distance from the
more civilized sections of the Union, as I may say, it
will yet form, at no very distant period, doubtless, a
very respectable part of it. It has a very romantic
appearance
,
being built upon a lofty bluff, at the base of
which the Cumberland river steals softly along.
After making a conditional bargain for a store-house
and lumber-room, and likewise for a small assortment of
goods, we returned home. Wilson had been so careful
of my feelings that he had not divulged a sentence of my
late misfortunes to his parents. I would much rather he
had done so, that I might not in any subsequent event
appear to them in the light of an impostor. Upon
expressing
my objections to entering upon business in this
disguise, he said that if it would make any difference at
all with his father, such was his generosity, that it would
tend to bias him very much in my favour. I told
him that whether it did or did not, I could by no
means have any concern with the proposal without this
disclosure. It was accordingly made. The result
proved Wilson's observation respecting his father to be
as he had suggested. Old Mr. Wilson commended my
candour as the greatest evidence I could give of upright
intentions. Keep up your spirits, said he, you are
young and enterprising and very capable of doing
business
,
and you shall never want assistance. Henry talks
of setting up a store in Nashville and taking you in as a
partner. He would be glad that I would join him. but I
care nothing about it;I told him he should have this
year's cotton to try his luck; you can attend to the store
and he can study law the while. I suppose he's not
give that out.I hate to pay so much money for his
eddication
for nothing, and it was all his mother's doings at
first. Faith! it has cost me a good round sum, but as I
was telling you, his mother said, Well, old msn, we
must have one great man in our family, and you know
what a great man we have had a kin to us.
[1]
[1]
Patrick Henry.
Who knows
but that Henry may come to be President of the
United
States? Ah, Betsey, says I, you are always
building castles in the air. There's William, says I
to her, oh, he was to marry Miss Tabb Nothingsurer.
Well, to please her I rigs up William, that's my second
son, buys him a gig and fine clothes, and like o' that,
fine servant, well, off he goes to see Miss Tabbyou'll
hear how it turned out, just as I expected'
bout
a week
here comes William, looking doleful enoughmight
tell as far as you could see him that he had no
encouragement
I
was expecting how it would beold
woman
by, he gets out of the gig, comes in, if you had seen
how sheepish he looked, his mother all expectation.
Well, son, what news? Don't ask me about news,
says William, The dI may court Miss Tabb for
meas proud as hll; why she would hardly speak to
me! Possible! says my wife, a poor pretty upstart!
I can remember when her father was nothing but an
overseer
;
and I have heard my mother say that he had to
enter
her house with his hat under his arm. I'll let her
know that my son is as good
as she
. Seeing that he
paused, I asked, if Mr. Henry Wilson still intended
to prosecute the study of the law. Oh, I suppose he
does, I never
axed
him about it since he come home.
But as I was
tellin
' you, Mrs. Wilson must have a
President
or Secretary of State, or some dn nonsense.
Well, to please her, I always, Mr. Burlington, have
been a friend to the ladies and
trys
to please '
um
. Well,
so it was, Henry was hoisted off to Princeton, and now
I suppose his At this part of the narrative we were
fortunately interrupted by the entrance of company; to
come to the conclusion, the old gentleman a few days
afterwards
,
went with us to Nashville (telling his
long
stories
all the way) and purchased four thousand dollars
worth of goods, paying one half down, one half of which
I advanced to him, to wit: nine hundred and fifty
dollars
.
And here behold me now located in Nashville, upwards
of one thousand miles distant from my sister, and the
place of my nativity. Although no one had less cause
to murmur at their destinies than I, yet the man who
could so soon forget, the man who could so soon subduc
his feelings, must possess a greater share of philosophy
than I. In the hurry and application of business or
conversation
,
my thoughts would often steal to Boston.
Such was often the case, and such was the depth of those
impressions, that neither the charms of society, nor the
bustle of business could enable me to resist those
intrusions
.
Indeed, I found a pleasure, an exquisite
pleasure
,
in reflecting upon those past scenes; lest, however,
my health might be endangered by this weakness, (I
presume
it was) and my sister might lose her only
protector
,
I strove to keep it within proper bounds. Wilson
and myself had both written to Boston upon our first
arrival
in Tennessee. My sister received both letters, and
S
one answer only was returned. She stated that she
was well, and expressed much congratulatory pleasure
at our safe arrival and kind reception. To Wilson she
did not write; at the bottom of the letter to me, she
expressed
herself thus:As you are
brothers
one letter
may suffice for both. Whether Wilson was pleased, or
otherwise with this remark, is not in my power to say, as
by his words and gestures I could discover neither the
one nor the other. I now wrote to her again, thinking
it would be the most agreeable thing to her in the world
to hear that I was so happily situated, and had an
expectation
of a speedy independance for us both. Thus I
continued to discharge my duty as a clerk, with
undeviating
and unremitting attention. Wilson lived in
Nashville
during the time and was very seldom out of my
company; we both boarded at the same table, and slept
in the same chamber. In this manner one year rolled
round, and my prospects wore a brighter appearance than
when I engaged in business. Had I continued in this
situation I might have escaped a world of wo! When
I reflect on the circumstances alluded to, with calm and
rational retrospection, I am more than ever convinced
that all human affairs are guided by an over-ruling
Providence, and that we are simple instruments by which
he effects his purposes. But further remarks are
superfluous
.In
the course of the last year I formed an
acquaintance
with a Dr T. He was a young man of
enterprise and talents; generous and insinuating; he
possessed
every endowment of mind and clegance of person;
and with those qualities he had the most daring courage.
Dr. T spent much of his time in Nashville, during
the time I have mentioned. I was often in his company.
No wonder that I was captivated by this
extraordinary
man. Though he effectually succeeded in attaching
me to his person, yet Wilson alone had his confidence;
this I have learned since. It appeared that three
hundred
of those daring sons of the west, had concerted a
secret expedition to the Spanish dominions; and
Wilson
was included in the number, provided he could bring
me over; if not, he would keep their secret; but would
not join them.
Every one of the number entered into a solemn
engagment
,
confirmed by an oath, never to divulge the
nature
of the enterprize. This engagement they have
most inviolably kept, and it is probable will do so, while
they live. Every thing was settled before the subject
was imparted to me; this was Wilson's business. He
well knew he could intrust me with the secret, even
though I might disapprove the project. I was
thunder-struck
at first, but by degrees, and much persuasion, in
in an evil hour I joined the party. But after this many
difficulties were to be got over. What was to become
of my sister? I could write to her that we were going
to Missouri on a hunting party, (which in fact was
true,) and that we would return in about six months.
Well, but what shall we say to Mr. and Mrs. Wilson?
Tell them the same story. All this was well.
We were to rendezvous at St. Louis, the first day of
October. Each man was to supply himself with a horse,
and as much provision as the horse could carry. Every
six were to furnish a horse laden with powder and lead,
and other indispensable necessaries. Every man must
be furnished with a rifle, a brace of pistols, a dirk, two
suits of clothes, and two blankets. These with three
small tents were to be put on other horses. These were
the general regulationsany man, however, might take
as many horses as he pleased; which many of us did.
Other regulations were drawn up, for the conduct of the
party, which it is unnecessary to detail here. On the
day appointed, we met at St. Louis, in high spirits,
breathing the most impatient ardour to proceed.
Had some kind spirit whispered, You are about to
enter upon an enterprise, for the presumption of which
you will be chastised with grievous calamitieshad it
whispered that, instead of six months, my absence would
embrace three long years of unparalleled sufferingsbut
oh! no such kind monitornot the slightest conviction
not the most distant apprehension obtruded on my too
unsuspicious mind.
CHAPTER IV.
After resting ourselves for two days, at St. Louis, we
set out, keeping a south-west course until we reached the
head of St. Francis river, which we did in fifteen days,
without meeting with any accident or impediment. Here
we made another halt to rest ourselves and horses, and
refit our accoutrements. While we remained here we
were visited by the Osage Indians. At first they
testified
some dislike towards us: seemed wary and
suspicious
;
but upon Capt. T's assuring them that he
was just going to the western Ocean to catch furs, they
approached us with perfect unconcern, and offered to
guide us to the head waters of White River. We had
remained here three days, and parched a sufficiency of
corn to last us twenty days, as our biscuit and flour had
given out; Indeed, we had had so much rain for the four
or five last days, that our flour was spoiled. We had
prepared our provisions, washed our clothes, and
intended
to set out on the morning of the fourth daywhen lo!
fortune, which had hitherto favoured us, began to
lower.
We had concluded to leave about ten of our horses at
this place to seek their fortunes the best way they could,
as they were unable to proceed further; the remainder
were very much reduced, yet we meant to take them
some distance further, as we would soon be where wild
horses were numerous, from which we could furnish
ourselves
;
but that very night we lost four of our best
horses
.
This was distressing above all; yet we could have
borne this much easier than another misfortune, which
seemed to threaten us with more serious consequence;
this was both sickness and mutiny. Had I known the
tempers and dispositions of these Tennesseans before I
set out(but I might apply the remark to any thing else
as the present.) One of our men, whose name was
Johnston
,
was taken ill that night; we had a physician in
company, who had supplied himself with all sorts of
medicine. The physician pronounced his complaint to
be a malignant billious fever, generated from the low,
marshy country we were then in. The Indians
informed
us that this description of country was endless in
the direction we intended to pursue. This operated like
an electrical shock upon the whole party, Capt. T.
excepted
.
The alarm spread instantly; dejection
pervaded
every man's countenance, and by far the greatest
part were for turning back. For my own part, although
I was among the number of those who wished to return,
I said nothing. Then it was that I saw what was in the
power of one man to effect, when possessed of talents,
persuasion, perseverance, and address. In the first
place all possible assistance was bestowed on the sick
man, by which time the murmurs and tumult of the rest
had measureably subsided. Capt. T. then addressed
them in a short, but very animated speech, the design of
which went to remove their fears, and revive their hopes.
In this speech, every thing that ingenuity could dictate,
enthusiasm inspire, or eloquence display, was eminently
and emphatically resorted to. Scarcely had he ended,
before all cried out, Boys let's go on: we are not
cowards
shall
we who never feared the face of man, now
be scared by a few swamps and rivers? let's go on, we'll
stick by our captain while there's a button on our coats
live or die. All rose to their feet, as a token of
consent
,
except two brothers, by the name of Jones. Some
of those who were acquainted with them, observing this,
exclaimed dn it, boys, don't he obstinate! They
were incorrigibleCapt. T. appeared somewhat
grieved
,
and remonstrated with them in a style calculated to
soothe their tempers. It had no effectone of them
desired
Capt. T. to mind his own business: they were free
men and their own masters, and would act as they
pleased
.
Both turned pale, and their eyes flashed fire as they
spoke. They, however, were not unmatched: hardly
did they utter the last word, when one Gibson resented
the disrespectful language addressed to Capt. T. He
replied to Jones with much warmth, and with
displeasure
in his countenance, that he might go to hll if he
3*
chose, but if he uttered another word of disrespect to
Capt. T. he would send him there instantly. Capt.
T. and you are dd ! No sooner was this
pronounced than they flew at each other with the
rapidity
of lightning.No man touch: was reiterated
by an hundred voices. Part them, said others.
Stand off, said the brother of Jones, or I'll kill the
first man that interferes!These exclamations, the
undressing
and engagement of the combatants, and the
formation of a ring around them, by the party, were the
business of a moment!In the meantime, though they
advanced towards each other with the fierceness of
tigers
,
yet they encountered with cool and deliberate aim,
and not a blow was misplaced, no advantage sought, no
finess resorted to either by one or the other; while the
the most determined courage and presence of mind was
displayed on both sides.They were equal in weight,
courage, and skill; in short, they were the most equally
matched of any two men in the company; they only
differed
in age and wind. For about twenty minutes no
advantage
seemed to be gained by either, it was a regular
pass, one after another.But what equally surprised
me, was the perfect unconcern of the party; with the most
listless indifference one would take a chew of tobacco,
another a pinch of snuff. That was a durn'd good
blow! says a third, some would cry well done
Gibson
!
others well done Jones! Wilson and myself
who were trembling from head to feet, said nothing, at
least above breath. Wilson once observed to me I'll
be hanged if they mind it any more than we do a
chicken
fight
in Virginia! At the end of half an hour their
well-tried strength began to yield a little; both appeared
fatiguedsome cried part them: no man touch!
said Jones, brother to him who was engaged, if he
does he must be a better man than me! A better man
than you! quoth Wilson, he must be a lion then.
This might well be applied to a man of his gigantic
appearance; being a much stouter man than the one
engaged
in the fight.Fight till you die brother: never
give up! said Jones. Fight till yo die! said
another
to Gibson, never give up. Jones was somewhat
older than Gibson, but had the best wind, which made
them about equal. At length Gibson staggered, and
the next blow brought him to the groundpart them!
said an hundred voices. No man touch! hands off:
hands off! was reitered by as many more, in a noise
that rent the air.The advantage gained by Jones was
momentary; he attempted to keep Gibson down, but in
vain: Gibson turned under him and was on his feet in
a twinkling, and the fight was renewed with redoubled
vigour. How long they would have continued the
contest
,
is unknown; for Capt. T. cried out, They have
fought long enough, part them! several advanced
together
,
out of the ring, for this purpose, when the
other Jones flew among them, with his gun laying about
him with the butt end of it, flying about in all directions;
some caught hold of the gun, some seized Jones, and
others
laid hold of the combatantsamongst whom was
Wilson. As for me, I kept aloof, wishing myself safe
in Boston. Jones, after being disarmed, drew his dirk,
broke from those who held him, and flew amongst the
crowd like a roaring lion. At the same instant, Capt.
T. sprung behind him, caught him by the shoulders, and
brought him to the ground, flat on his back.
He was now overpowered by numbers, while he
grated
his teeth, in token of revenge. Had it not been for
this well-timed gallantry in Capt. T., bloodshed would
have been inevitable. The two heroes were now carried
by their respective friends, to a stream of water, to
refresh
themselves, and to have the blood washed from
their faces.
Jones, in the mean time, was put under guard, by
order
of the Captain. The guard, however, were
compelled
to hold him down forcibly, until he became
pacified
;
which he did in the course of thirty minutes.
And these are your Tennesseans, said I to Wilson;
but they must have studied fighting as an art, if not
as a science. But Capt. T. is a noble fellow. So long
as he lives, we have have nothing to fear; but should
any accident deprive us of him, bad will be our case.
Nothing but anarchy and bloodshed must ensue.
Perhaps I never was more mistaken in my
calculations
!
as was abundantly proved by subsequent events.
I found those very men, those Tennesseans, generous,
modest, mild, humane, sincere, and braveyet
peaceable
.
What was my astonishment upon looking up, when I
beheld Jones and Gibson walking arm in arm! They
approached the other champion, (Jones) and gently
reproved
him for his conduct. He smiled and replied
Tere's nothing like taking a brush now and then;
it keeps one's blood in circulation, and, addressing the
Captain, why the mischief did'nt you let me aloneI
would only have killed three or four; and dn the
odds, they'll die, any-how.Well, boys, said he
addressing
the company, let's go and hunt the horses, the
Indians have them, no doubt. Just give me ten men,
Captain, and I'll have the horses before I sleep!
Agreed, says the Captain, choose your men.
He picked out ten, brave as himself, but not so stout;
and after taking some refreshment, they set out, with the
utmost alacrityfilling their canteens with whiskey, of
which we had yet a plenty.
Thus ended an affair which seemed to threaten the
most alarming consequences! The sick man, I should
think, would have been worse, from affright, if nothing
else. Though I believe it was the means of reviving
him, for he seemed much better. I asked him if he was
not alarmed at the events of the morning. He said no:
and treated it with the utmost indifference. He was
very
cheerful, and seemed to promise recovery.
Upon enquiry, we found that Jones and Gibson were
much hurt. And no wonder: the twentieth part of
what either received, would have effectually cured me of
castle-building, in the air, for ever! And so far from
rancour, jealousy, distrust, or coldness, appearing
amongst us this evening, the whole was mirth and
conviviality
.
Betting, stories, and singing songs, as if
nothing had happened. They put me in mind of the
Irish, in this respectfight one minute and the next
they will be better friends than ever.
But it was amusing enough, to hear the dialogue which
took place between the two champions. After being
bled, they laid themselves down to repose, at a friendly
distance, and commenced the following dialogue:
Gibson
.
You gave me a dl of a surloinder right
there, (placing his hand upon his side.)
Jones
.
Ah! (said Jones, with a rueful countenance)
and you have given me change for it!
Gibson
.
Well, after all, I had no idea you were so
toughwhy, a body might as well strike the side of a
rock!
Jones
.
Why did'nt you cry enough then.
Gibson
.
Aye, truly! and why did'nt you cry enough!
Jones
.
Well, after all, it's nothing but a dog's
calling
,
and I'll quit it: say the same and it's a bargain.
Gibson
.
Agreed.
Jones
.
Never to fight again?
Gibson
.
Never!
Upon this they shook hands. And for aught I know,
have kept their engagements. Had I not had sufficient
proof of the sort of men who were absent, in search of
the horses, I might have entertained some doubts of the
expedition. Doubtless they would meet with the
Indians
;
but they will soon learn whom they have to deal
with. With this reflection, and much less anxiety about
the things of this too deluslve world, than I had hitherto
felt, I laid myself down by the side of Wilson.
These people effectually cured me of many errorsI
had thought this world a mighty matter. I had heard
and read of greatness of soul, wisdom, liberality,
magnanimity
,
bravery, friendship, and the most profound
philosophy, but never saw it before.
We were embarked in a bad cause, to say the least of
it. It was enterprize improperly directedit was the
error of youth! But what could not such men as these
achieveas they have abundantly proved since. These
are the men who distinguished themselves at
New-Orleans
.
These are the men who gained the most brilliant
victory recorded in history. These are the brave
Tennesseans
whose fame has reached distant countries; and
will be transmitted down to latest posterity!
About ten o'clock at night here came Jones,
whooping
and hallooing, with the horses. It appeared that
our conjectures were correct, respecting the Indians,
from the account given by Jones, of whom it must be
observed
,
as a specimen of the people of this country, that
he was not only a stranger to fear, but seemed to court
danger.
Taking the track of the horses, they pursued it through
many windings, to an Indian village. Jones rode up
amidst about an hundred Indians and demanded the
horses
instantlyor he would massacre the whole of them.
This was soon made known, through their interpreter.
Instantly, instantly! said Jones.
The Indians denied stealing the horses, but said
they would show us where they were.
That was a good one: said Jones.
No matter, no matter, move on, move on, show
where they are. If they had not stopped the bells we
could have heard them. Not a mile from the village,
and here we are boys, safe and sound. Give us some
supper, Tawney, (speaking to the man who waited.)
Pony up, pony up, boys, let's talk and have something
to eat. How are you, Bob? speaking to his brother.
Ah! said Bob, I feel a little sickish about my
stomach. And how are you, Gibson? I feel very
stiff and sore, said Gibson. I should wonder if you
did not, said Wilson; though he took care not to speak
very loud. No danger of the lock-jaw, ha; is there
any hopes of your death? I was afraid when Bobgot
youdown, said Jones, deliberately eating his supper,
that it was all over with you. Never saw a fellow
turn so quick, in my life. Well, after all, I'll swear it
was the prettiest fight I ever saw.Well, curse them
Indians, I can't get them out of my head. Hadn't they
the impudence of the devilthat's true enough. They
had like to a made me mad.
After eating his supper, with the utmost composure,
Jones went to rest, after making the kindest enquiry
after
the sick man's health.
The next morning we set forward on our journey.
The face of the country through which we were
travelling
,
was low, flat, and in many places, very wet and
marshy. Our course lay over rivulets, which proved
extremely troublesome to cross. Prairies were almost
constant. Buffalo and Elks, were often seen; deer were
numerous; also wild sheep and an animal of the hare
kind. This last was very large and very fleet. Our
dogs could by no means keep up with them; these were
numerous. We also saw several wild horses that were
small and indifferent in their appearance.
From the information of the Indians that the further
we advanced the better would be our chance to procure
good horses, we declined, for the present, any attempt
to catch them. They seemed to be very tame and
appeared to apprehend no danger from their intruders.
They walked slowly off from us without seeming to
notice
us in the least.
The other wild animals preserved nearly the same
indifference
towards us, except the sheep and the hare
each of which would disappear with the greatest
swiftness
.
Here, too, we passed the prairy
hen
, which we
had before seen on both sides of the Mississippi. These
are, in appearance and size, between a pheasant (as it is
called in this country,) and the domestic hen. It is
more like the latter. They cluck like the hen and are
followed by numerous flocks of chickens. My
companions
said they were often seen in the farm-yards, among
the settlers, west of the Mississippi, perfectly tame,
and supplied the tables of the settlers. We killed
numbers, and found them delicious. We also found the
prairy dog, as it was called, being a species of the dog
kind. It is, however, more like the fox, but much
larger
than any I had ever seen. They were of a very
dark, nearly a black colour.
These animals, as well as the hen, are peculiar to the
prairies. They are great enemies to the hen, upon
which they mostly subsist. Both are numerous. Our
dogs would often pursue the prairy dogbut without
success. The latter would instantly disappear in the
numerous holes which they burrow for themselves in the
ground.
These prairies are covered with wild rye, higher than
the tallest man's head, and so thick that you could not
see a man, on horse-back, at five paces distant. The
streams (I mean the margins) were as thickly covered
with cane.
We pursued our journey, mostly on foot, keeping a
little west of south.Headed the White river, and
struck the Arkrnsaw river in latitude 36 in four days.
During our journey we found vast masses of pure salt,
which proved very acceptable. The trees had not cast
their leaves. And the animals, quite similar to those I
mentioned, with this difference onlythe horses seemed
to be stout, and more shy. The land very fertile, and
covered with wild rye.
Johnson had not yet recovered. In fact he grew
worse, but continued, however, to travel; though at a
slow rate. As we seemed to gain higher and less
marshy
ground, we entertained some hopes of his recovery;
but his disease had taken too fast hold of him; and the
doctor gave him up. On account of this unfortunate
circumstance we unanimously agreed to await the issue
on the banks of the Arkansas.
But we waited not long. In twelve hours from the
time we halted, Johnston breathed his last! His easy
death, and the calm composure with which he met it,
might rank him among the most profound philosophers,
if not among the most pious christians.
On the north bank of the Arkansas, a lofty elm looks
down upon the humble tomb of Johnston. Peace to his
shade! He was one of the meekest and most pleasant
young men I ever met with.
After each had paid the tribute of a tear to his
memory
,
we set forth once more. We crossed the Arkansas,
on a raft, took six, only, of our best horses. Leaving
the rest on the other side of the river. Our baggage
was considerably reduced. Part of it we lost: some was
worn out; and we had but three bushels of Indian corn
remaining!
We were, however, no way disheartened on account
of bread, having cured a quantity of venison, with
the salt mentioned, and dried it in the sun. We found
it a good substitute for bread. Meat, we brought none
calculating to subsist on game, it being found in great
plenty.
Our amunition, upon which our subsistence depended,
was the only thing which gave us any concern. As long
it lasted, such as we were, we had no obstacles to fear.
Our whole attention, therefore, was turned towards that,
which we husbanded with great care.
When we crosed the river, we caught seven wild
horses
,
upon which we disposed our baggage, and pursued
our journey. Keeping due south, we arrived at
Wahashitta
river, in five days. Latitude 84. Still
pursuing
a southerly direction, we entered, (as we supposed)
Lower Louisiana in two days. Here we were
compelled
to halt, in order to refit, recruit ourselves, and
take medicine.
The death of Johnston had struck a damp on our
spirits
,
which had already began to flag, on account of the
distance we had travelled, and still more that which was
to come. But now our misfortune wore a more serious
aspect. Several of us being attacked with a fever! At
this place we were gratified with pomegranates, oranges,
and figs, growing wild; but saw no habitation.
Whether
this fruit was the spontaneous production of the soil,
or whether, as appeared most likely, the seed was
accidentally
dropped, by some adventurous traveller, I have
never been able to learn.
Grapes of various kinds abounded, besides a variety
of other fruit. The forest was perfectly green, and no
appearance that either frost or snow had visited this
mild region. Although the beautiful appearance of the
country, and a fine spring of water was a sufficient
indecement
to protract our departure; yet we were
apprehensive
,
from the marshy ground, which surrounded us,
and which determined us to hasten our departure. But
we were unfortunately detained six days.
On the evening of the second, about an hour before
sun-down, being all collected together, some sitting,
some laying down, some elated by the near approach of
incalculable wealth, and others cursing themselves for
fools, wished all the mines to the dI! when a
tremendous
roaring assailed our ears. Various were the
conjectures respecting itsome said it was wind
others
a water-fall, or a water-course of some sort. It
4
seemed to approach nearer, and became louder as it drew
near. I could not see a tree move, although the roaring
was, to our senses, ready to overwhelm us. I gave
myself
up for lost, when our guide cried out with a loud
voice, Take treestake trees, and setting the
example
.
As there happened to be trees near, every man flew to
a tree, with his gun in hand, expecting nothing less than
an engagement with some foe. Scarcely had each man
gained his tree, when a great number of cattle
approached
us, running by at full speed! They rushed by us,
without taking the least notice of us, whatever; several
of our men fired upon them, but it made not the least
difference
in their career. Had we not taken shelter
behind
the trees the instant we did, we should inevitably
have been maimed, if not crushed to death. There could
not have been less than five hundred!
When the noise had died away, and our guide, to whom
this phenomenon was familiar, was explaining it to us, we
discovered an army of men, on horseback, advancing
towards
us at a round gallop They were without saddles
or bridles, and almost without clothes, having on a
remnant
only, of what had once been such. They wore no
hats. But instead of them, a piece of cloth was tied on
their heads. They were exceedingly sun-burnt, if they
ever had been fair. There were about thirty of them, in
number. This fantastic group, in the manner they
approached
,
resembled men broke loose from bedlam, more
than persons in their senses. As they drew near, we
perceived that each of them was armed with a club, from
four to five feet in length; and our party, to a man, made
ready to fire in case of an attack. But they approached
us in perfect peace.
When they discovered us they stopped suddenly, and
appeared no less surprised at us than we were at them.
They gazed at us in silent astonishment. We spoke
first, through our guide, who understood their bad French.
They proved to be Louisianians, whose business it was
to attend those vast herds of cattle, which abound in the
natural meadows, which over-spread the country in this
region.
We found them grossly ignorant, particularly on the
geography of their country. They could give no account
of their towns, number of inhabitants, the productions,
nor even how far they themselves were bound. All that
we could get out of them, was that they belonged to
the parish of  and were employed by Monsieur
, to attend his cattle, that we had not seen more
than one half, and that they were driving those home,
which passed by us. We enquired how far they came,
and how far they had to go? but might as well have
addressed
the man in the moon.
They had travelled, they said, two days, since
they gathered the cattle. But of the distance they had
yet before them, they were perfectly ignorant. We asked
them how far they lived from New-Orleans, but these
swarthy sons of Adam, stared at us with awkward
stupidity
.
Captain T. invited them to stay and spend the
night with us, to which some of them appeared to assent.
But the major part seemed to refuse, alleging they
must stay by the cattle.
One of them, who seemed to be of some consequence
among his fellows, asked where we were going?
Jones replied, to England, to catch herrings! but
his quiz was lost on these ignorant creatures. They
very generously offered us a part of their scanty
allowance
of yams, for which we gave them an equivalent in
money, and they departed. The horses they rode were
greatly superior to those we had seen. And the
judgment
and skill with which they managed them was
surprising
.
At a signal, from the rider, the horses would
proceed or stand still. And the slightest touch of the
hand, on the side of the neck, turned the animal's course
at the pleasure of the rider.
When they left us I felt as though I would have been
glad to accompany them. I began seriously to repent
of my rashness in joining the party, and had it been at
my option again, it certainly would be the last thing I
would do. But the die was cast, and it was in vain to
think of retreat. I certainly did feel melancholy on the
departure of these Frenchmen.
On the morning of the seventh day we set forward
again, and the second day, at night, we arrived on the
banks of the Red river, as we have since understood, for
at that time we knew not its name. We crossed it in the
morning, and after travelling two days more we
discovered
we were bearing too near the gulph. And turning
more to the westward we headed Sabine river in three
days. We had received information from the Indians
whom we met almost every day, that it was much the
best way, the land being less marshy.
We continued to keep the same course, without
halting
,
except at night, for seven days, when our journey
seemed, in all likelihood, at an end, not by gaining the
object of our journey, but by the obstruction of a great
river! Here we sat down, disposed to rest and
reflection
.
Our situation at this time was such as would have
discouraged
any but Tennesseans. Worn out with fatigue,
some thousand miles from home, with no other food than
what the forest yielded, most of us very young men, a
river which we neither knew the name nor width of,
being unable to see the land on the opposite shore, was
such as to call up every power of the human mind!
Now, thought I, our Quixotte party must return, for it
is impossible they will have the hardihood to attempt
crossing such a river. No such thingthey were
not made to be intimidated by rivers. And to my
astonishment
,
set about making a raft, which, with infinite
labour, was completed in four days, and we effected
our landing on the other side in two, all safe! We
were now fairly over the Rubicon. Here we found the
Indians very numerous, much more so than on the other
side, and more intelligent. They gave us plenty of
fruit to eat, and informed us, as near as we could
understand
them, that we were within ten days journey of
Mexico! This they did by signs, pointing first to the
sun and then to their fingers, until they told ten.
The country was still more beautiful than that on the
other side of the river. We found the cocoa in plenty;
a few pine-apples and figs, and grapes without number.
But these were poor substitutes for bread. We ate of
them, however, and travelled on, procuring a few yams,
now and then, from the natives. On the fifth day after
crossing the great river, we began to ascend, as it were.
The low, marshy ground giving place to a more elevated
soil. The productions of which were as beautiful as the
most extravagant fancy could conceive. And in three
days more we reached St. Juan, a considerable village,
inhabited by Spaniards, Indians, and Creoles.
Here we rested three days, and with great difficulty
procured some Indian corn from the inhabitants. Our
guide, or interpreter, rather, for he knew nothing of the
way for the last ten days, with great difficulty made out
to explain to us the conversation of these people. And
their conduct towards us was rather unfriendly.
Jealousy
,
I could see, was depicted in their countenances.
They interrogated us with a minuteness which plainly
evinced suspicion. Our guide informed them, by whose
instructions heaven only knows, that we were going
to Mexico to form a
treaty
of
amity
and
commerce
, with
their
government!!
They seemed, as well they might,
not to credit this representation.
If we had acted cowardly, I have no doubt they would,
at least, have attempted to make us prisoners. But
such as we were, and such as we appeared, perfectly at
our ease, regardless of their significant looks, they
offered
us no violence.
During our stay at St. Juan, we received no
hospitality
from the Spaniards, whatever. What necessaries
we obtained we received from the Indians and Creoles.
In the mean time we endeavoured to obtain some
knowledge of the country, particularly that which lay
between us and Mexico, such as its towns, population,
and mines. Our enquiries were principally addressed
to the Indians, but they maintained the strictest silence
on all these subjects, at least so far as ever came to my
knowledge.
Whatever the rest of the party felt on this occasion, I
for one, became completely discouraged. I saw plainly,
that we had laboured in vain; and that our tedious and
perilous journey had turned out to be, a perfectly
Quixotic
expedition. We were, at least, two thousand miles
from home; and what were our prospects?
4*
Wilson's chivalrous spirit had effectually subsided;
but he would be guided by Captain T. who kept up the
spirits of the party, and, apparently, his own.
Some of our men took an excursion through the
surrounding
country; but, making no discovery to their
liking, we, Don Quixote like, set forward towards
Mexico
.
After leaving St. Juan, we kept a south-west
course, and made diligent search for a rich silver mine,
which we understood to lie in that direction.
I now discovered, for the first time, that the silver
mine was the object. I had, indeed, been told enough
to know, that silver or gold was, in fact, the object of
this infatuated journey; though nothing had expressly
transpired from those who were in the secret. But on
the morning of the second day after leaving St. Juan,
the whole of the plan, displayed at length on paper, was
submitted for the inspection of every individual in the
company.
The richness of the mine, its situation, &c. were
clearly pointed out. It was represented to be two
hundred
and eighty miles north-west from Mexico. We
concluded that we were within four hundred miles of
that city, and resolved to search every inch of the
intervening
ground, lest we might overlook an object that
had already cost us its full value, let that be what it
might. I felt somewhat relieved upon learning that the
object of this perilous undertaking was a little less than
storming the city of Mexico.
We now spread out, in all directions, over the plain;
anxiously examining every little aperture, and every
eminence; pulling up the weeds and looking at the earth
that adhered to the roots. Sad and silent, I walked on,
not caring whither, though often forced to smile at the
eagerness and industry of my companions; particularly
one of them, who ran to me, in great haste, to know
what a silver mine was like. I told him I did not know,
myself, as I had never seen one.
In short, we continued to wander about, making but
little progress in a straight line, owing to our often
separating
.
We saw several Indians; but paid little
attention
to them, except to procure a little bread; which we
found very difficult.
On the seventh day after leaving St. Juan, Wilson and
myself had separated from the company, as we had often
done before. But, on this day, we were mutually
resolved
to withdraw, secretly, from the party, and make
our way home, by New-Orleans. We had some idea of
the course and distance of Vera Cruz; and, should we
be so fortunate as to find it, we would attempt a passage
to New-Orleans. We had money enough, between us,
for every purpose; and, should we fail in making the
port of Vera Cruz, we determined at once to go to
Mexico
,
and throw ourselves on the mercy of the Spaniards.
Finally, we determined to hazard every thing, rather
than stay longer from home.
Having formed this resolution, and being almost
fainting
from weariness, and want of food, we stretched
ourselves on the ground to gain a little refreshment
from sleep, fully determined to adopt our plan when we
arose.
CHAPTER V.
How long we had slept I know not, when we were
suddenly aroused by the trampling of horses, and upon
looking up, to our astonishment, beheld about three
hundred
men, armed with swords and pistols, and were
made prisoners before we were fairly awake! We
remonstrated
in bold terms against this outrage, adding
that we were citizens of the United States, and came
on friendly terms, that there was a large party of us, and
finally, they would be made to pay dear for offering such
violence to our persons.
To all this they returned no answer, but proceeded to
place us on horses, confining our hands behind our backs
with cords, and our feet under the body of the horse, in the
same manner. Our rifles, which they seized the first
thing, together with our pistols, were carried by the men,
in triumph.
They now set forward, and hurried us on at an
unmerciful
rate, and when we complained they menaced us
in an angry tone, and made signs as though they would
shoot us.
They continued to travel, at the same rate, in an
easterly
direction till dark, it being about twelve o'clock
when they came upon us. About dusk we arrived at a
considerable village, the name of it, I have since
understood
,
was Depotozy. We were now released from the
horses, and conducted into a room tolerably furnished, a
guard of fifty men being placed outside of the door, which
they locked after them, they left us.
In the course of thirty minutes the door was opened,
and four armed men came into the room, bearing a large
wooden bowl, containing our suppers. This consisted of
meat, cut in small pieces, mixed up with soup and Indian
corn.
One of the men, whom I knew to be one of those who
captured us, and who rode by our side to this place,
addressed
us in broken English and invited us to eat, but
although we were near perishing with hunger, at the
time, nothing would have been more acceptable than the
savoury contents of the bowl. Yet our sad reverse of
fortune had such an effect upon us that we felt little
appetite
to eat. We did, however, drink some of the soup,
eat a few mouthfulls of meat, and enquired of the man, in
the meantime, the cause of our captivity, and what they
designed to do with us? He answered, with a frown,
that we would find that out when we got to the city of
Mexico, and finally gave us no other satisfaction. He
soon withdrew and left us to our own reflections.
Of all the acts of folly that ever were committed by
men in their senses, it certainly was the greatest in us to
stop or make ourselves known at St. Juan. And
although
disappointment and disaster must finally be the
end of this ill-judged undertaking, yet this step was
the sure way to hasten our ruin, as it appeared in the
sequel.
A guard, or military station, was kept at St. Juan.
These men dispatched a messenger to Mexico, to apprize
that city of our intrusion; and a party of soldiers was
immediately dispatched, either to destroy or take us
prisoners. This we learned afterwards.
Next morning we were visited by the principal of the
town, as we took him to be from his appearance. And
the same person who addressed us the evening before,
attended as an interpreter.
This person asked us what were our motives in
visiting
their country with an armed force?
We replied that we were armed only for the purpose
of procuring food, and defending ourselves from the
savages
,
that we were exploring our own country, and were
obliged to pass through theirs.
He replied that he had but little doubt but that we were
spies, and in pursuit of their mules with a view of
purloining
them, as we had heretofore done.
He enquired how many there were of us, and what had
become of the others? With respect to our numbers, I
answered him correctly, and without hesitation.
Observing
that we had separated from our companions, in
order to return home by water, being unable to reach
there on foot, which was true, and that we could not say
what had become of our party. We remonstrated against
being detained as prisoners, alleging that his
government
would be held responsible for his conduct. To
this he made no reply, but said something in the Spanish
language to those around him, the purport of which I
presume
was, that they must proceed with us to Mexico, for
thither we were immediately conveyed.
We arrived at that city on the fourth day, about noon,
being escorted by about fifty men, on horseback, armed
with clubs, swords, and pistols.
When we entered Mexico we were immediately
carried
into the presence of the Viceroy, who questioned us
upon our motives in entering their territories, our
number
,
&c. We answered nearly in the same manner as
we had done before. After various efforts to extort from
us further confession, this representative of Spainish
royalty
ordered us into close confinement, in separate
apartments
.
Nor would they allow us the use of pen, ink, or
paper, or any means of communicating with each other.
At the end of eight days I was brought out before his
majesty again, who was this time surrounded by a
numerous
crowd of attendants. He put the same questions
to me as before, and I made the same replies. I was
now confronted with a witness, who, it seems, had
arrived
from St. Juan. By him I was charged with
dissembling
,
my confession being at variance with the
declaration
of our men, at that place. I replied that I was
not accountable for the hair-brain expressions of a few
wild young men, and that I told them the truth.
When I was ordered to retire I refused, and said I
would rather die than be detained in prison. I
remonstrated
in bold and forcible language against this
outrage
upon my liberty, and denounced the heaviest
vengeance
upon the whole Spanish nation. My feelings were
wrought up to such a height that I would rather have
died
than not. I had committed no offence against their
country, nothing had been proved against me, and even
if there had been, I disclaimed their jurisdiction!
But this brutal Spaniard was immovable, and I was
seized and forcibly lodged in a dungeon, as dark as
midnight
,
in a different part of the city from that in which
I had hitherto been confined.
As the sound of the last door reached my ear, it
appeared
as if I had taken final leave of the world! Had
I been sentenced to death I could not have felt worse.
My former prison was a palace, compared to this. It
was lighted with windows, and furnished with mats,
tables
,
and seats.
I had hitherto been supplied with tolerable food
behold
me now, shut up in a dungeon dark as midnight,
chained down in such a manner that I could just bend my
body and once a day fed with bread water! Had I been
blessed with the company of my friend, even in this
situation
,
it would have been supportable. Doomed, for
aught I knew, to drag out a long life of suffering
perhaps
,
without ever more seeing the light of the sun!
Death, in any shape, in its worst of terrors, would have
been mercy, compared to the tortures I endured. I
raved
,
I bewailed my fate, I called on my keeper to put
me to death rather than leave me in such a place. In
short, my sufferings were such, that I was seized with
a fever, which depived me of my reason.
How long I was deranged, I am even yet ignorant;
but when I regained my senses, I found myself
unchained
,
a lamp in my cell, and attended by a different
keeper
.
You must be an angel, said I, as I attempted to
raise myself up to examine his features;) and I must
be in heaven. Relieved from the impenetrable gloom
which pervaded my dungeon, my first sensations were,
that I was actually in another world.
Why, sure now, I am glad to hear you say that;
said the man, with an Irish accent; and you have
been stark mad, this long while.
And who are you? said I, and how came I to be
unchained? My name, thin, is Dennis O'Conner;
and your chains were taken off by the order of the
governor
,
because they thought you was dying. How
long have I been sick, Dennis? Indeed, thin, I
can't tell. I have been with you six days, and a time I
have had of it. Always calling for drink, and calling
for Henry; and spakin all the nonsinse, and they was
afraid you would die, and they sint me to take care of
you, because I could spake the same tongue as yoursilf.
And what has become of my friend, the young man
who was taken with me? Can you give me any
information
respecting him, my friend? He shewed an
unwillingness
to answer this enquiry; saying his life would
pay the forfeit, if it were known that he gave me any
information on the subject. He informed me that he was
an Irishman, and had lived with the Spaniards nineteen
years. He expressed much pleasure at my recovery,
and said he must go and report the same to his mistress:
and, leaving the lamp burning he bid me farewell.
In the course of a few hours, Dennis returned.
Och! said he, you don't know how they are lifted
up, to hear that you are getting well again: and,
drawing near, addressed me in a whisper, saying, I
have brought your honour a little bit of a chicken here;
but, for the love of God, don't be saying any thing about
it; and here's a drop of wine to nourish you, and put
strength in you. I tould my young lady that it was a
great shame that sich a gentleman as your honour should
lie here, like a baste, and that you had a stomach to
your victuals, and ought to have something better than
could water.
Who is your young lady, my friend? Is she the
governor's daughter? or whose daughter is she? My
young lady, God bless her, for she is the best crature
that ever trod on nates leather, is the governor's
daughter
.
I thank you, my friend, and your young lady,
too.
Och! if I had time I could tell you a deal about her
and her maither. But do now rise up and try to ate a bit,
it will help to strengthen you. But as I was saying, my
lady's mother is dead, she died when my lady was a bit
of a childand many's the day I've carried her in my
arms, and learn'd her to spake English. Och, if you
had seen her mother, just to hear her when she was a
dying, poor soul! Dennis, says she, never while
you live, never forsake my child, I am going to leave her
in the wide world, and I shall depend on you, Dennis,
to take care of my child while there is breath in your
body
.
Faith! she might well say thatbut divil a bit of
her was I going to lave if she hadn't a tould me. Rest
her sowl, she is in etarnity now, and I'm sure I wouldn't
tell a lie about it!
What country woman was she, Dennis, said I,
willing to keep up the conversation for the sake of
amusement.
Why, sure, she was a Portigeese lady, though she
was born in swate Ireland, and whin she was woman
grown her mother took her to Portigal, and ill luck
betide
me, who should they take to wait upon them, but
Dennis. But why in the name of the Vargin don't you
ate sir, and drink a bit of the wine, it will strangthen
your stomach.
I cannot eat, for joy Dennis, to think that you and
your young lady have had compassion on such a poor
miserable
being as I am. I hope that heaven will reward you
both. But go on with your story, Dennis, you were
going
to tell me about your lady, the sound of your voice
is music to my ear.
I can't stay now, said he, I'll tell you some other
time.
Can you learn what is to done with me, Dennis?
Oh, I suppose they'll jist kape you in here awhile,
and maybe have you before the Inquisition.I don't
hear any thing about what they are agoing to do. But
one thing I do knowthat my lady's in a peck of
troubles
about you and the other man.
Ah, true! what has become of him: for God's sake
tell me where he is!
Before he had time to reply I heard a deep groan,
resembling
a human voiceWhat can that be, Dennis?
He seemed no way surprised, but rather appeared to
shrink from the question, though he spoke not.
That must be some unfortunate being, Dennis. Oh,
my kind friend, tell me, is it Wilson? is it my
unfortunate
companion?
Now you are so coaxin' you would almost make a
body forsware themselves, and maybe said Dennis
hesitatingly but then father Antonio would say it was
a hainous crime. But if I thought
5
Fear me not, friend, I will never betray you, I would
suffer a hundred deaths first, I would sooner suffer the
tortures of your infernal Inqusition itself.
Holy Father, ejaculated Dennis, if my lady's
father had heard you say that
I will not then speak against the customs of your
country. For your sake I will not do it, but more
particularly
for the sake of your young lady.
You know her then?
No indeed I do not, I never saw her, of whom you
speak. But, dear Dennis, keep me no longer in suspense,
does my friend live, and was it him that we heard just
now?
Why sure, then, said Dennis, pointing to the
place with his finger, and nodding an assent with his
head at the same time. This was enough.
He lives then? said I, could I contrive some
means of conversing with him I should be happy, though
in a dungeon!
I was silent some time, and finding that Dennis made
no reply, I asked some questions respecting the nature
of the wall that separated the dungeons.
It cannot be very thick Dennis, and since you have
given me such, and so many testimonials of your
friendship
,
could you not aid me in procuring some instrument
to make a small opening in the partition,by which
means we might converse?
Dennis, after some hesitation, exclaimed suddenly
I am overstaying my time, I shall talk a bit with my
lady about it. And intimated that it was a dangerous
thing to attempt. You don't know these Spaniards
yet! Saying this he left me.
After his departure I crawled, being unable to walk,
to the place from whence the groan issued, and called to
Wilson as loud as I was able, but received no answer.
I repeated my efforts, but in vain. I struck the wall with
my hand, and with the lamp, which Dennis had left
with me, I examined every inch of the partition, but
found no aperture or any place more favourable than
another
for my purpose. The partition was constructed
of huge pieces of timber, laid length-ways and clampt
with iron, through which iron screws were inserted. I
continued my efforts to make myself heard, until I was
completely exhausted, and threw myself down in
hopeless
agony.
While I lay in a fainting condition I thought of the wine
left by the kind-hearted Dennis, and swallowing a
large draught, it immediately restored me. I then ate
the chicken entirely up, and was scarcely done when the
well known voice of Wilson assailed my ear.
I crept to the place from whence the sound proceeded,
and eagerly enquired after his health. He replied that
he was well and had been much distressed on account of
my indisposition, his keeper having informed him that
I could never recover! I satisfied him, so far as I knew,
respecting it. After mutual congratulations respecting
our ability to converse, he gave me the following
account
:
When I was separated from you I was ordered
before
the Viceroy, where, having gone through a strict
examination, I was sent to this wretched dungeon.I
gave my enemies to understand that they would pay dear
for their conduct, and demanded pen, ink, and paper, to
write to my government on the subject of my
confinement
.
This was refused. I then demanded leave to
write to my parents. This was also refused. I
repeated
my request with redoubled boldness, regardless of the
consequence. At length my request was granted, and I
wrote to my father, but I have little hopes of its ever
reaching him. I saw treachery in their looks too plain
to believe they will suffer any communication between
us and our country.
Dissimulation was too visible in their countenances.
I however submitted the letter to their inspection, as I
wished to convince them I was not the poor wretch they
took me to be, having called on my father, in it, to send
me two thousand dollars.
I was then lodged in this infernal den, and fed once
a day on bread and water. As I can speak their
language
a little, I was soon apprised of your illness. By
soothing the barbarian who attended me, I at length
prevailed on him to tell me your fate, which I had
suspected
.
It was he who informed me that you were sick
and in the adjacent dungeon.
After imploring this wretch as earnestly as though I
were begging for my life, which in fact was the same
thing, he gained permission from the Intendant to allow
me a light.
In his various visits to my cell, I could see by the
light of the lamp that the wall which separated us was of
wood, which suggested the idea that I might succeed in
opening a place, through which we might converse.
That was about ten days since, during which I have
been engaged in making the opening with my
tommahawk
,
which the Spaniards overlooked when they
disarmed
me, and which I have taken care to keep
concealed
.
With this and my hunting-knife I worked day and
night, desisting only when I looked for the man to bring
me food.
Upon my expressing some wonder that he had
continued
to keep the place concealed, he replied that he had
contrived, with the assistance of his knife, to cut the
first piece out so adroitly that it fitted the aperture
exactly
,
and concealed the fragments in a hole which he
had dug in the floor.
We now discussed the subject of our imprisonment and
release, with the probabilities in favour and against us.
We continued to converse and console each other the
whole of that night, and endeavoured to draw comfort
though remote from the idea, that if the letter forwarded
by Wilson should miscarry, yet some of our party might
escape and apprise our friends of our captivity.
This was the only certainty we had of relief, but this
spoke a long captivity! Wilson, who had been chained
when he was first put in the dungeon, said he was
relieved
from it in about two or three days. Briefly, we
talked
ourselves asleep, from which I was roused by Dennis
about nine o'clock the next morning.
Almost the first question I asked Dennis was
whether he had received any reprehension for staying
so long with me the preceding day?
He replied that he had not, and that no one knew of
it but his young lady. I went straight to her, he
said, and tould her about your friend, the young man.
She is sorry enough for him.
Dennis, says she, I wish you might contrive some
means to see him, for I cannot send him any thing by his
kaiper.
I'll warrant he would be glad to oblige you. What
business is it to any one what he does for you?
I will try him, says she, he cannot but refuse.
Dennis, say you he has nothing but bread and water?
No, sure he has not, says I, I can assure you,
Donna, it is too bad for a Christian!
I will see, said she, what can be done.
She tould me to go and tell the kaiper she wanted to
see him. So behold ye, whin he wint in to see my
lady
,
what does I do but kape myself clare out of sight,
mind ye, to hear what was goin' on, for I never had a
very warm heart for this Spanish gentryso my lady
ups and tells how bad you and your friend was sarved,
and that they would all be made to suffer for it in the
long run, and comes round the lad the handsomest way
you ever saw. And so after blathering a bit of a while
with him she axes him to drink a glass of wine, and
says to him, says shebut why don't your honour ate,
here's some good hot coffee and hot cakes, they will all
get could.
The sweat by this time was standing in great drops on
my forehead, from mere anxiety to know the amount of
Dennis' communication. Though I was much pleased
at hearing him talk at all times, I would rather have
heard the subject in one word at the present. But that
would be impossible from one of his method, and sitting
to my breakfast Dennis continued
So, as I was after telling you, Jaques drinks the
wine. Says Donna to him
How does your prisoner come on, and what do you
give him to eat?
Why he comes on very well. I take him plenty of
bread and water once every day.
Poor nourishment, Jaques! Do you think it would be
any harm, if you was in his place, to give you something
more nourishing now and then!
5*
No, I don't think it would, if it was not found out
by the Viceroy.
And how can it be found out? I will give you a little
wine and coffee, and here, take the key and tell Dennis
to bring a pound or two of cheese out of the old
side-board
,
and come to me directly, before my father returns
home.
Maybe I wasn't into the side-board quick, for once.
And, do you hear, if any one asks you where you
are going with it, say Donna is sending it to a poor
neighbourquick, now, off!
So she packed him off before he had time to say his
sowl was his own!
I am glad to hear it, Dennis: and was it your lady
that sent me my breakfast?
Faith! and who else would send it but her? Do you
think I would tell her you was so troubled that you could
not ate? And bless your swate sowl, here's a bottle of
wine in my pocket! and here in my 'tother pocket is a
bottle of oil for your flickering lamp. And my lady
says you must have books to read, and she has enough
of them too! She says they belonged to her mother.
But I'll tell you whatwe must carry on the flam.
My lady says to me, says she`we must kape it sacret,
about the young man's getting well, or they'll take you
away.' And that would be a pity says I, to let him come
under them black-hearted guards that never had a drap
o' warm blood in their bodies, and so Donna we will kape
them in ignorance!
And your lady has sent something comfortable to
my friend?
Long life to her, and that's what she has!
She must be an angel, that lady of yours, I wish I
could see her!
What if I should tell you now, that you have seen
her! Would'nt you think that strange?
If I ever have, I did not observe her. I have been
so strictly guarded since I entered the city, that I have
had no opportunity of seeing any thing.
But what if I was to tell you that she has been in
here when you was sick, and brought her maids with
her, and brought you medicine, and brought you teas,
and chocolate, and wine, and wet your face with
hartshorn
,
and gave me twenty charges about you. Och! its
all because she has Irish blood in her veins!
This brought to my mind an apparition, which
appeared
to me, during my illness. I thought a divine looking
female stood over me, and seemed to regard me with
uncommon
concern; but of her I had but a faint
recollection
.
Your lady is beautiful, then, said I, for I think
now I recollect her.
Indeed is she, then, as an angel. Oh, if you was
to see her rosy cheeks, and her eyes as black as a sloe.
Finding I had touched the right string of Dennis'
heart, and desirous of availing myself of the
amusement
his conversation afforded me, I reminded him of
his promise to finish the narrative of his mistress and
her mother's lives. But, in the first place, Dennis,
tell me how it happened that you were sent to attend me,
at all.
Taking up some cheese, as I spoke, Aye, that's as
good Cheshire as ever crossed the salt seas; and do
taste a drop of wine. My lady said you must drink
hearty. Well, I was going to tell you all about my
lady
and her mother, and how we come to lave Ireland;
but you want to know what made 'em sind me to
wait on you. Why, sure, I tould you that before. They
began to think you would die on their hands, and got
scared, and thought the people in the States would find
it out and make a rout about it; and the man didn't
understand
you, and they sint me to you because I could
spake Inglish and tell what you said; and I just
happened
to come in the nick of time. If it hadn't been for
me, and Donna Leanora, it would have been all over
with you, before now.
There was a large party of us, Dennis, when I was
made prisoner. Did you ever hear what became of
them?
Why, no, I can't say as I did hear what become of
them; but I heard my lady say how they had a sharp
engagement
with them; but I'll ax her more about it. Do
now take another sip of the wine; my lady will be sure
to ax me, the first thing, if the gintleman drank any
of it.
Well, Dennis, I will, for her sake; and the next
time you come, bring me the books you spoke of.
Well, I was goin to tell you about thim same books,
too; and how my lady's mother, rest her soul, come to
buy them.
Wishing to turn the channel of his discourse, I
renewed
my request to hear the particulars of his lady's
family;when Dennis seemed to be balancing in his
mind, whether he should begin the story that day, or
postpone it to another; and finally said he would put it
off to another time, as it would detain him too long from
his mistress, who would, by this time, be looking for
his return.
As he turned to go out, I reminded him of the books,
and also, if it was in his power, to bring me pen, ink,
and paper. He bowed, and withdrew.
CHAPTER VI.
After
the departure of Dennis, I approached the
place of communication between myself and Wilson,
(who of course had heard most of the conversation
between
me and Dennis.) When he informed me of his
good cheer, mutual congratulations took place, upon the
change in our situation; and we drew favourable omens
from the interest which this fair unknown took in our
misfortunes.
Although our situation was greatly improved, yet still
it was such as to render it impossible for any human
being
to exist in it long. My dungeon was about eight
feet by six, damp, and several feet under ground. Not
a ray of light, and very little air. Wilson's, he told me,
was nearly the same. Both were without flooring, and
the water we drank was of a very bad quality; but, as
we had brought the misfortune on ourselves, we
concluded
to meet it with fortitude and patience.
Wilson had, generally, been free from sickness, but
he now complained of a head-ache, occasioned as he
supposed, by drinking too much of the wine, and
indulging
in the good things which had been sent him by
Leanora
.
It was about eleven oclock, as we conjectured, when,
concluding some accident had deprived us, for that night,
of Dennis, we began to prepare for sleep. Soon,
however
,
the doors began to open, and Dennis entered my
Dungeon with a dark lantern in his hand.
May the powers bless us! but I've had a tramp of
it, comin in the dark, said Dennis; here's all the
things your honour tould me to bring. My lady sends
a thousand good wishes to you, and hopes you'll have
your liberty soon.
I thank her, from my soul, Dennis. Her kindness
greatly overbalances the cruelty of the monsters who
detain
me in this dungeon. But let us see what you have
brought.
Upon looking over the books, I found Sterne,
Goldsmith
,
Pope, Ariosto's Orlando, Don Quixote, and a few
novels.
My lady says she will sind you more, and she will
sind your friend some too. But for the love of God
don't be saying anny thing about it, or it might cause a
dale of harm.
There is not much danger of that, Dennis. Your
Spanish gentry will not trouble me much with their
company
,
and I should be sorry if they did.
I'll tell you whatmy mistress is coming to see
you to-morrow night, herself; to see how you areand
says I must make you a fresh bed, and take away this
ould hay; and she would send you both some bed-clothes
if it was not for fearOch! if her mother was alive
it would not be this way you'd be sarved.
Many's the prisoner she has released from these
cursed dungeons. She used to say that none but the
divil
himself would think of burying paiple alive. And my
maister, poor sowl! is not a bad man naither. But if he
was to show you any lenity he would be dungeon'd
himself
,
and maybe lose his head into the bargain!
Finding his volubility of tongue had somewhat
abated
,
I essayed to slip in a word, for though it was no
easy
matter to thwart Dennis in the midst of his
oratorical
career, yet I could change its course at pleasure.
I therefore asked him if he had enquired of his lady
respecting our men? He answered that he had, and
she told him they were seen, and attacked by the
Spaniards
,
fought valiantly, and made their escape.
I am glad of that, Dennis. Here's a guinea for
youyour fidelity however, is above all price, and you
are more than a friend.
Here take your moneyd'ye think I'd take any
thing in way of parquisites? Why, if my lady was to
know of my doing such a thing, she'd never let me
darken
her door!
Dennis handed back the guinea, with something like
contempt in his countenance, saying he thanked me; but
his mistress never suffered him to be without money.
You say she is coming to-morrow? You must bring
me some razors in the morning. Can you shave pretty
well, Dennis?
Yesand I reckon it will be a task too, your beard
is a fright, as my lady used to say to me when she'd be
sending me with letters and compliments; the sowl is in
them for ladiesthere's none of your outlandish females
that come up to them.
Folks may say what they plaise, but give me an
Irish ladythat's the lady after all, none can compare
with them, and that you know; for I'll warrant many's
the one you've seen in them there States.
I shall not understand your mistress, Dennis. I
am afraid I shall need your assistance to aid me in
expressing
myself to her, as I ought.
My stars alive! Why sure you are not crazy yet,
are you? Didn't I tell your honour that my mistress
spoke Inglish; and went to Paris, and London, and
Madrid, and all the world over, to get her eddication
and larned all the languages? I'm sure I ought to know,
when I went with her myself.
Oh, I could tell you a great dale about my rakes and
rambles: if I have not seen the scenes of life, I
wonder
!
said he, sitting himself down on the rude bed by
my side.
You have lived in the family, then, some time?
Man and boy, I have lived in it forty years. My
lady took me when I was only ten years old. She lived
at Tiperara, in Ireland, and had a liking for my mother,
rest her sowl! and when my mother died she took me
home and made a pet of me, and sint me to school, and
dressed me up, and gave me good larnin, and who should
she have to wait on her but Dennis?
Well, as little I could do, but I never wore livery
She said Mary O'Conner's son should never come to
that!
And she took you to Portugal?
I'll tell how it was, said Dennis, setting in for a
night's siege, at least. My lady was sickly at times,
and the doctors said that nothing but a sea-voyage would
help her. And so they carries her to Portigal, and there
does her mother marry a great Portigeese lord, or duke,
I can't tell what he was: and so she never went back to
Ireland, no never more! And so we staid at this Lisbon,
it was a great town, to be sure, but the paiple was a
gloomy sort of heathens. Lord how feared I used to be
of my Lord, when I used to stand behind my lady's
chair. I don't know what the divil she could see in him,
for he looked, for all the world, like a hangman: but they
said there was some family connectionthe divil take
the connection! said Dennis, sighing deeply.
It has caused me many a bitter sigh! it is the cause
of my being here nowbut it's all one, my father and
mother are both dead long ago. And so as I was telling
you, my lady's mother she married
And did your lady marry in this country or in
Portugal
?
I'll tell you how it was. My present master's
father
,
who they say was a far-out relation of the lord
that married my lady's mother; (but it makes no odds)
he was travelling with his family; he was a Spaniard
and lived in Spain, and he came to the same house where
we was, and happened to pop in there just at the
celebration
of the nuptials, and who should my young
gentleman
,
his son, fall in love with but my lady, she as fair as a
lily and he as dingy as a Creole. How the divil she
could fancy such an Indian of a fellow doesn't signify
the Lord forgive me! And so they gets married, and I
used to carry letters and messages backwards and
forwards
between themI thought then what it would come
to. But for all my lady married him to plaise her
mother
and her jesuite looking husband, I shall niver think
she loved him, to her dying day: but this cursed
goold
will do any thing.
But how came she in this country?
Well, I'm going to tell you. This great man, the
young man's father that married my lady, was a
Spaniard
,
as I could have tould you before, and his wife was a
kin to the Viceroy in this city, and so this Viceroy
writes to my master's father to send his son over here,
and promised him oceans of goold, but what signifies all
their goold whin they're nothing but a parcel of brute
bastes after all, with their Inquisition, and all their
cursed
doings, burning paiple alive, God forgive me! many's
the time I've wondered that the earth don't open and
swallow them up.
And so you and your lady come here after her
marriege
?
said I, wishing to confine Dennis to the thread
of his story.
No indeed! my lady would do no sich a thing, for
she stood to it, to the bitter end, that she would never
laive her mother, poor woman! I shall never forget it,
her mother died, and so she didn't care where she went
to, and set sail with her husband, my present master, for
this city.
And your present mistresswas she born in
Portugal
or in this city?
I'm going to tell youshe was born here. And a
fine boy, the very spirit of his mother, died crossing the
ocean. Ah! that was a sight, to see my lady when the
dear little craiture was a dying. And so he died and my
lady had the corse brought here and buried in the garden
where she was buried herselfrest her sowl! She died
on michaelmas day, in the morning, and laid her Irish
bones in this country; and never will I forget the
charge she gave me about her child.
And you accompanied your mistress to this
inhospitable
country?
Indeed, and I did that very thing; I would have
followed her to the worlds end. We came very near it
anyway; for we had all lik'd to have been cast away on
the passage.
And would you not like to visit your native country
again?
Oh, maybe I wouldn't like to lay my bones there
and my lady has a warm liking to Ireland, too; but
laive her I never willshe would break her heart. The
very last word her mother spake (I was sitting by her
bed-side) was, Dennis, while you live, never forsake
my child.
And how old was her child when she died?
Three years and nine months. She will be
seventeen
years old, come Easter Monday, next. But as I
was saying: my lady was never well. The first time
6
she set foot in this city I think she was crossed with love.
Many's the time she and I would talk about Ireland, and
the beautiful green meadows, and the birds, and the
jackdaws, and kape me up the live long night, telling
stories about ghosts, and spirits, and fairies, and all
them there things. `Ah! Dennis,' she would say to me,
`how much happier would I have been with Sir William
O'Nale, in Ireland. You remember him, Dennis?' says
she. And why shouldn't I, says I, when many's the
copper he gave me to buy ginger-bread? When you would
take me to walk with you in the grove, who should we
pop on but sir William? and you would say `Not a
word, Dennis!'
Faith, I was no fool; I was no tell-tale. Poor Sir
William! never shall I forget how he looked whin my
lady and he parted. I could a tould the reason, but I'd
a cut my tongue out first. Manny a sly notion I've had,
that her mother took her away for fear she would marry
Sir William; and I shall ever think she loved him to her
dying day. But I wouldn't be after telling tales out of
school.
And has your young lady always lived here?
Why sure, no; she lived herebut thin she wint
abroad to git her
edication;
and her father payed great
respect to her mother; and promised to tache her all the
languages, and to let me go with her wherever she wint;
and so I wint with her to London, and Paris, and Spain,
and Lord knows where, besides. We was gone three
years, and thin she brought two of thim gloomy sort of
heathens with her over here, to larn her music and other
things. Why, I'd as as lief see her with the divil as to
see her with those masters of hers. A body's afear'd to
spake, where they are, the cursed cut throats! lookin
for all the world like the inquisition; and I don't think
my lady likes a bone in their skin. How should she?
Dennis paused for the first timewilling to protract
his visit as long as possible, I enquired if he had ever been
married himself.
Lord love your sowl! d'ye think I would go for to
marry one of them savage paple, and to mix my blood
with such heathens? No, and I hope my lady will niver
marry, while she lives; without she marrys somebody
that's more like a christian human, giving me a
significant
look at the same time. He sighed deeply as he
rose to depart, and bidding me good night, proceeded to
lock and unlock the ponderous doors of my dungeon.
I pass over the intervening time, which was spent in
reading, in the hearing of Wilson, that he might receive
the same amusement that I enjoyed myself.
Next morning Dennis came earlier than usual, and
brought with him the necessary implements for shaving;
also a warm and comfortable breakfast, which was sent,
as he informed me, from his lady's own table. After
having shaved and breakfasted, Dennis removed my
bed, (which was nothing more nor less than a bundle of
hay,) and replaced it with a quantity of fresh grass,
which had been cured in the sun for the purpose. This
was to me a delightful improvement; the hay being
intermingled
with flowers of most exquisite odour, a bed
of down would not have been half so acceptable.
After expressing my thanks, to Dennis, for his
kindness
on the occasion, he replied, that what he had done,
was in obedience to his master's orders; and that the
same had been ordered for Wilson.
Dennis remained some time, and continued to amuse
me with his lively conversation; but at length, took his
leave. Whilst he was unfastening the door of my
dungeon
,
I enquired of him, whether I was to have a visit
from his mistress that day. He replied, that she dared
not venture to see me until midnight, when every one
was asleep; that if it were known, it would go near to
affect her lifeor in words to that amount. Sure you
wouldn't like to hear that; but harm shall never come
on her, while Dennis has blood in his veins. I'll see
my lady safe, I warrant ye: let me alone for that.
After he left me, I threw myself on the bed of hay,
with better feelings than I had enjoyed since my
imprisonment
;
and had it not been for the deplorable condition
to which my sister would be reduced, I should have
resigned
myself to my fate without a murmur, let that be
what it might. But she haunted all my waking hours;
but complaint was useless, and indeed I went so far as to
indulge in some pleasantries, for the sole purpose of
cheering Wilson, whose distress was even greater than
my own. I would, however, often beguile him of
laughter
while reading Sterne's Tristram Shandy: particularly
that part of it where Doctor Slop was defeated in his
efforts
to untie the bagand my uncle Toby's reply to
Slop, after the tedious oath against Obadiah.
But I pass over the various occurrences of the day,
and that part of the night preceding the arrival of Donna
Leanora.
Between eleven and twelve o'clock at night, I heard
the rattling of keys and the shrieking of hinges; my heart
at the moment beat as though it would fly out of my body,
and before I could collect my thoughts sufficiently to meet
the occasion, Dennis entered my dungeon, followed by
two females covered by long black veils. I made shift
to get on my feet, and saluted them with all the respect I
could commandaddressing myself to the principal,
who was pointed out to me by Dennis, as he officiously
whispered, now all the world over did you ever see
her match. I told her I was informed by Dennis of
of this honour, and that words were a poor channel to
convey the high sense I entertained of her humanity;
that she had laid me under eternal obligations, for the
interest she had taken in my distressBut ceremony,
madam, said I, in such a place as this would be
misplaced
,
and unseasonable, and particularly to one whose
noble actions are their own reward. As I expressed
myself thus, I invited her and her attendant to take a
seat on the hay, which she accepted without the least
hesitation, while I stretched myself at their feet. Dennis
having set something which he carried under his arm in
one corner of the dungeon, likewise seated himself flat
on the floor. Leanora looked round and seemed to
shrink instinctively; the deep gloom of these dreadful
dungeons, some fathoms under ground, damp and dismal,
would appal the stoutest heart; and yet this female, led
by the goodness of her heart, regardless of the
consequences
,
had dared to visit me in this place at the dead
hour of the night, to minister comfort, and assuage my
sufferings, when my limbs were lacerated with the chains,
and death in all its horrors threatened my existence.
Leanora was, indeed, beautiful; but the surrounding
objects formed such a striking contrast to her person,
that I would suppose she never appeared to more
advantage
.She
was tall, slender and elegantly formed: her
features (as near as I could distinguish through her vail)
were regularher face of an oval cast, which was
diffused
with a deep crimson blushher complexion was
dark, her hair and eyes were jet black, but there was
still something in her countenance that I am unable to
describeit was something not earthly, and unlike any
thing I had ever seen before. She was dressed in black,
which was embroidered with goldher veil was of the
same costly materials: in short, both exceeded any thing
I had ever seen of the sort for richness and beauty. She
expressed herself in terms of undisguised frankness, and
deplored the rigidness of the government, which she said,
knew no mercy nor set bounds to cruelty, and added that
no language could express the sorrow she felt for me
whilst I was sick, and never ceased to intercede with
her father till the rigour of my treatment was mitigated.
I told her I had neither father nor mother to lament
after me, but I had a sister. I was unable to add
another word for some time, when I proceededthat
will be left poor and friendless should my captivity
affect
my life, of which I am under some apprehension;
here she eagerly interrupted me and said my life was
safethat no design of that nature was meant by the
government, but that frequent depredations being
committed
by your people of late, and no proof hitherto
could be obtained of the facts, you are detained in
custody
to convince your government (who had always
disclaimed
it) of the truth of those charges: at least, I have
been so informed by my fatherwho informed me that
a messenger has been dispatched to your government
with an account of your intrusion and capture.
Finding
myself arraigned as a criminal by my fair friend, I
summoned my resolution to reply; the justness of the
charge and the eloquence with which it had been made,
required a prompt and definite replication. I declared
to her my innocence, and that, let the object of my
superiors
be what it might, I was totally ignorant of it
until
6*
about the time I was made prisoner, and that a
disinterested
friendship for a young man was the principal
cause of my misfortune, and that when we discovered the
object of our party we separated from them and
determined
to return to our own country, when we were
unfortunately
made prisoners by the Spaniards. This was really
and religiously true. You have a sister then, said she, I
feel for her, she must lament your loss, but I hope you
will soon be liberated, and epend upon me as a friend.
I shall continue to exert all the influence I have in favor
both of you and your friend. But I must remind you
that our people are cruel and vindictiveour laws are
rigid and enforced without mercymeantime I shall
continue to send you some nourishment daily, though I
am in great terror lest it might be discoveredyou
might lose your trusty Dennis, and bad will be your
case then indeed. On my father's account you have
nothing to fear, but should it come to the ears of
government
it would go hard even with him. He has had a
trial of the same nature heretofore, though it was before
my memory.My mother, it seems, persuaded him to
favor some unfortunate prisoner or criminal (I don't
recollect
which,) and he like to have paid dear for his
conduct
;
but so long as your life is reported to be in
danger
,
so long you may expect a continuation of your
present
treatment.Your friend I am told is likewise
unwell
my
father will send Dennis to see him to-morrow,
this he has orders to do lest you might die in prison and
involve them perhaps in a war. They will, however,
treat you with little kindness; they will do every thing
but take your life, and that they dare not do. Finding
she paused, I begged of her to intreat her father to let
us have more air, as it was indispensable to our health.
She answered that she would, and after exchanging a
few more remarks she withdrew, saying she would call
on Wilson the next night. To make any comments on
the conduct of this magnanimous female would be
superfluous
,
led by humanity alone to venture in the dead of
night into a loathsome prison to visit a stranger who
was represented as an enemy to her country, is perhaps
without a parallel.
After her departure, I communicated the substance of
our interview to Wilson, the most of which, however,
he overheard, and having read some time was in the act
of preparing for sleep, when I discovered the bundle I
had seen Dennis lay in the corner of my cell. It proved
to be a change of clean linen and other clothes which
delicacy no doubt forbid Leanora to mention. Next
morning Dennis came as usual, and informed me that he
had orders from his master to visit Wilson also, take
him clean clothes and shave him, and that he had orders
to throw all the doors open except the iron grates. My
astonishment was never more excited than when the light
burst down upon me from an immense distance, almost
over my head!
CHAPTER VII.
Thus
we continued with little alteration in our
treatment
for three months, which appeared three hundred to
me! One afternoon, however, I heard the door open,
and thinking it was Dennis, I turned to look at him,
when I beheld not Dennis, but two men whom I had
never seen before with no very favourable indications to
judge from their looks. They appeared, however, to be
people of distinction, and speaking to me in the Spanish
language, enquired who brought me the books or how I
acquired them: but I made them no answer, although I
understood them perfectly, having learned a little of the
language from Dennis and from books which were sent
to me by his mistress. They stayed but a few minutes,
and in the course of an hour, by which time it was nearly
dark, four other men came in armed. These brought
with them a heavy plank, and laying me forcibly on my
back, chained me fast to the plank so that I could move
neither hand nor foot. In order to ascertain whether
or not I was to be starved to death, I pointed to some
food and desired something to eat; but whether they
understood
me or not is immaterial, for they gave me none.
These savages not satisfied with this act of cruelty shut
all the doors and retired.
Next morning, about ten o'clock, a fierce looking
Spaniard came to me and fed me (or attempted to do so)
with a spoon, but I refused to swallow the wretched stuff,
which was a mixture of red pepper and fat of some
description
!
He gave me a few spoonfuls of water and
then retired. Wilson had likewise been visited by the
same men who first visited me, but though they had shut
him up in darkness and changed his food to bread and
water, he was still unchained. I suggested, however,
the possibility of his suffering a similar fate, as these
barbarians seemed to delight in cruelty. His liberty,
however, gave me some consolation, although I was
myself
dying of hunger and thirst. I charged him to guard
with the strictest care our place of communication in the
wall, lest a discovery might subject us to still worse
treatment, if worse could be. My cruel keeper
appeared
no more that day, and I suffered beyond
description
both for food and water. Next morning he brought
me the same fare he had done the preceding day and
some water, which last I desired him by signs to give
me in the first place, but the monster gave me but a few
spoonsful before he left off and proceeded to feed me with
the nauseous stuff already mentioned, which hunger had
converted into palatable food. Thus was I used by these
detestable cold blooded Spaniards, with little abatement
for three months. But I shrink from the task (even at
this distance of time) to recapitulate such unheard of
cruelty; how nature sustained such immeasurable
calamities
is incredible. In the meantime, I was again
attacked
with a fever, which was attended with such
dangerous
symptons that the tyrants unbound me: of this,
however, I had not the least recollection, being as
formerly
deprived of my reason.
Upon recovering my senses, the first thing I saw was
Dennis and a tall figure dressed in a black gown, which
I took to be a priest; he was in the act of addressing
something to the Dl no doubt, as God could have
nothing
to do with such a religion as their's. Our
Holy
Religion
was all that I could understand. As respects the
sanctity of his religion, I leave the world to judge. He
was standing over me with his hands spread out, while
Dennis, the good old man, was anointing the wounds
inflicted
on my arms and legs by the chains. After
muttering
something which I did not understand, the priest
withdrew. Ah! said Dennis, it is a netarnel
shame to sarve a christian like a brute-baste, they would
no more do sich a thing at home thin they would make
me king of InglandOh, the
jezziuites
for to go for to
massacre a body alive and to cut the flesh off the bones,
they are nothing but a parcel of hathens that ought to
be
extreminated
off of the face of the earth. I think
as you do, said I, Dennis, how do you do my friend?
And is it you that's spaking, and I'm glad to hear
that, why lord love your sowl and honour, you have been
a dying these two months, and starved to death and
raving
and not able to howld up your head and famished.
I interrupted him to enquire about his mistress and
Wilson
,
and how I came to be unboundOch! my-stars,
if you had seen my lady how she was distracted all the
time. She says she won't live in a country that the divil
himself would-nt live in, and sure it was I that
arged
her on. I tould her about the green meadows and the
fares and the beautiful locks and growves in Ireland,
and says I to her, if you was to see that country my lady,
you would never live in this here savage land.
Welcome as was the appearance of Dennis and the
sound of his voice, yet his tedious manner of coming to
the point was provoking, and bringing him back to the
question, he immediately mounted his hobby again.
The man that kept the prison came to our house one
day, and so I ups and axes how you wasSays he to me,
my trouble will soon be overWhy the lord presarve
me, says I, the man aint agoin to dieI hope so, said
he, it will be better for him to be out of his misery at
onceHoly Virgin, says I, and my measter ought to
know that. And it is to your kindness I owe my
life, said I Stop till I tell you; where is the lint?
I'me sure I had it just now, said Dennis, engaged in
binding up my sores, seemingly unmindful of what he
was going to say. Och, there was the terriblest rout
ever you see; my master was had up before the Audinus,
and had like to a bin sint across the ocean to Spain, and
thin there was my lady a breaking her heart, and could'nt
ate for grafe itself. Och! there was the terriblest
hubbleshoo
ever you heared in your born days. The first of
my knowin, here comes a parcel of great he fellows with
pistols and cutlasses and drags my master out of his
house, and my lady a hangin to him and scraming and
begin for to go with him. Calling to me, Dennis, where
are you, said she, and there was I between hawk and
buzzard, and so behold ye, to make short of a long story,
in the very
hithe
of the fray here comes orders from the
Spanish Consul in the States, not to lay the weight of
their finger on ye or they would be made to smoke for it;
and so my lads was obliged to come too. But do take a
drop of this wine, it 'ill help to strengthen you and hale
your inside. My outside I think is in more need of
healing, said I.
And you may well say that, for you was fairly
rotten
,
matchless alive! if you had a
knowed
what a pickle
you was in when I took you in hand, and my lady come
to see you, and
nointed
your sores with balsam, and put
lint on them and helped me to wash them, that's a lady
for youcatch them divils a doin sich thing, no they'd
rather cut your throat.And if you had seen how cast
down she was, `Dennis,' says she, `save his life, if he
dies I shall never know a happy hour.'
But for the love of God never let-on that I tould you
a word, for she would be displased with me if she knew
that. Plase fortune but I wish you were out of this
cursed place, and if it should turn out as they say, that you
are a great man and you and my mistress shouldWell, it
doesn't signify talkingbut after all, sich things has
happened, and I should be rejoicedfor thin we could
lave this country, and I might stand a chance to see my
native land once more. But this is all between ourselves:
if it wasn't for my lady I wouldn't care a
haperth
to lave
it to night.
But you havn't told me a word about Wilson yet,
Dennis, is he well?
Aye, you may well ask that whin he's bin in a dale of
trouble about you, and has bin sick too, but he's well
now, because I wint to see him every day, and carry him
victuals, since the orders I bin telling you about, come.
The orders said how one Bonnypart was married to his
cousin, and that he would make war upon the country,
and pull an old house over their heads, and play hob, and
be the ruination of us all. And I tould my lady that
you was attached to the young manor maybe I should
a said he was attached to you: but I declare you look like
a shadowdo ate something.
Well, proceed Dennis, said I.
Well, I tould my lady that you were sworn friends,
and I'll be bound, says I, if the young man gets out
of prison by the help of this Bonnyface, (or whatever his
name is) he'll never laive his friend in the lurchif he
did, he ought to be hanged
The poor sowl grieved sore enough about you, and
said the whole States would be upon them and take away
their countryLord sind how soon!
Being somewhat gratified to learn that Government
had interfered in our favour, I enquired of Dennis what
figure that was standing over me when he came in.
Love your sowl, it was father Antonio; my lady
tould him about you, and that you was a dying, and
begged
him to come and see you. She wouldn't for the
world, that you should die without a praist, and so he
came.
I thank your lady, Dennis, but I have no faith in
these priests.
My lady wouldn't like to hear that, thin, for she
thinks the world and all of father Antonio.
Not willing to enter into an argument with this
warmhearted
Irishman, upon the subject of a religion which
held its votaries in such abominable ignorance,
converting
the most sublime truths into the most palpable
falsehoods
,I
enquired what had become of my cruel
keeper.
Oh, the divil may care what is become of him! not
to give you an ill answerI dont know, but my lady and
my master will be rejoiced to hear that you are getting
over it, and your honour had better be shaved and put on
some clane clothes and smart up a little. And my lady
will be here too, for she niver missed a day since I had
the management of matters.
Finding myself too feeble to converse, I told Dennis
I would try to sleep a little, and to come in the course
of an hour or so, when I would try to be shaved and
dressed. After he left me I called Wilson, several
times, but received no answer: and thinking that
perhaps
he was asleep, I gave myself no uneasiness, and
fell into a sweet slumber.
In the course of an hour Dennis returned, and
several
other men with him. Perceiving from the smile in
Dennis' countenance, that something had occurred in my
favour. I felt no apprehension on the appearance of the
strangers.
Plaise fortune, said Dennis, you may be lifted
up
[2]
[2]
Lifted up, is an Irish phrase, indicating joy.
now, this is the gentleman, said Dennis to the
men, you'll have to take him aisy, for he's as sore as
a piece of beef.
Dennis, assisted by the others, took hold of me in the
tenderest manner, and carrying me out of the dungeon,
placed me on a carriage, or rather a bier, and conveyed
me into a clean comfortable apartment, where, to my
great surprise, I found Wilson.
We were soon left to ourselves and mutual
congratulations
followed. Our raptures were such, upon this
sudden and unlooked for change in our treatment, that
our recent calamity appeared to be a dream. Wilson,
though emaciated, and much wounded by the chains with
which he had been loaded, was not in so deplorable a
condition as myself. It plainly appeared that the same
vindictiveness had not been extended to him which had
to me: from what reason, neither of us, from that day
to this have been able to discover, unless it was the
overwinning
kindness of the Intendants daughter in
combining
with Dennis to suppress the news of my recovery,
after my first illness.
Our prison, for we still were in one, was lighted with
windows, and furnished with beds, chairs, tables, and
looking-glasses. In short, we lacked nothing but our
liberty to make us happy. In a short time two servants
entered with wine and other suitable refreshments,
followed
by Dennis with clean clothes, water for washing,
and razors for shaving. After partaking, together, of
the good things that were brought to us, we underwent
a thorough cleansing; and with the assistance of Dennis
got off our beards, which were full four inches in length:
being informed by Dennis that his master, the
Intendant
,
was to pay us a visit that evening. After putting our
room in order, he and the other servants withdrew.
In the meantime Wilson related to me the particulars
which had occurred during my last sickness, and the
occasional
incidents connected with itas follows:
7
On the day that you were so barbarously chained
down to the floor of your dungeon, the same merciless
crew visited me; they stormed at me, in their language,
so loud that I was stunned by the noise. They seized
the lamp, which was burning at the time, blew it out,
and chaining me to the ring in the wall, left me hardly
room enough to stir. They then left me, sending
nothing
but bread and water ever since. But my
distress
on my own account was nothing, compared to that
which I felt on yours. I continued to console and amuse
you until you became insensible to every thing.
In the evening we were visited by the Intendant, who
was a tall, slim, straight figure, between forty and fifty
years of age, of a very dark complexion, his face oval,
his visage thin, his eyes small and black, his countenance
mild and pleasing, though he saluted us rather stiffly.
He addressed us in the English language and enquired
after our health. Supposing that he had a share in the
mitigation of our punishment, we, (at least I did) strove
to suppress the heartfelt grudge which rankled in our
bosomsit would have been dangerous to vent our
displeasure
at proceedings, over which this man, perhaps,
had no controul.
We replied to his enquiries in terms of politeness: and
he on his part lamented that it fell to his lot to augment
our misfortunes, but hoped they would soon be at an
end. The first opportunity that offered, I enquired
whether he had heard any thing, lately, from Spain
or the United States, respecting our captivity? He
replied.
That he had seen a letter from the Consul resident
of his Catholic Majesty, stating expressly, that we must
be detained in custody until further orders; but must be
treated with mildness, and debarred from nothing to
render
our situation comfortablethat it was in consequence
of this mandate that we had been removed to our present
place of confinement, and that it was the first and the
only official instructions they had received.
I asked him if he was aware of the cause which
gave rise to the inhuman treatment I received after my
first illness? but he appeared (and no doubt was)
ignorant
of the cause. He said the orders came exclusively
from the audiance, that he himself narrowly escaped
disgrace for conniving at the mitigation extended to us
in our confinement. though he was totally ignorant of
the particular circumstance which gave offence.
He had he said, represented to the audiance that
one of the prisoners was sick, and perhaps dangerously
so. I was then ordered to take off your chains and send
some one, who understood your language, to attend you
until you recovered. I therefore sent a domestic of my
own, upon whose fidelity I knew I could depend. And
whatever it was that gave offence to the officers of the
Government in your case, must have been done by this
man, for I went no further than simply to comply with
my orders.
Wilson asked to be furnished with pen, ink, and
paper
,
and for leave to write to his friends. To this the
Intendant replied,
That he had no orders either to permit or restrict
us from writing: but was charged to suffer no
communication
between us and any person whatever, without
leave from the Viceroy. But, said he, you can
write what you wish, provided you allow me to submit
the substance to the audiance.
Upon enquiry respecting the time we might expect an
answer, should we despatch a letter that week, he
informed
us it would be three months, at least. After some
desultary conversation he took his leave, assuring
us that every attention would be paid to our ease and
comfort.
Wilson and I were surprised at the silence and
neglect
of our friends, though doubtless it was through them
that our imprisonment had been softened. For myself,
I had no friends to interfere, but I flattered myself that
Wilson's father would undoubtedly hear of his son's
captivity
,
and hazard every thing to relieve him. While
we were indulging in vain conjectures on this
unaccountable
conduct of our friends, the door opened and Captain
T. stood before us!!
CHAPTER VIII.
When we reflect on the distance from Tennessee to the
city of Mexico, the circumstances under which our
companions
set out on their return, their ignorance of the
country through which they passed, the deep rivers, and
a thousand other obstacles, it requires a considerable
effort
of the human mind to account for the sudden
appearance
of Captain T. at Mexico.
It may naturally be supposed his presence inspired us
with new life, nothing could equal the transports of the
meetinga restoration to our friends and country could
not have been more welcome for the moment. He was
accompanied by the Intendant, (who, it appears, was
afraid to trust us together unless in his presence) and
likewise
a strong guard, which stood at the door. But so
great was our joy that we were insensible of every
other
object.
Captain T. had a letter from Wilson's father,
inclosing
one thousand dollars, which he asked permission to
deliver, but this master-jailor observed,
That his instructions went to prohibit any
correspondence
between the prisoners and other individuals,
without leave from his superiors; but he would take the
first opportunity of submitting the case to them. He
would go, probably, that evening, and we should know
the result early the ensuing day.
After a few moments conversation with our friend, he
and the Intendant departedthe latter assuring Wilson
that he would not fail to perform his promise respecting
the letter. Our misfortunes now wore a brighter face,
and we spent the evening and most of the night with
feelings to which we had long been a stranger; though
the image of my sister, (in spite of my attempts to be
happy) was always present to my mind. And the less
I suffered on my own account the more I felt on hers.
Wilson was suffering the same tortures, perhaps worse,
on the same account.
Dennis having provided us with a chess-board, we
amused ourselves most of the time at chess; which, in
some degree, helped to beguile the time. We had often
played in happier times, but the pleasure it afforded us
now was embittered by recalling past scenes to our
minds.
Thus we passed the succeeding day without seeing or
hearing from our friend or the Intendant. Dennis, who
brought us our meals, could give us no information
respecting
them, and we began to be seriously alarmed for
the safety of Captain T. We still flattered ourselves
that we should certainly see him before bed time. It
was now dark, our supper came, ten o'clock camebut
the Intendant and Captain T. came not! Ascribing the
delay to some accident, we sat until long after midnight,
musing in silence most of the time, at one time fancying
that evil had befallen Captain T., and at another
buoyed
up with the hope that morning would come and clear
up the mystery.
Morning at length came, but long ere it dawned
Captain
T. was far beyond the reach of the swiftest horse in
Mexico!Dennis appeared with our breakfast rather
earlier than common. I saw by his countenance at the
first glance that something was the matter.
Here, read this, quick: said Dennis.
I snatched it out of his hand and read as follows:
Dearest Friends
.I leave you suddenly: I shall be
apprehended
if I stay longer: an angel here will tell you
allbe comforted; I will effect your ransom, at every
hazard: I am gone: I have no fear of being taken if I
can only mount my horse
[3]
[3]
The Mexicans have been called Spaniards throughout the work, to distinguish them
from the variety of other descriptions of people inhabiting Mexico.
.
To our enquiries respecting the flight of Captain T.
Dennis replied that his mistress understanding that
officers
were sent by the Viceroy's order to apprehend
him, she gave him notice of his danger, and he
immediately
disappeared.
My lady will come to see you about midnight, and
tell you all about it, and she has letters and thingsBut
I wouldn't stand talkin'give me that paper back again,
I must take it to my lady, she charged me strictly, to
7*
fetch it back to her, as it would be a dale of harm to her
and you too, if it was found outand says she to me,
bring it back, Dennis, we'll make sure work of it.
There was much foresight and wisdom in this
suggestion
,
and I returned him the paper, (it was written
apparently in haste, with a pencil.) I was exceedingly
hurt at this unexpected departure of Captain T.
having
fully determined to write by him to my sister. The
opportunity was now lost forever, nor were we without
fears that he might not escape.But Leanora is to visit
us at midnight.
Midnight, however, though slow was sure, and with
it came Leanora. She was preceded by the faithful
Dennis
,
who cautiously blinded the windows to prevent
discovery
.
Unembarrassed and modest, Leonora entered,
attended by her virtues only: she saluted us with much
seeming concern, and enquired with much tenderness
after
our health. She then drew from her bosom a paper,
which she handed to Wilson, and seated herself between
us. The paper contained the letter with the money sent
to Wilson by his father, and was itself a manuscript of
some length. Wilson opened the letter eagerly and read
as follows:
Dear Henry
.You will receive this by Captain T.,
who has undertaken to visit you and learn your true
situation
.
Your captivity has afflicted us with the deepest
sorrow; your mother is unconsolable and refuses to be
comforted. Our Government is negociating your
ransom
,
which is attended with much difficulty; but I
expect
it will soon be brought about: if them Spanish dogs
don't cut your throat or something worse, you will
receive
one thousand dollars. If that will set you at
liberty
I shall think it well laid out. I am in too much
trouble to say more.
Your Affectionate Father,
T. WILSON.
The other letter being too long to read for the present,
we postponed it to hear what news Leanora had to
relate
respecting the flight of Captain T., when she
related
the following particulars:
You will recollect, said she, that my father
promised
to see the Vice Roy and ask his permission for your
friend to deliver the letter; he promised you he would
go that evening and accordingly he went, but was unable
to get an audiance that evening. After his return he
came into my parlour, as he always does when he
concludes
the business of the day. Whilst he was talking
in a careless manner, and growing sleepy he yawned and
observed,
I am afraid we are to be troubled with another
prisoner
.
I enquired who, where and how?
He then related the circumstance of your friend's visit,
and said from what he could understand, he would not
be allowed to depart the country.
This was the first I had heard of his arrival. I said
very little then, but determined within myself to effect
his escape if possible, if he was not already in custody.
Accordingly when my father retired, I sent for Dennis
to know where the young man was, but Dennis could
give me no information; he had seen him, or at least a
man that he took to be him, walking with his master
late in the evening, but that was all he knew of the
matter
.
I was seriously alarmed, expecting it was over
with him perhaps by that time. I sent Dennis, out,
however, to see if he could make any discovery, but to
no purpose. Yesterday about ten o'clock he came to our
house, and Dennis who was standing centry on the
outside
of the gate, knew him immediately and brought him
privately to me, when I apprized him of his danger.
He said if he was once on his horse they might catch
him if they could.
But I advised him not to leave the city till dark; but
how to conceal him was the question, as every house
would be searched, and finally sending my woman abroad
on some pretence, I desired Dennis to conduct him to my
chamber where he locked the door and gave me the key.
Had he not taken shelter the moment he did, he must
have fallen into the hands of his enemies, as they came
to the house a few minutes afterwards in company with
my father, who had just returned from the Vice Roy.
My father after making enquiry of the servants
whether
they had seen the stranger (which of course they had
not) desired the guard to wait at the gate and apprehend
him as he came in, as he was expected shortly, to hear
the result of his petition respecting the letter. They
watched there the whole day, and another party way-laid
the prison expecting he would attempt to see you.
Dennis
and I had a difficult part to act, and though the odds
were against us we determined to effect his escape if
possible. The first thing to be done was to ascertain
from the stranger where his horse (upon which he
seemed
to stake his safety) was to be found. This by his
direction
was done in the course of the day by Dennis.
The stranger continued in my chamber till dark and then
withdrew privately to his horse, which Dennis had
prepared
for him. On taking leave of me he handed me
the papers and begged me to convey them to you, adding
that if he could get but half an hour the start of his
enemies
he defied them, as his horse was the fleetest of his
kind.
My father was much concerned at his disappearance,
and took an active part in the pursuit which was
immediately
set on foot. Lights were procured and diligent
search was made throughout the city to discover the way
he had taken. The whole city was alarmed and patrols
dispatched after him in all directions, these have
returned
without making any discovery, and I hope he is out of
danger.
Incomprehensible lady, said Wilson, how much
do we owe you: can we ever requite kindness like yours?
We united in expressions of gratitude and admiration,
but generosity like hers sets language at defiance.
When we forget you, madam, said I, may heaven
forget us.
She said he took the road to Vera Cruz, at which
place he informed her a vessel waited for him, the same
which brought him from the United States.
After her departure we looked at the manuscript, and
eagerly perused the following narrative:
We, your unfortunate companions, were seriously
afflicted at your sudden disappearance on the day of our
separation in . At one time we thought you were
lost in the forest, and again that you had abandoned us
with design, and some there were amongst us that
suggested
the truth as we afterwards discovered. The
circumstance
gave us infinite pain, and myself not the least:
when morning appeared, you came not. We came to an
immediate resolution to go in search of you in a body,
thinking it imprudent to separate. Accordingly we
traversed
the forest that day without making any discovery,
till about sundown, when we came upon the trace of
horses
.
We took the back track and proceeded but a short
distance before we discovered the place where you were
apprehended. This was confirmed by a pistol found
at the place, and pieces of cord fresh cut with a knife;
the pistol we knew belonged to the horsemen whoever
they were, being different from any in our possession.
The trampled appearance of the ground, all taken
together
left little doubt of your captivity.
We turned about with all haste, and taking the trace
of the horses pursued it till dark, when we could no
longer discern the trace, we stopped for the night,
resolving
to renew the pursuit in the morning at all hazards,
breaking our fast for the first time that day upon the
fruit that spontaneously grew near our encampment and
quenching our thirst from a small rivulet of bad tasted
water at the same place. We set forward by the dawn
of day and continued to pursue the trace of the horses
till noon, when it brought us to a small villageat this
place we learned your fate from the inhabitants, who
were principally Indians. No language could depict our
sorrow at this intelligence, the truth of which we had
too much reason to believe.
We now held a counsel, in which it was unanimously
agreed to abide by the opinion of the majoritythe
result
was that we should procure what provisions the
village
afforded either by force or fair means, return home
with all possible despatch, and exert every means in our
power to procure your ransom. We found no difficulty
in procuring as much provision as each man was able to
carry, consisting of Indian corn and yams; we laid
down the money which the inhabitants did not refuse,
and set out for home. The Indians at the village
informed
us (in the course of our short interview) that a
large body of Spaniards were in the woods in search of
us. This intelligence was sufficient of itself to quicken
our march.
We travelled that day, the succeeding night, the next
day and half the ensuing night without sleep, expecting
momentarily to be overtaken by the Spaniards. Being
unable to support the want of sleep any longer, we lay
down about midnight. I had but stretched myself on
the ground when I heard the trampling of horses, and
(as I thought) men talking; as the noise was only heard
by myself, I ascribed it to a disturbed mind, but a few
moments proved it to be no phantom, the trampling and
voices being distinctly heard by the whole party.
Convinced
that it was reality, I desired every man to make
readythe sound was not immediately in our rearit
appeared to be on our rightthe night was dark, the
sky being overcast with clouds, and lest our fire might
betray us, we sprung to our feet and moved obliquely a
few hundred yards lest they might stumble immediately
upon us. We moved with the utmost silence and fell on
their rear: the noise soon died away and laying down
we slept sound till morning.
We had intended to rest that day and parch corn for
our journey, but the occurrence of the night induced us
to change our resolution, and we pursued our journey
sufficing our hunger with fruit which we plucked as we
walked alongwe charged our guns afresh and
determined
to oppose force by force and fight to the last man,
should we be attacked.
It was not long before our courage was put to the trial;
before ten o'clock we were overtaken by about two
hundred
Spaniards on horseback, armed principally with
swords and pistols. It is evident from the sequel that
these fellows knew nothing of our mode of fighting, or
they never would have approached us in the manner they
did. They were mounted on mules, and rode up to us at
a round trot, calling out as they approached (in their
language, to surrender, but we made them no answer
except
by a volley discharged from our rifles when they
were within shot. I called to my men to take good aim
and every one kill his man: no sooner said than done.
and down fell most of the Spaniards,
[4]
[4]
The Sober Irishman, a horse well known
the rest fled
without
firing a shot and even without looking behind them.
We charged our rifles and pursued our journey.
In the course of the day we came upon a few
scattering
huts inhabited by Indians; here we halted and
parched
our corn enough to last us to New-Orleans, to which
place we bent our course. We were not so confident of
our valour as to neglect setting guard whenever we
stopped
,
to prevent surprise. At this place we procured
some Buffalo flesh and other refreshments, afraid to use
our ammunition for the purpose of providing food. We
felt grateful to these Indians who treated us with great
kindness and hospitality, and had it not been that the
Spaniards might return with a superior force, we should
have remained here some time to recruit our strength
and spirits, but the idea of subjecting ourselves to the
necessity of another engagement, influenced us to
continue
our journey.
These Indians had informed us that there was a great
river just before us, (the same that terrified us on our
journey to) and gave us information that by going up
the river we would come to other Indians who would
furnish
us with canoes and aid us in crossing it; they also
gave us general directions, which in the end proved very
convenient. These were the mildest and most friendly
Indians I ever met with, and had it not been for fear of
the Spaniards they would have conducted us on our way.
In the course of a few hours we arrived at the river,
and pursuing their directions we reached the Indians,
crossed the river and continued our course for
New-Orleans
without further interruption from the
Spaniards
.
But to recount to you the hardships we endured
from hunger, thirst, fatigue and sickness, would surpass
the ordinary power of language. We travelled for days
through endless prairies, parched with the sun, and
without a drop of water; at another time we would be
immersed in swamps up to our middles and almost every
man sick. We could have killed enough to satisfy the
cravings of hunger, but our whole cry was water, being
parched up with fevers. Had you seen us seated on the
banks of a prodigious river, while one of us was feebly
wielding the axe, for the purpose of constructing a raft,
with scarcely strength enough to raise the weight of it.
Had you seen us scattered over those boundless forests,
some supported by others, as they feebly walked on in
search of water, all eloquent with grief at our
disappointment
,
you would have congratulated yourselves
upon your not unhappier fate. It is wonderful how we
surmounted such a complication of calamities. Perhaps
human fortitude never sustained greater. Seven of our
number found relief in death. Poor Murray, Herbert,
and  fell victims to the scene of misery I have
described
.
We scraped a little earth over them, each
envying their happier lot
As soon as we arrived in Tennessee, I hastened to
apprize
Captain Wilson of your situation, advising him to
apply to our government immediately to obtain your
ransom
;
nor did I leave him till I saw a messenger
dispatched
to Washington for the purpose. But the old
gentlemen, to say nothing of Mrs. Wilson, would not
rest until I consented to visit Mexico to ascertain
your real situation. No one would undertake the
dangerous
task but myselfHoward did once agree to come,
by whom I intended to have sent this, but when it came
to the test his courage failed him. I expect to remain
here until you are liberated.
T.
The last sentence was written in italics, and it was
doubtless his intention.
Not to be tedious, it was two full years after this
before
we heard from our country or friends. At the end
of that time, a complete ransom was received for Wilson.
None for me! We were thunderstruck and stood in mute
astonishment; no letter, no cause assigned. It was as
easy to negotiate for two as one; but then I was poor
and friendlessWilson was not.
Never, never will I quit the country without you,
said Wilson, let come what will.
Go, said I, comfort your father and mother, I
have none to lament, abandoned as I am by heaven; I
am a wretch unworthy your regardthere is but one
object
in this worldhere utterance failed me.
Your sister, I know what you would say, said
Wilson.
Yes, had it pleased heaven to take her when it took
my parentsBut you will see her.
Urge me not. Until now we were bound in honour to
to our female friend here, or to her father (for her sake)
to attempt nothing that would endanger his safety.
As Wilson said this we heard footsteps approaching,
supposing it to be the officers coming to separate us,
perhaps
forever. Wilson had but a moment to say, I
will effect your liberty at the risk of my life, before I quit
the countryI am determined. The officers now
entered
the prison and asking Wilson if he was ready, he
gave me his hand in silence and withdrew.
8
CHAPTER IX.
The
day that succeeded Wilson's departure was to
me the most melancholy of any I had spent during my
captivity. I sat the whole day musing upon his last
words and revolved a thousand plans in my mind, as
favourable
to his designs, and as often rejected them as
futile
.
I could think of no plan he could fall on without
endangering his own safetyhe cannot force the doors
without assistance, and that he will not get, for these
Spaniards though cruel have a high sense of honour.
[5]
[5]
When they disarmed us they saw that we had money, but never presumed to touch
either that or our watches.
No alteration distinguished my treatment after Wilson
left me. I was attended in the same manner and
furnished
as heretofore.
I now lamented more than ever the absence of my
friend Dennis, of whose company we had been deprived
for several months; he had been superceded by another
keeperin fact, he never attended us regularly after we
regained our health, but generally called to see us once
or twice a week. We often enquired of our keeper what
had become of him but he could give us no information
on the subject. The Intendant had called a few times to
see us, but I never saw Leanora after the night on which
she brought us the papers.
On the fourth night after Wilson's release, about
midnight
my door began to rattle and shook frightfully and
finally flew open and Wilson entered in disguise:
follow
me, quick, said he. I flew after him as quick as
lightning, and in a few minutes we gained the street.
Wilson ran with great swiftness, so that it was with
difficulty
I kept up with him for about two hundred yards,
when we met with an obstacle which at once blasted all
our hopes. The patrole was going the rounds
immediately
before us and a light blazing near them; running
at the rate we did, we were almost upon them before we
made the discovery. We had no possibility of passing
them, and all the chance left us was to scale a high wall
to our left, which we attempted.
Wilson proved successful, but I was discovered and
seized just as I had gained the top of the wall. The patrole
calling in assistance, I was immediately bound and put
under guard until morning. I was questioned by these
people as to my name, country, and business; but
although
I understood them perfectly, (having learned the
language) I made them no answer.
In the morning it was discovered who I was, and the
whole city was in an uproar, the police officers were
enraged
,
I was carried before the audiance and
interrogated
respecting my escape out of prison. To their
questions
I made no answer. I was then put to the torture
to extort confession, and suffered as much as I ever
expect
to suffer this side of the grave, without betraying
my friend. I was now conveyed to my old dungeon,
which was dark and dismal enough.
Seneca says, a wise man stands upright under any
weight, but Seneca himself would have yielded to
anguish
like mine. I lay on a damp cold floor, bruised
and mangled, friendless, cheerless, and comfortless,
without light or sustenance, or even a drop of water!
All this, added to my fears for Wilson's safety
distraction
harrowed my soul! How welcome would death have
been to me at that moment! But I draw a veil over this
appalling picture, which even at this distance of time
chills my heart. I passed that and the succeeding day
without food or water.
At night I was visited by a man not quite so savage
looking as his fellow-tormentors, one whom I had never
seen before, he brought me some coarse bread and some
water, and setting it near where I lay, was going off
without saying a word.And can you leave me thus:
said I, addressing him in the Spanish language. You
are a man, can you not feel for the distress of a
fellowman
?
Finding him disposed to listen I appealed to his
sympathy
with all the eloquence I could summon to my aid.
I pulled out my watch and purse, here friend, said I,
take these, it is all my wealth. I have, no use for them,
you are welcome to them, and leave me the lamp. He
stood some time and viewed me in silence, and at length
replied that be could not, and was turning to go out.
Oh! said I, if you do nothing else, stay with me
awhile and cheer me with your company. He stopped,
and after musing some moments set the lamp down. I
offered him the watch, but he put it from him and
withdrew
.
I was now comparatively happy, for on looking round
my old apartment I discovered the books I received from
Leanora, also the ink, pens, and paper: and there stood
the bottle of oil too, in the very same place I left it two
years before! The books were covered with mould, and
were rotten, but the leaves were fresh and sound.
It may seem strange, but it is nevertheless true, that
time reconciles us to all things, and yet in the first
moments
of calamity nothing appears more impossible.
Seneca
and the new testament by turns contributed, in a
great measure, to reconcile me to my fate. Had it not
been for my fears on Wilson's account, I might have
spent my time tolerably, but my liberty and perhaps
my life depended upon his safety.
I continued in this dungeon about sixteen weeks
without
any alteration in my treatment, being visited once
every day by the same keeper, who was by no means
sociable
or disposed to conversation. In all this time I
never once heard or saw any thing of my friends,
Leanora
and Dennis. I was, for their sakes, afraid to make
any enquiries after them lest it might awaken suspicion.
At the end of this time, as near as I calculated, my
keeper brought a bottle of wine and a cold fowl, he sat
them down and retired as usual. After he left me I
drank part of the wine and proceeded to tear the fowl
to pieceswhen lo! a letter was concealed on the inside!
It ran thus:
Your friend is still here, he has been with me often.
He is disguised in the habit of an Indian, and has two
fleet horses ready, and now the nights being dark, you
may expect him. Heaven grant you may get safe to
your country, where you will sometimes deign to think
of
LEANORA.
I did not venture to indulge in that joy which this
circumstance
might reasonably be supposed to produce, for
though I had something to hope I had much to fear. But
the letter threw me into such an agitation of conflicting
ideas, that I found it impossible to confine them to any
one object, and I passed the day in great perturbation.
When night came I never attempted to sleep, but with my
eyes on the watch. I counted the tardy minutes.
I scarcely allowed myself to breathe that I might catch
the first sound of Wilson's approach. The next night
was passed still more unpleasant; but on the following,
about midnight, I heard the keys turning, and Wilson,
though I hardly knew him, entered my prison! I was
ready, and without speaking a word followed him out;
we wound our way through a narrow alley until we
came to a large house: Wilson tapped gently at the door,
it was opened by Leanora, who without waiting to salute
us turned bastily round and stepped into another room.
Dennis followed her out, Don't delay a moment,' said
she, `Dennis will conduct you, and giving each of us
her hand, beckoned us to proceed.
We crossed a garden and came to a small gate. Dennis
opened the gate: it led into a narrow alley which turned
to the left. Pursuing this some distance, we passed
several
gates and windings, through which Dennis
conducted
us, and finally led to a house in a remote part of the
city. Dennis knocked at the door, which was opened
by an Indian, who was equipped for riding.
Come on: said he, and leading the way, we soon
arrived at an enclosure where stood three horses well
caparisoned. He mounted one and directed us to do the
same. After squeezing the offered hand of Dennis, and
sending a grateful message to his mistress, we followed
our conductor.
8*
CHAPTER X.
We proceeded rather slowly until we were out of the
city lest the sound of our horses, whose feet were muffled,
might alarm the inhabitants. Upon leaving Mexico we
entered upon a narrow track, where we put our horses
to their best speed. During all this time I never spoke
a word to Wilson nor he to me, neither did our
conductor
utter a syllable. He would sometimes look behind
him as if to urge us onbut we had no need of this
hint.
Before day-light we had left Mexico far behind. The
day was cloudy and therefore I could not distinguish our
course, nor did I take the time to ask. We continued
our journey all that day and the next night without
halting
,
except for the purpose of drinking and letting our
horses drink. As day-light was breaking upon us we
discovered a small hamlet at no great distance. Our
guide now spoke to us, for the first time, and reining up
his horse, which indeed could hardly drag his legs after
him, he said,
That we must lie by that day and refresh oursleves
with sleep and food; and that the great road leading to
Vera Cruz lay nearthat it was not in our power to
avoid it in either direction on account of the morasses
which lay on each side of it; that our pursuers, if there
were any, would probably be on towards evening, and
by letting them get before us our danger would be less;
and that we would set out again about dark.
It was likewise settled that Wilson should array
himself
in a rich dress, and pass for the superior, while I and
the Indian, (our guide) were to be his domestics. This
being the arrangement we stopped to equip Wilson.
Leanora had projected this plan, it appeared, and had
provided a rich Spanish dress for the purpose. One
circumstance
afflicted us, that was the length of Wilson's
beard. This, however, was to be managed by our guide,
who would take upon himself to account for it,
agreeably
to the enquiry it might excite. All these things
being settled, and Wilson dressed up as the master Don,
he and the guide walked forward to the village, while I
led the horses after them.
Although this town was not entirely destitute of wealth
yet we found it difficult to procure accommodations.
There were a few Spaniards settled in it, but we put up
with an Indian. Wilson and myself, after eating some
fruit, (no other food could be had) lay down to sleep,
upon
a mat, while our guide went out to put away the
horses
,
and seek others for the purpose of completing our
journey. The place pointed out for our repose was a
little garden near the house. The enclosure around it
was sufficient to guard us from the view of any one,
unless
it was entered. Thus being disposed we left every
other concern to our guide.
When it was completely dark we were called by him
to awake and take some refreshment. He had procured
a little wine, some bread, and a quantity of delicious
fruit, which he brought to us in the garden, and desired
us to eat hearty, as we should get no more until we
arrived
at Vera Cruz. We must get there this night, said
he, and you must take passage the moment you arrive
there, or you will be discoveredfor your enemies are
after you.
How do you know, said I, have you heard of
them.
He informed us that while we slept three horsemen
called at the village to get refreshment for themselves
and horses, and withdrew, execrating the place in bitter
terms, because it could afford them nothing. They
came to the very hut we had called at; he met them at
the door, and played off the master of the house upon
them. They rode off very brisk in order to gain a
considerable
village on this side of Vera Cruz, where it is
probable they will spend the night. If you therefore
reach Vera Cruz by day-light, and have the good
fortune
to find a vessel just going out, you may escape: and
if you meet with no vessel, my lady said I must get my
uncle who lives there, to conceal you until you can get
out safe,
When we had finished our repast we mounted our
horses
,
(not the same, for our trusty guide had provided
fresh ones) and setting forward, we were soon in the
great road. We travelled briskly on until we came to
the town where we supposed our enemies had taken up
quarters for the night.
We dared not venture to go through it, and every
difficulty
,
almost, opposed our going round. Marshes,
brambles, and enclosures, presented themselves in
succession
.
At length, however, we gained the great road,
and met with no obstacle until we arrived at Vera Cruz,
which we did about two hours before day.
We proceeded directly to the house of our guide's
uncle
,
who was a Mestezoe, and who received us with
much kindness.
Our first business was, to enquire of this man
whether
any vessel was in the harbour, and whether a passage
could be obtained to Havanna. Our guide, who was the
spokesman, observed that a Don and his servant
wished
to take passage early that morning. After pausing
sometime the uncle replied,
There are several ships in the harbour, but whither
they are bound I cannot say.I will, however, ascertain
that particular as soon as day-light.
In the mean time we took some refreshment. As soon
as day broke we proceeded to the harbour, and seeing a
boat with three passengers in it, just putting off from the
shore, we hailed it: it returned, and we stepped into
it without asking or being asked any questions. On
our way to the ship our guide, at our instance, asked the
passengers if they were bound for Havanna? They
replied, that they were bound to Spain, but in all
probability they would stop at Havanna. He asked
them when they would set sail? They answed This
morning. I found it difficult to conceal my joy upon
hearing this good news, which I perfectly understood.
When we arrived at the vessel, we found it quite a small
craft, laden principally with logwood.
We succeeded in getting a passage, after showing our
passport, which Wilson had. It was for himself only,
but no notice was taken of me, whom he passed for his
servant. No questions being asked, we paid our
passage
,
and bid adieu to our kind friends, after sending
a message to Leanora
We immediately hoisted anchor, and having a
favourable
breeze, soon lost sight of Vera Cruz.
When a man is in bad luck every thing goes wrong;
when it once changes for the better, every thing goes
well. It happened that the ship we engaged was a
British
ship. Had it been otherwise, we might have had some
trouble in getting off
An opportunity of conversing together having now
occurred, Wilson gave me the following account of his
anventures from the time of our separation in Mexico:
After your failure to escape over the wall, in my
first attempt to liberate you, I ran with my best speed
to the house where our late guide joined us two nights
since. At this house I had spent the four days that
succeeded
my release, it being pointed out to me by Leanora,
to whom I disclosed my intention without reserve.
This generous Indian was greatly agitated when I
informed him what had happened, and after a short
pause he said that I could not remain there, that
every
house in the city would be searched, and were I found
in his house my life would be endangered.
What was to be done! I proposed to leave the house,
at all hazards, and trust to chance for my safety. I
would rather die an hundred deaths than be the means
of injuring a single hair of thy headfarewell! said I,
pressing his hand to my heart.
Stop, said he, I have thought of something
follow
me and do as I do. We will join the pursuers, and
by that means deceive them.
By this time the streets were full of people, some
going one way, some another. We ran out and asked
what was the matterjoined the tumult, and continued
to run hither and thither the whole night. The mob
could not give any satisfactory answer when interrogated
respecting the cause of the disturbancesome said the
city was betrayed, and others, that the States' men had
entered the city and carried off some prisoners by force,
and that the natives had rebelled and the Viceroy was
besieged in his palace. All this was well. When
day-light
appeared, I returned with my friend to his house,
where I lay concealed in a private chamber six days.
At the end of this time I came to the resolution of
disguising myself in the habit of a Spanish peasant, and
purchasing one of the floating gardens, and pursuing the
business of selling flowers to the inhabitants of Mexico
until an opportunity offered of effecting your escape.
My friend for this purpose furnished me with a root,
with which I tinged my skin of a yellow colour. You
recollect my whiskers grew very long while I was in
prison. My hair I died black as jet.
Thus disguised I left my kind entertainer one
evening
and travelled nearly the whole night. By
day-light
I had gained nearly the extremity of the lake,
where those gardens are constructed. But I found it
impossible
to effect my purpose, from my inability to speak
their language correctly.
The owners of those gardens discovered my foreign
accent, and evinced evident signs of distrust. They
eyed me with suspicious glances, and even hinted that I
must be one of those spies of whom they had heard such
terrible accounts. I sat down on the bank opposite to
them under a shade, and seemed perfectly unconcerned
at their conversationwhich I appeared not to
understand
.
Pretending drowsiness I threw myself on the ground,
and feigned sleep. I expected that perhaps they would
attempt to seize me, but it would have cost them dear,
(although there were five of them) armed as I was with
two pistols and a dirk I should have set them at defiance.
I reproached myself for not foreseeing the danger in
which my accent would involve me in personating a
Spaniard. I could easily have procured a garden
without
any risk, through the agency of my kind friend, the
Indian, who was privy to my design.
After resting myself sometime I got up and amused
myself in sauntering about and picking the wild flowers
which covered the banks of the lake, and by degrees I
lost sight of the gardeners. The moment I was fairly
out of view I mended my pace, nor stopped until I had
nearly doubled the lake, it being far advanced in the night
before I ventured to rest. At length coming to a rugged
cleft of rocks on the margin of the lake, where I could
with the utmost security conceal myself, I lay down with
my pistol in my hand, lest I might be attacked by wild
beasts. Nothing however interrupted my repose, and
with the dawn of morning I lodged myself in one of
those cavities. Here I resolved to stay until the bustle
which this last incident might occasion, was over.Not
to tire you, I lay here two weeks, only venturing out at
night to pluck fruit for my sustenance.
Finding myself grow feeble, and being impatient to
hear how you were, I ventured one dark night from my
hiding place and took the road to the city to see friend
Unco, (the Indian's name) and hear the news. I had
proceeded
but a short distance when it grew so dark that I
was unable to discern a single object whatever. It now
began to thunder tremendously, and lightened with such
rapidity that heaven and earth seemed wrapt in fire
torrents
of rain succeeded.
Aided by the lightning I pursued my way with all
possible dispatch, it being a good opportunity to enter
the city without discovery. At length I reached Unco's
door, wet enough, to be sure! but then I needed washing.
Unco received me kindly, and was much gratified to find
I was still alive and in the country.
He said his lady had often been to his house to
enquire
after me, and some reported that one of those
outlanders had been seen on the lake, and it made a great
noise and strict search was made in that direction.
When the truth was not confirmed the men who spread
it were taken up and put in confinement as impostors.
I then asked him if he had heard, lately, from you. He
said his lady told him she believed you were wellbut
confined in the dungeon.
Unco, said I, I had like to have been discovered,
as you heard, on the lake, going there as I told you to
purchase a floating gardenand finally told him that he
must conceal me in his house a week or two longer, and
purchase for me one of those gardens, for I could not
leave the country until I could get my friend out of
prison.
The kind creature furnished me with a plentiful
breakfast and prepared dry clothes of his own to put
on. I offered him money but he generously refused it.
Now, said I to Unco, I will lay down and take a
nap, and do you go and tell your lady that I am here and
would be glad to see her.
The next night she came and she and I concerted
the plan of your delivery.I was to procure a garden
and go to her house every morning with the flowers.
She was to give me a bottle of wine, or money, or
whatever
she chose I was to be disguised as an Indian and
to mix with the domestics at nighthave plenty of wine,
treat largely, talk broken Spanish, dress in rags, and
the first dark night infuse a sleeping dose into the wine,
with which I was to ply the keeper who was
immoderately
fond of the liquor, but dared not let it be known that
he drank while on duty.
I continued with Unco about ten days, when I
ventured
to put my scheme into execution, and every thing
succeeded as I wished. I was a jolly fellow at night,
(feigning to be drunk) the butt and ridicule of all the
domestics
sometimes
I would dance the Indian dance, and
amuse them with every grimace of countenance and
distortion
of body I could assume.
Sometimes I would be absent several days: this
would heighten their desire to see me. We would on
these occasions double the quantity of wine.
At length the propitious night arrivedthe first
bottle
,
the second, and a third, were soon emptied, all well
charged with the opium. I soon tumbled over, fast
asleep as it were, and in a short time the others followed
my example. When they were all asleep I stole the
keys out of the keeper's pocket, and you know the
rest.
Although well pleased to have it in my power to
converse
with people who understood my native language,
(for there were several Englishmen on board) yet I was
far from being sure of gaining my liberty. I was in
continual dread lest the Spaniards might pursue and
overtake us.
The master smiled when I observed, that we went
very slow.
You must have a sweet-heart, said he, whom you
are in haste to seewe go eight knots an hour.
When we reached the entrance of the Gulf Stream not
far from Havana, a violent storm arose, which drove us
to the eastward in the direction of the Bahamas. Whilst
we were combatting the wind and waves we espied two
vessels making down upon us. The boatswain eyeing
them through a glass from the mast head, said they were
strange looking vessels and he could not tell to what
country they belonged. The captain was panic-struck,
and shook from head to foot, observing that we must
be near the Bahamas, and it was quite probable the
vessels
were manned by pirates who infested those seas. If
they are, we are gone, said he, for we have no metal
to oppose them.
We were not left long to conjectureTaking the
advantage
of the wind, they bore down upon us like
lightning
.
We attempted to fly before them putting on all
sail, but they wheeled before the wind and poured in a
broadside before we had time to clear the deck. We
made what defence we were able, two guns being all that
we had, but never did guns do more execution. Wilson
and myself being skilled in artillery, played them off
two shots for one: but a shot taking effect in the hull,
and our mainmast being carried away at the same
instant
,
we were immediately boarded. Six of our men
were killed, and two mortally wounded. Wilson and
myself expecting no quarters, determined to sell our
lives dear. Taking up a sword that one of our men
dropped as he fell, I ran the first man through the body
that jumped on deck. Wilson followed my example:
he killed the next, I cut off the head of another and
wounded several, but being overpowered by numbers
who being assisted by the crew from the other ship, we
were disarmed, tied and put on board one of the pirate
ships.
Our captain fell at the first onset, and we had but two
men left when the pirates obtained the victory. I was
slightly wounded in my right shoulder, Wilson was
unhurt
.
The pirates dispatched the only two beside
ourselves
that were unhurtalso those that were wounded,
9
their leader observing in the English language that
them other dogs were brave fellows, and would serve
them well in a hard gale.
As our vessel was filling fast with water, they
hastened
to unload her, but found very little that suited them.
One small chest of gold ingots, a little silver, the stores,
with several chests of clothes, and some spices were all
they discovered. This I learned afterwards, for being
confined in the hold of their vessel, I saw nothing that
passed.
The action took place about three o'clock, and that
night about one o'clock we were set on shore.
Wilson
and myself were blindfolded, for what purpose we
could not imagine. We spent the night on the beach in
a state of wretchedness that would baffle description.
The next morning we were placed on mules which were
led by the banditti to the distance of two miles, as we
supposed. We were then taken from the backs of the
mules, led into some secret place, and seated ourselves
together on the ground, but ventured not to speak, lest
we might be overheard. In the course, however, of an
after our arrival, the bandages were taken from
our eyes and we found ourselves in a spacious cavern
filled with these monsters of iniquity. Amongst them
was a female. There were about thirty men around us.
They brought us brandy in abundance (of which they
drank largely themselves) and likewise victuals to eat;
while we were eating I ventured to ask what they
designed
to do with us.
Why, dn you, said the head of the gang (as I
took him to be) if you had your deserts you ought to
be shot in revenge for the life of the bravest of our men;
you have broke us up. But as you are good metal, you
may have your lives if you will agree to take his place
and take an oath to be true to the cause, you can have
your life upon no other conditions.
And would you require an oath? said Wilson.
That's a pretty question, said he; I would have
doubts even of that, but the moment you prove
refractory
,
d'ye mind, off comes your head with this, showing
a huge sword.This is the fellow that never makes
mistakes; many a one it has taken offsee, there's the
blood on it, hardly dry since it sent a fellow to the other
world, as he said, to consider upon the proposal.He
was a brave fellow too, d'ye see, but if you will stay
here and partake of our danger you may partake of our
wealth too. We get it hard and spend it like princes.
Come hand us more brandyhere, Jack, what are you
about? bring us plentyWe don't mind this business of
killing at all. said he, addressing himself to me. I
don't like to do it could it be helped, but we are too far
in now to retreat: and as I was saying, we are a set of
jolly fellows, so if you have a mind you can join us and
take pot luck; if not, its do your business, old friend,
said he, pointing to the sword, and that's an end of the
matter.
I saw that remonstrance was useless, and told him
that we would take some time to consider the proposal.
I then related to him the whole story of our misfortunes,
and begged of him to suffer one of us, I did not care
which, to continue the voyage home; that were it not
for my sister I would rather die than not.
Humph! said the stern brute, we have heard too
many such stories as yoursbut I don't care a
ropes-end
about it, only you're a couple of brave fellows, I'll
say that. You can have your choiceI'll give you till
evening to consider upon it.
Then turning to his men, with an air of authority
demanded
if every thing was safely lodged, and receiving
an answer in the affirmative, helped himself to another
draught of brandy. Being by this time nearly
intoxicated
,
and becoming drowsy he stretched himself on a
pallet
and fell asleep. Four men took their station near
him with muskets in their hands. They held them
between
their knees with the but ends on the ground, on
which they were seated. Wilson and myself sat and
looked at them in a state of mind that may easily be
imagined
.
For my own part, death had no terrors in it for
me. I had suffered more than twentymore than a
hundred deathswhy then should I fear one? It was
pleasing to me to reflect that my destiny was now fixed
and certain.If I acceded to the terms of the banditti I
might have a chance to escape to my country, and if not,
I might in death find a release from all my cares; but to
take the oath, to bind myself to murder my
fellow-creatures
the
thought froze my heart. I will not do it,
thought II will never be a murderer!God will
certainly
not desert me; He will not punish a violation in
favour of mercy. I therefore resolved to take the oath.
I mentioned this to Wilson in the Spanish language in a
low voice, lest I might be understood. He agreed with
me, and we said no more.
Nothing worth relating occurred during two or three
hours, when an incident put an end to all my hopes of
life. In asking me for something Wilson called me by
name. One of the banditti who had been earnestly
looking
at me for some time coloured deep and examined me
still more earnestly.
I fastened my eyes upon him also: he was much
disconcerted
his
face was familiar to me, I had certainly
seen him before, he was an elderly man, about forty
years of age. Good God! what was my astonishment:
it was Hunter! He was disguised as an Indian, but it
proved to be him. I saw in a moment, by his
countenance
,
that whatever Wilson's fate might be, I was
devoted
to destruction. Be it so then, thought I, I would
rather die at once than be in a sea of eternal trouble, and
comforted myself with this reflection.
What could this monster be doing amongst those
robbers
?
Could he be in alliance with them? But the
atrociousness of his character, had they known it, would
have rendered him unworthy even of them.
A short time after this the head of the band awoke
and I was confirmed in my suspicion. The ruffian,
Hunter
,
called him to walk out of the cave. They were
absent
some time, while I suggested the idea to Wilson,
whose grief (for the part he had acted in this last turn of
fortune) broke out into tearsbut I observed that it must
ultimately happen.
In about half an hour they returned, and the Captain
of the band asking Hunter, Which is he? he thus
addressed
me:
Young man I have revoked your sentence; you are
known to one of our party as a traitor, and a
dishonourable
man, who cannot be trusted. You must die.
He is a liar, and the blackest of villains: said I,
with spiritand may the vengeance of Heaven
overtake
him; he has ruined my family, he has murdered my
father and mother, and now he would murder me.
You know him then, said the pirate.
Yes, I do know him.
This act of duplicity, then, is sufficient evidence
against you. You knew him, and were silent.
I knew him not, said I, until the moment he
discovered
me.
'Tis useless to say any more, said the robber, you
die, for if you are right in what you say of him, the
greater the dangerso draw up here. Stevens, take a
file of twelve, and take this fellow out and despatch
himquick, I say.
I arose, pressed Wilson's hand, and stepped out of the
cavern without speaking a word. I walked between six
men on each side, perfectly undaunted, with a firm step.
I was now soon to be out of trouble, and that was
sufficient
to reconcile me to my fate. You are
accustomed
to this, said I to one of the men that was next to me.
Yes, said he, but I hate to kill a man in cool
blood for all that; but we must obey our Captain.
And are you not afraid, said I, that the
vengeance
of heaven will one day overtake you.
How much further, Stevens? asked one of the men.
Just to that rock, there, before us.
At this moment we heard a voice behind usAvast,
villains!
The men stopped, and looked round, and beholdan
armed force stood before the cavern! At the same
instant
a discharge of musketry brought several of the
pirates to the ground. I saw Wilson, the next moment,
in the arms of the strangers. He pointed towards us:
a large party advanced
Williams: cried one of them, and approached us
at a running pace. Now, thought I, I shall be killed,
to a certainly, eiher by one party or the other; but
hefore
9*
either party fired, Wilson, (I suspect) interfered, for
the strangers called out, to surrender themselves, which
they immediately did.
Thus was I snatched from the jaws of death.
Wilson
ran into my arms and sobbed aloud, upon my bosom,
while the strangers viewed us in silent amazement. I
next aproached my deliverers, and thanked them for my
life.
Dn the dogs: said an old looking veteran, I
wouldn'nt a'missed this, d'ye see, for all Havanna; but
I had terrible work to get over these cursed stones.
Why, it's a very ds den o' a placeI sprained my
ankle to boot.
Ferguson, take care of them fellows, and see what's
to pay. Oh, Lord, how my ankle hurts me.
Sambo, where is something? What hast thou
brought?
Here, massa, handing a bottle.
Well, let's sit down here, and ask these fellows
where their spring be, for we can't live here without
water.
Sambo, who was a black man, appeared to be the
servant
of the old soldier, immediately set out to find water,
and upon enquiry, of those in the cavern, where it might
be found, he returned with a full canteen, which he had
slung over his shoulder.
While Sambo was absent, the old gentleman enquired
how it came to pass that we fell into the hands of those
pirates, a circumstance which had been briefly imparted
to him by Wilson.
After giving him a summary of our imprisonment in
Mexico, and the particulars respecting our capture by
the pirates, I then related the whole circumstance of
Hunter's conduct to my father, and his late attempt
upon
my life; all of which have already been detailed to
the reader.
And where be this Hunter? said the old gentleman.
Is he amongst the number of the slain?
I know not, said I, I should be sorry, however, if
he were.
Here, go with this manWhat be thy name, friend?
Burlington, I replied.
Burlington, repeated he, What was thy father's
ohristian name?
His name was Charles, sir.
And he lived in Plymouth, thee says?
He did, sir.
It must be hemust be my brother, my name is
Burlington. Did thee never hear him speak of a
brother
he had, by the name of Thomas, who went to sea
when a lad?
My dear uncle, said I, embracing him, And is it
you that has saved my lifethank God, for he is once
more merciful. I did hear him speak of you often, and
often has he bewailed your death; for, my dear sir, we
heard you were dead.
That was a mistake, it was a man of the same name,
and may be a distant relation; he died in the East Indies;
I remember it well, many of my acquaintances were of
the same opinion as yourself, d'ye see, that it was me.
Well, poor lad, thou hast seen hard service, as well as
thy uncle. Poor Charles, I little thought I should see
thee; but the will of heaven be done, said he, wiping
the tears from his cheeks.
Where's the cup, Sambo? Be that good water, thou
hast found?
Sambo drew from his pocket a silver cup that held
nearly a pint
Dis good water, me believe, massahe run out o'
one rock.
Very well, set it down; Sambo, here is a nephy of
mine, maybe thee will like to hear that.
What, nevy, massa?
Oh, it's just some o' my peoplehere, give the poor
boy something to drink, I'll warrant he is in need,
handing Sambo the cup.
Drink sir, said I, and I will pledge you. He
drank first, and then handed the cup to Wilson and me.
The old man desired me to take a guard, and ascertain
the number of the slain and prisoners, and see whether
Hunter was dead or alive.
There were fourteen killed and one just dying of his
wounds. Going into the cave, we found Hunter living
He refused even to look at me, though I called him by
name and asked him what death he expected to die.
Upon examining the contents of the cavern, we found
an immense quantity of specie, and several ingots of
gold, many trunks of clothing, some of which was of
the richest quality; besides casks of brandy, rum,
molasses
,
beef, pork, sea-buiscuit, coffee, sugar, butter,
and a great quantity of fruit of all sorts.
Independently of these articles, we found one of the
fair sex, which I mentioned before.
Ferguson, who appeared to be my uncle's head man,
had confined the prisoners in the inner part of the
cavern, amidst the plunder. This part was dark, and
separated from the outer part, and communicated with
it by a door, which was fastened with a strong iron
bar, and with a huge padlock.
We turned out our female prisoner, (who had
accompanied
us with a lamp,) and left her at liberty
with Ferguson and his men, who stood guard in the
outer room of the cavern.
Had she been young and handsome she might have
been in some danger; but alas! she was neither the
one nor the other.
I returned and reported the substance of my
discovery
to my uncle.
Curse 'em, said he, many an honest man's life
has paid for their spoil, and yet, hang it, I hate to
shed blood.
Go, said he to his men, and throw them fellows
out o' my sight. I've a notion to take up my quarters
on shore to nightWhat dost thou think boys? Think
Jinkins can take care o' the rigging to-night? It seems
a still evening, and they say as how there's good
cheer aboard.Avast, there, lend a hand.
Sambo and I both assisted him in rising to his feet.
Ah, child! thy uncle is a poor old crazy vessel
his voyage is almost completedWhat do'st think,
Sambo, will Jinkins fancy that we're lost?
Oh, no, massa, he know you can be no lossI
boun' he take care ob de tacklin' one night.
Well then, boys, we'll go and see what's to eat and to
drink.
We assisted the old man in walking to the cavern,
with which he seemed much pleased, and observed that
it was a main strong fortress. He dismissed
Sambo
,
(who, it seems, was his cook, as well as his valet,) to
prepare supper, telling him to make the woman assist
him.It appeared that besides the two rooms already
mentioned, there was a third, which was the old woman's
department. Thither they both repaired to prepare
supper.
CHAPTER XI.
While
supper was preparing, I took occasion to
enquire
how it happened that they came so providentially
to our relief?
Thee's heard, said the old man, the old saying:
but thee must tell me thy christian name, my son.
Charles, sir, said I.
Charles! repeated he, yes, that was thy father's
name. Thee's heard `that when rogues fall out, honest
people come by their own;' so it seems that these fellows
fell out among themselves, and so one o' the gang turned
king's evidence. That I bethink, it be this same,
whatde'call'um
.
Hunter; stop, where be he that brought us
hither?fellow come forward herewas it not this
Hunter that thee sayest brought thee in the lurch?
Yes, sir, replied one of the men.
And what be thy name, friend? I fear thee's as bad
as any o' um, but thee did a good turn once in thy life,
but though dare say didn't intend it.
My right name, sir, is Horton.
And Horton it was indeedthe same Horton whom
my father had taken as a servant into his family, at the
instance of Hunter, and who had eloped from Boston
suddenly.
The reader will recollect that I suspected him of
stealing
the bonds, which my father held on Hunter.
It was evident from the confusion in his countenance,
that he recognized me.
Well, as I was saying, continued my uncle, this
fellow, Horton, and the head o' the gang quarrelled about
the booty, and he came and lodged information to the
Governor of Havana. I happened to be sitting with old
Frank, just in the nick o' time, de ye see, and he is good
an old soul as ever trod on neat's leather. So he says
to me, Tom, you're the man (if any body can) that'ill just
go and fetch'um in; they ha' done a deal o' harmdd
glad-to find'um out; there is the swift sailor, and take
as many boys as you please to man her. The fellow says
he will take you to the spotalways set a rogue to catch
a rogue. And so, to be sure, was just agoin to sail to
the States, had every thing aboard, but so it was I
loitered
away the time, 'till this here news come, and the
Governor said he would not be denied, as how he would
depend on no one else, and that's the amount o' the
story.
I turned to Horton and asked him if he did not
recollect
me?
He hesitated some time, but at length stammered out
that he didthat he thought he had seen me before.
You must be at no loss, replied I, to recollect me,
when you were a servant at my father's; you must be the
villain that stole Hunter's bonds out of my father's trunk,
but I forgive you as you have been the means of saving
my life.
Ah, friend, I thought thee was as great a villain as
any o' the gang, but thee shall get the papers and
Hunter
shall get 'um too.
And how came it to pass, said I, that two such
friends as you and Hunter should differ? A disclosure
cannot injure you now, as it is a matter that concerns you
and him alone; you can incur no sort of danger, by a full
confession; besides, you will eventually be compelled to
disclose every thing that relates to your connexion with
this man, as a witness. He is a citizen of the United
States, and must be taken there to stand his trial.
Horton scratched his head, and after some hesitation
said, that Hunter was one of the worst of men; that
he had been his ruin.
To the pointto the point, said my uncle, we
have'nt time to listen to thee, ruination and all that sort
o'thinghow come thee to fall out? answer that.
May it please your honour, sir, I was to have
one-fourth
of all that Hunter made, and he never gave me any
thing but ill usage. When I challenged him for his breach
of promise, he said he would fit me out a vessel, and I
should have the command of her. He failed in this, and I
threatened to discover upon him if he did not comply with
one or the other of his promises. He said I should have my
deserts as soon as we were landed, adding he would put
me where the dogs would not bite me. Expecting from
this that he intended to murder me, I took the
opportunity
one night as we were close under Havana, (looking
for game as we call it,) to slip into the water and swam
to shore.
That is the truth, I believe 'um, said my uncle,
for I saw him as wet as a drowned rat.
And is Hunter a partner of these pirates? said I.
He is, sir, said Horton.
You say he was to give you a fourth; a fourth of
what?
A fourth of what we gained.
What by?
Why sir, by robbery, if I must tell the truth.
Hunter
found these men in vessels, guns and every thing they
wanted, and they gave him half the profits. When
Hunter
could not come here to attend to it himself, he would
send me. Why he has been at this business ten years.
Well go thy ways, I hates to hear it'can't keep
my temper at hearing such doings.
In a few minutes Sambo re-entered, having made great
improvement in his appearance by the addition of a clean
piece of checked cloth by way of apron, extending from
chin to toe. He placed a white cloth on the rude table,
knives and forks, plates, and some best cogniac, which
would have been irresistible, had it sparkled in
decanters
,
instead of a large rough wooden noggin. He next
disposed several horn tumblers around the noggin, not
forgetting his master's large silver cup. Thus having
given the last evidence of his skill to the table, Sambo
withdrew.
In a quarter of an hour he returned with a huge
coffee-pot
in one hand, and a dish of nicely fried, fresh fish, in
the other, followed by the old woman loaded with cups
and bowls, out of which it was intended we should drink
our coffee.
Ah, massa, said Sambo, as he placed the things on
the table, dis caffee make you feel young. I make him
myself and bootyful fish you neber seedat dare man
what catch him dis mornin; he did'en know who goin
eat him.
Why done you make hase? said he to his
companion
in attendance, you so slow about ebery ting.
She looked at him as if she could have killed a host
with one glance of her eye, though she had but one in
her head. He disappeared once more, still grumbling at
the sloth of his companion, who nevertheless followed
him to bring the rest of the supper.
When they re-appeared, I was astonished to see an
exquisite
dish of oysters, and a delicious looking wild fowl,
an untouched ham, and a great quantity of sea biscuit.
Well, dn these rascals, see to 'em, how they
livedold hag didn't always fare thus!
Fine cheer! said my uncle as he advanced to the
table in order to sit down. Our
fille de chambre
made
him no answer.
Dn thee for a blear ey'd old bh, canst speak,
ey! come, boys, sit downtell ye whatSweet-heart,
get thee out o' my sightnever stir if thee baint the
ugliest
old ! do'st hear? change thy garments before
'e comes back, and wash that face o' thine.
She still was silent, though she took my uncle's advice
in withdrawing from his presence. She certainly ad
the least refinement about her that I ever witnessed in
one of the sex. As I before observed, she had but one
eye: her nose, originally short, was rendered still more
so by some accident. She was about five feet ten,
in height, had she been straightbut that she was not.
She was about sixty years of age, clad in an old green
petticoat, bespotted with the grease of years. As for
her face, I should suppose if water and it had ever been
acquainted it was several years since.
[6]
[6]
This is no fiction. The author lived in the neighborhood of a female, who was a native
of the north of Ireland, and who was never known to wash her face or hands, so that the
dirt had actually become a part of her. Every one remembers
Rosy Dempry
, Greenb***r
County, Va. More anecdotes are related of her than would fill a moderate volumeone of
which may give some idea of
Rosy
. The author passing by her house one day (which was
in the country) in company with several gentlemen and ladies, we discovered
Rosy
sitting
under a fence by the road side, eating mush and milk with a spoon. We stopped our
horses
and talked with her some time, and amongst other things one of the company asked her
the cause of her eating out of doors.And troth, sir, said she, I can no' eat in the
house for the fleas: they hop into my cup till my milk's fairly black wium. Some of the
now
first families in West Virginia have the honour of claiming kin with Rosy.
It was
wrinkled
something like the skin of an Irish potatoe, when it
has undergone a thaw after being frozen.
I observed to my uncle that probably his hand-maid
did not understand English.
10
He unstan well enoughhe do ebery ting I tell
him.
Thee didn't bring a bit o' wine, didn't Sam?'
No sir, I wan' bring wine, massa say nobring
branny.
Well I believe I did, but didn't think o' stayin' so long
and brandy is better to make one light; but I hates it at
table, said the old man after taking a hearty draught.
Maybe got some wine here, I go see, said Sambo.
Tell that old dare-the-dl to come hither.
When she approached, he addressed her with
hark-'ee
,
comrade, hasn't some wine aboard? By the time
he had said this, she being full in his view, his disgust
revived in a tenfold degree, and without waiting for a
reply, he cried out avastdo say thee's fit for
nothing
but to feed the crowswhy her face looks as 'tware
parboiled, said he as Sambo followed her to enquire
about the wine.
It was some time before Sambo returned, bearing a
demi-john, which proved about half full of excellent
Madeira
.
Maybe the old hag has poisoned it, Sambodos't
think she has?
No, sir, he love him too well he self; he had him
hid away in agrounI be boun he good.
And it be clean, its more than she be, said the old
man, as Sambo filled his cup.
Ah, its excellent, said he after tasting it, take
some boys, after turning off a bumper himself.
Sambo's eyes sparkled with joy to think he had put
the finishing stroke to the supper, and we as well as the
old gentleman did great honour to the things of the
cavern
after ordering the guard to be doubled.
Curse these pirates, said my uncle, I don't like
to'umthenI believe they'reall-a-veryset---o'
heathens, as he chewed the crisped end of a fish.
But I should like to know how Dick will do to night,
de ye seeleft him to take care o' the vessel and like o'
that.
As I knew nothing of the Dick he mentioned, I said
nothing. This was the most pleasant repast I had
partaken
of since I left Tennessee three years before.
After we had supped, the men who were not on duty
were called to receive their rations of biscuit and brandy,
which when they had disposed of, they were ordered on
guard until the others should also partake of refreshment.
And now, said my uncle, be upon the watch boys,
keep a good look out; I be going to lay me down to take
my restif any thing stirs, fire the alarm-gundos't
hear Ferguson?
Ay, ay, sir, said Ferguson.
I believe these are a sort o' slippery fellows we ha'
got among.
He then called Sambo to fix him a place to sleep, and
after repeating his orders to the men, Sambo helped him
to lie down, taking a brimming cup in the first place.
Dn your limbs, take care, said he to his servant
as he found himself unable to walk steady.
No dangy, massa, you no fall.
No fall! thee son o' a bh dost think I be drunk?
No, massa, I mean my step so awkard.
After the necessary attention to his master, Sambo
seemed disposed to sieze the present opportunity to
refresh
himself with the remnant of the supper. Indeed,
there was nothing left but the bones and some biscuit;
he indemnified himself, however, from the noggin.
While he was picking all the meat that was left on the
bones, I rallied him for his want of gallantry in not
inviting
old aunt Dorithy, or what may be her name, to
come and partake with him, they being fellow-labourers
together.
That's bravely thought on, said my uncle, go and
tell her to come and eat, you dog.
Blessy, massa, notting 'tall to eatyoung massa
jus makin he fun.
Well go and tell her to come and drink then; I
warrant
she loves brandy.
Sambo knew when to obey, and stepping into the
apartment
,
soon returned with the queen of the cavern.
Now sir, pour out for both of ye, and drink for
better
acquaintance.
I could not, I confess, preserve much decorum.
Wilson
and I laughed at the grotesque appearance of the old
woman. It was the first time almost in two years that
either he or myself had smiled. Sambo had very
gallantly
presented the old lady a bumper, and likewise
filled
one for himself. After bowing down till his head
touched the table, waited with a mischievous smile on his
countenance, for her to pledge him, but she refused in
sullen silence, until my uncle exclaimed,
Why don't thee drink with thy new sweet-heart,
thee old hl cat?Blast thee, 'would think't the first
time ever thee refuseddrink, I say.
She waited for no further invitation, but turned the
best part of it off and was withdrawing, when Sambo
called her to come and take her cockly-wear.
After she retired, I asked Sambo how he would like
the old lady for a wife? By this time he had become, as
well as the rest of us, pretty lively; his eyes sparkled,
and he was all glee.
Ah, massa, said he, as with the bacon-bone in one
hand and knife in the other, the labour of which he often
relieved by the application of his teeth. You is funin
now, you rekon I have dat ole tinghe look wossa den
allegator.
The sudden transition from death to life, disposed me
to listen to the sprightly sallies of Sambo; but my uncle
proposed that we should now go to rest. Wilson had a
great-coat, but I had not seen mine since my arrival at
the cavern. My uncle hearing me observe this, ordered
Sambo to go and tell that old hag to get the coat
instantly
,
or he'd put her to death. This message soon
produced the great-coat, and we placed ourselves by the
side of the old man. Although we had rested none the
preceding night, yet neither Wilson nor myself seemed
disposed to sleep. The incidents of the day repassing
before me, seemed to be the work of magic. I thought
of the generous Leanora; I thought of my orphan
sister
;
a thousand ideas arose in my mind respecting her,
and although the guard was strong, both within and
without
,
yet the desperate situation of the prisoners
suggested
thoughts in my mind very far from those of perfect
confidence. I spoke to my uncle in a low voice,
intimating
the danger we were in, should other pirates (which
for ought we knew might be the case) make their
appearance
in the course of the night, and asked him if he
was perfectly assured of the fidelity of his men?
Why blast thee, thee an't a coward, boy, art thee?
just go to sleep, if 'come's we'll fix 'umneedn't fear,
my boys be as true as steel.
I gave him to understand that I was little concerned
on my own account; that it was his safety alone that
interested
me, and I thought little of watching by him till
day.
Oh lay thee down my son, and take thy rest, no
danger at allThe men will call me in case of surprise,
and Sambo, said he, trim thy lampfellow does't
hear?keep up a light. Then asking the interiour
guard if their peices were well charged and primed, he
betook himself to his wonted repose.
The inside guard consisted of six men. Six others
were lying snoring near the door which opened into that
part of the cavern where the prisoners were confined;
those last were to relieve the first at twelve o'clock.
Fifteen
were under arms on the outside of the cavern, which
were to be relieved at the same hour by a like number,
who were then locked fast in the arms of sleep. The
faithful Sambo was traversing the cavern backwards and
forward and trimming his lamp alternately, while his
generous master was snoring by my side. The guard
had told nine, starlight and all well. I found myself
growing sleepy, but before I resigned myself to sweet
oblivion, I wished to settle our mode of proceeding with
Wilson, which for the first time since our acquaintance
produced some painful feelings on both sides, and asked
him whether he intended to proceed immediately to
Tennessee
,
or go on with us to New-York? (where my uncle
was bound.)
You could not expect me, said he, to be so near
my parents without calling to see them. Consider what
they have done for me; I should be the most ungrateful
wretch on earth, were I to pass by without calling to see
them. True I am as anxious to visit Boston as you can
10*
possibly be, and shall proceed to that place immediately
after paying my respects to my parents. You certainly
mean to accompany me through Tennessee.
He spoke this with a degree of warmth which cut me
to the heart.
Dear Henry, said I, you know I would go with
you to the end of the world; but you know my situation:
how it stands with my uncle. He will expect me to go
with him, and how am I to refuse? You know the
obligation
we are both under to him.
He replied that it was true, I owed as much to him
as he did to his parentsbut Burlington, do you not owe
me something?
Yes, WilsonI owe more to you than any earthly
being; but I merely hinted how difficult it will be, to
obtain
my uncle's consentI had no thoughts of wounding
your feelings. Wilson, said I, you have known me
long, and you have known me well, you had no right to
suspect me; you know that you are dearer to me than
my own soul.
No more, said he, pressing me to his bosom.
Charleshe could say no more, the word choked him
I threw my arms round him, returning his embrace!
We both sobbed! But the pleasure of that moment was
worthno!it was invaluableI would not have
exchanged
it for worlds. It was the perfection of
happiness
,
or friendship rather, and such as vulgar souls never
knew. After our feelings had subsided, I found that
sleep had vanished, and proposed to get up and take a
(glass we had none) cup of wine, and smoke a segar, to
which he assented.
Taking a hearty draught of wine, and lighting the
segars
furnished us by Sambo, we seated ourselves one on
each side of the table, having the lamp between us. I
looked at WilsonI thought he never looked so amiable.
Oh Charles, said he with a smile, have you
forgiven
me?
Have I forgiven myself? you ought to have said.
The rest was silenceit was the eloquence of the
heartit was rapture. Those who have tasted the sweets
of friendship will understand what we felt, as we sat
and gazed at each other. Oh friendship! thou sweetener
of our woesthou first-born of heavenwhat is to be put
in competition with thee?
After finishing our segars we lay down, and returning
thanks to our divine preserver, fell asleep.
CHAPTER XII.
Next
morning about day-light I was awakened by
Wilson, who was already up and dressed. My uncle,
who likewise had been up some time, had issued orders
and the men were preparing the prisoners for marching.
This was done by tying two and two, together, with
ropes which were found in the cavern intended no doubt,
for a very different purpose. The booty was placed on
the mules, which were found rambling near the cave.
While every thing was hurry and activity amongst
them, arranging matters to be off as quick as possible, I
was no little amused with the squabbles which took place
between my uncle, his man Sambo, and the old Czarina.
He had associated them together to bring out the
contents
of the cavern and the men placed it on the backs of
the mules, when brought forth. But Sambo and his
mate discharged their duty in a manner that was by no
means amicable. She was by far too slow, and testified
very clearly that she was unwilling to put forth all her
strength. My uncle stormed, Sambo gabbled, and the
old woman growled. After be-thee-ing and be-thou-ing
them till he was hoarse, he mounted his mule (which I
held by the bridle) and rode forward to take the
command
of the prisoners in person, telling Wilson and
myself
to take charge of the baggage, and ordering Sambo
to follow him.
Finding he gave no orders respecting the old woman,
I asked him if she had not better go with Sambo?
Go with hl, said my uncle, giving his mule the
spur, let the witch of Endor go with the baggage.
As the care of her had devolved on me, I followed her
into the cave with a view to hasten her departure. Upon
entering it, I perceived her wrapping a cloth round
something
,
which she endeavoured to conceal.
What is that you have there, old lady? said I, let
me see: perhaps it is something belonging to our people.
I don' know, said she in broken English, and very
reluctantly handed to me an old-fashioned pocket book.
Upon looking on the outside, I discovered W.
Hunter
,
in large gilt letters. A thought struck me that it
might contain something relative to my unhappy
parents
,
but not having time to examine it then, I told her
that it belonged to one of the prisoners, and that I would
take care of it myselfdesired her to set out forthwith.
Coming out of the cave, I gave the word to march,
Wilson
,
myself, and old Tanfaronado bringing up the rear.
My uncle and the prisoners by this time were nearly
out of sight. It became necessary therefore for us to
move forward briskly or be left behind. The distance
to the sea-shore was supposed to be about two miles, and
the track (no road being in the case) the most difficult
that could be conceived, passing over barren fragments
of rocks, which rendered it almost impossable for any
thing but a mule to travel it. Although Wilson and I
were well armed with each a brace of pistols and musket,
and every man of our party likewise carrying a loaded
musket, yet I was not altogether free from apprehension
of danger, had we been attacked in this narrow defile,
even by an inferior force of those desperadoes. I could
not, however, forbear laughing at our heroine, who
walked (or hobbled rather) Indian-file between Wilson
and me. She had improved her appearance considerably
from what it was the preceding evening. She had not
indeed pulled off the old green, but she had thrown over
it a very fresh looking brown bombazette. On her feet
she had a huge pair of leather shoes which made a noise,
as they came in contact with the stones, something like
that produced by the pestles of a powder mill.
A checkered handkerchief was tied on her head, and
over this an old fur hat, which had once been black, but
was now a dirty red. Her face I would suppose she had
attempted to wash, as it was now a kind of dapple-grey,
whereas, the previous evening it was rather bordering
on a black tan.
I proposed to Wilson that as he used to be a gallant
among the ladies, he ought to assist her over the rough
places, as she would never be able to keep up with the
mules. He turned round, after laughing his very soul
out, and replied,
That he would be sorry to deprive me of that
pleasure
.
Finding that he declined the pleasure, as he termed
it, I took hold of old Fille-de-sham's hand, to assist
her; she turned her one eye upon me, and regarded me
with something like a dubious look, but whether her
sensations were those of pleasure or dislike, I could not
discover.
Notwithstanding my assistance and her own exertions,
we began to fall considerable behind. I asked her if
she could ride? she replied by shaking her head,
intimating
that she could not. You must try it, said I,
and calling to the men to halt, I directed them to bring
one of the mules, that was least incumbered with
baggage
,
and put the old lady on.
She shook her head in disapprobation, but I ordered
them to hoist her on, telling them to tie her to the
pack, if she could not stick on without. Accordingly
one of them lifted her on the mule, which she bestrode,
(I suspect) in imitation of my uncle.
As she was probably ignorant of the mode practised
by our modern belles in the art of riding, we told her
that all she had to do now, was to hold fast. It was
laughable enough to see her bend forward to catch hold
of the baggage, while the mule trotted forward to
overtake
its companions.
A little time brought us in view of the ship. The
prisoners were already under escort in the long-boat
They having been disposed of, the boat returned, and in
a few minutes every thing was on board.
The pirates' vessel being lighter than ours, we took
her in tow, hoisted sail, and stood for Havanna, keeping
a south west course. The wind being unfavourable, we
did not arrive there until the evening of the fifth day,
though it was, as we supposed, but two days sail.
In the course of the day I related to my uncle, in
detail
,
the misfortunes ef my family, and likewise my long
imprisonment in Mexico.
Poor boy, said he, thou hast had a boisterous
voyage, indeed; but thou hast found a better haven than
my Eliza and my little Thomaspoor things!they
founda watery grave said he, sobbing, with his
handkerchief held to his face. This sudden effusion
affected me deeply, and it was sometime before I could
reply.
The old man wept like a child, and the
tender-hearted
Wilson melted into tears. We were, all three, sitting
by ourselves in the cabin.After the old man's feelings
had subsided, I enquired how it happened that his wife
and child were drownedhe told me thus:
In consequence of his frequent voyages to the East
and West Indies, he had acquired considerable property;
and being present at a sale of some valuable property in
St. Domingo, he purchased it very low.Being tired of
the sea he resolved to settle himself for life. He
accordingly
married the daughter of an English gentleman,
to whom he had been long attached.
Her parents, who lived in the Island, approving the
match, was the cause that led him to settle in that
Island
.
They were wealthy, and she was their only child.
He cultivated his plantation with great success, and was
fast increasing in wealth.
At the end of two years his wife blessed him with a
beautiful boy. This was a circumstance of great joy,
not only to him, but to her parentsBut alas! how vain
are earthly joys! When his dear babe was a year old,
he fitted out a vessel to go to Liverpool, freighted
principally
with the joint productions of his own plantation,
and that of his father-in-law's.
Both families wanted several articles of necessity,
amongst which was a large assortment of furniture. It
was therefore settled between them that my uncle should
go and dispose of the cargo and lay in the articles.
I left my Eliza, and her little son at her father's,
and set sail for Englandand that was the last
His emotion overcame him, again. To divert his
mind I called Sambo to prepare coffee and tea, as it drew
near supper-time, and bid him bring a bottle of his best
as I wanted something to raise my spirits.
Here, take the keys, and bring it out of the red
case, said my uncle.
Ah, massa, you mean de green case, I know!
Well, gothou knowest better than I; get every
thing that Charles wants.
Happening at this moment to make some remark to
Sambo, about the old woman, which my uncle
over-hearing
,
desired him to call her before him. When she
appeared
,
my uncle interrogated her about her birth,
parentage
,
marriage, and not forgeting, the loss of her eye.
After a good deal of questioning we understood that she
was a native of Barbadoes, and had lost her eye in
resisting
her husband, in a scuffle. My uncle, after
making
his usual caustic remarks, turned to me
Charles, get the old hag a passage to Barbadoes, first
thing thee does, and put her aboard after night; say that
she goes to see her friends.No one will be asking about
such a sooty craft as she be.
Supper being now ready, and fearing my uncle would
enter upon the melancholy subject of his wife and child,
I observed, as we sat down to it, that we ought to have
Horton up next.
Yes, said my uncle, and Hunter too; he shall
make restitution to thee before I'm done with him.
Sambo
,
go and tell Ferguson to come hither.
When Ferguson appeared, Well, (said my uncle)
hast thou got them fellows well secured?
I have, sir.
Hast been at supper?
I have not, sir.
Take some brandy, and sit thee down. Sambo,
attend
here.Friend thee must take a guard and bring up
Hunter, and tell Horton to come. I believe he's not a
whit better; but then, as for that we will say nothing
He has been the means of saving
Why, boy, thee don't drinkthee made such a fuss
about raisin' thy spirits, Charles. I understand thee,
thou'lt think to get me fuddled againcome on, hand the
bottle to these youngsters Oh, yes, there's a chip o'
the old blockthou needn't be winking at each other.
Faith! thou shalt each drink his glass: no cheating
above board.
After swallowing the whole of my glass, I begged off,
observing, that after disposing of Hunter, I would
obey him in all lawful commands.
Yes, but thou art a cunning dog after all, to qualify
thy obedience with a salvobut Dick Jinkins shall be
here to see fair play; and thou come too, Ferguson, thou
must come and sing. Dick is a fine fellowand as for
this Mr. Sly Boots, (looking at Wilson) that plagued
the old woman about her nose,
[7]
[7]
Wilson, it seems, asked the old woman if the same man that knocked out her eye, bit
off her nose!
I warrant he's got more
in his head than a body thinks, though he looks as if
butter
wouldn't melt in his month
Supper being ended, Ferguson hastened to execute his
orders.
Take these things away, Sambo, (said my uncle,)
and lay my sword and pistols on the table.
Although it could not be improper to make this
display
,
yet I determined to suffer no bloodshed. The
rattling of chains announced the approach of Hunter.
Horton, who went at large, entered first. Hunter
followed
,
looking rueful enough.
Take off his fetters. Horton, where art thou, stand
forth. Well, Hunter, what do'st think ought to be done
to thee? Go off to the guard, none need stay but
Ferguson
.
Speak villain, what do'st deserve?
Oh, bless you sir, don't ask me any questions. I
am a wretched man! Take my life, take all I have, but
ask me nothing.
Hunter, no doubt, was aware that this was the surest
plan he could have fallen upon to soften my uncle. Had he
not humbled himself as he did, he would very probably
have received some rough usage, if not from my uncle,
he would from me.
How differently do we act, when it comes to the test,
from what we resolve. The wretched appearance of this
man, and the humble style in which he addressed my
uncle
,
effectually disarmed his noble soul.
Take my lifetake all I have! Nothing more was
in his power to grant; no other retribution could we
ask. Had I met Hunter in any other situation, a sense
11
of my wrongs, a sense of the injuries he had done my
family, might have urged me to some act of desperation;
but when I beheld the wretch penitent, and completely in
my power, I had no other feelings than those of pity.
My uncle, however, grew warm as the conversation
between
him and Hunter advanced.
Take thy life! forsooth, it's not worth taking! Would
such a life as thine signify aught, d'ye see, for the
robberies
and murders thou hast committed? Look at this
young man, (pointing to me) do'st thou know him?
Hunter lifted his eyes slowly upon me, (they had
hitherto
rested on the floor) and said,
I think it is young Burlington.
Wouldst thy life, or ten thousand such worthless
lives as thine, and ten thousand times all that thou hast
robbed from honest men, indemnify him for the murder
of his parents? Take all that thou hast! thou hast
nothing
but what thou hast stolen and robbed from others
Thou murdered this young man's father and mother;
thou murdered my brother, and thou wert within an ace
o' murdering his son:Thou monster of blood, thou art
not fit to die, nor fit to live! Where's the bonds that
thou suborned Horton, here, to steal from my brother?
Hunter raised his eyes, for the second time, from the
floor, to look at Horton, wishing as I thought, to adapt
his answer agreeably to what he might discover in
Horton's
countenance.
Answer me, villian: or by heavens laying his
hand on his pistol as he spoke.
I destroyed them, said Hunter.
Arn't thee the blackest villain upon earth?Thou
hast done nothing but rob, steal, and murder, since thou
wert born. Thou ought to have been hung at ten years
old: there's no calculating thy wickednessThou'st
betrayed
thy trust to Mrs. Blarney Hasset, or whatever
may be her name.
Like a thief thee stole the woman's goods that she
trusted thee with. If thy soul had not been as black as
hll, thee would have refunded the money to her for
which thee sold them.
[8]
[8]
This part of his story we had learned from Horton.
Charles, look in my Escritoir
and bring me from thence the pen and ink and some
paper
.
Now sir, sit down and make an inventory of all
thou hast; and by heaven, if thee prevaricates one jot or
tittle, thee may guess the consequence. Give him a glass
o' brandy, poor dl! I hates the very sight of him.
Hunter looked, as may be imagined, just like one who
is going to be hung. He turned off the brandy,
however
,
and took the pen in his hand, without asking any
questions, and began to make out a schedule of his
property
.
I waited on my uncle with a decanter of good old
London particular, begging him to resume his good
humour
,
and reminding him of his promise to have Dick
Jinkins up to sing.
Oh, you rogues, you just think to trip me up, dl
a drop will I drink till thee, and what's his name, there,
pledge
Hunter interrupted by observing that his hand was so
much injured by the fetters that he could not write.
Charles, my son, sit down and make it out exactly
as he tells thee.
While Hunter and I were engaged at the inventory,
Wilson undertook to keep my uncle in chat.Indeed it
was the first opportunity they had had of conversing
together
since their acquaintance, being constantly
engaged
.
Hal, (said he to Wilson) I can never think o' thy
'tother name, give that poor dl another glass of
wine, (meaning Hunter)Ferguson, help thyself, and
let Horton join theeCome boys, we are not long to be
togethera few days more.
By the time I had completed the schedule my uncle
began to be pretty good humouredI mean what the
sailors call half-seas-over. I handed him the inventory,
which (with spectacles on) he mumbled over, partly to
himself.
Twohoues lotsin New-YorkHousein
BostonStockGoodsforthHumph, thou
writest s-such a handWho, think ye, can read it?
I will read it over for you, said I, and taking the
paper, I ran it over. When I had done he asked me
if that would be enough to pay what Hunter owed me.
Undoubtedly sir, it will, if he owns what he herein
states to be his.
Well, count the interest boy, thee understands
figures
I suppose; thy father was the best boy in school at
figures; for my own part I never learnt further than the
rule o' three. How much was the bonds?
As well as I recollect sir, they were four thousand
pounds.
What sayest Hunter, is that right?
I believe it is, sir.
No believes about it, speak positively, sir.What
was the amount?
Charles, thee knows boy how long it is; thee can
count the interest at thy leisure. Do'st think it will
make thee whole?
I think it will sir, if, as I observed to you before,
he has given in a true inventory.
By the Gd of Abraham, if he has equivocated a
single iotim I'll make his head twirl on the floor like a
top. Do'st see this sword friend, look at it, thinkest
could take off thy head at one stroke?
Hunter made no reply to the last question, but
observed
That if the property in the inventory was not
sufficient
to pay the debt, he (my uncle) had enough in his
hands to make up the deficiency.
I was sorry to hear this, knowing that he could mean
no other than the treasure found in the cave, and that
my uncle, as he had stated to me, determined to deliver
over to the Governor of Havanna.
Fearing the effect this observation would have upon
him, whose high sense of honour would not brook the
indignity
of the insinuation, I intended to reply to Hunter
myself, thinking to obviate the consequence. But
before
Hunter finished the sentence, my uncle, who was
deliberately
taking a pinch of snuff, with eyes nearly
closed
,
no sooner heard the drift of Hunter's reply, than his
eyes flew open to double their ordinary magnitude.
What's that, friend? I have enough in my hands!
What have I in my hands, pray? what does the fellow
mean?
If you mean the money found on the pirates, (said
I, taking up the subject) my uncle has no claims,
whatever
,
on that, it belongs to those for whom he
undertook
the expeditionIt belougs to the Governor of
Havanna
.
And do'st think, thou piratical scoundrel, that I'd
touch the spoil of blood? If 'twas in my power, I
should expect the ghosts of those thou hast murdered
would devour mewould expect that God Almighty
would send his thunderbolts against me. It would
canker in my pockets, it would; but what signifies
talkin'
to the dl incarnate? Take him out of my sight,
said my uncle, exhausted with rage.
It would have fared much worse with Hunter had the
old gentleman known the extent of his villainy towards
my father. It was not in his purloining the bonds only,
that Hunter acted the villain; this, perhaps, my father
would hardly have felt. It was his secreting his own
property, and thereby bringing a host of creditors upon
the firm, by which my father's property was sacrificed
to pay his debts.
Had my uncle have known this, and also that he had
raised Hunter from the most abject poverty, and
advanced
goods and money to the amount of four thousand
pounds, for which those bonds above mentioned, were
executed; and four thousand pounds at that time were
equal to eight thousand, and perhaps more, at this time,
I am inclined to think the old man would not have
awaited
the invalidity of the inventory, to hazard the strength
of the sword.
I was much relieved by the departure of Hunter,
being
grieved to see my uncle disturbed on my account.
The good old man ordered his servant to take him a bed,
a bottle of wine, together with coffee and sugar.
Friend, (said he to Ferguson) see that Hunter wants
nothing, d'ye hear, and don't iron him. When thee
returns
,
bring Dick with thee; he's one of your topping
fellows: he and I have seen hard times together.
I took the opportunity of our being alone, to acquaint
11*
my uncle of the relation in which Wilson stood in our
family, giving him to understand that an union between
him and my sister was intended.
This confidence he well merited, independently of
any other other consideration; but my motive in making
this disclosure at this time, was designed as a prelude
to secure his consent to a request I intended to make,
for leave to accompany Wilson through Tennessee. As
soon therefore, as Ferguson withdrew, I took Wilson by
the hand, and led him to my uncle
Sir, (said I) you behold in this young man another
nephew.
Howdon't understand?
He has been engaged to your niece a number of
years, and is now on his way to consummate the
nuptials
.
The old man eyed him sometime in silence, surveying
from head to foot, as if he had seen him for the first
time, at length seizing Wilson's hand, in a transport he
exclaimed,
Why, himhimBoyWhy didn'tthee t-tell
me before?Ah, thou'rt a sly rogue! I've a great mind
thou shan't have my niece, just to plague thee.
I alleged in excuse our perpetual engagements since we
met, and this was the first opportunity we had had. The
cabin door opened, and Ferguson and Dick Jinkins
entered
,
followed by Sambo.
Ah, old fellow, glad thou art comejust thinking o'
old times; take some o' the kill-grief, and pray thee give
us old lang-syne. Sambo get thy violin and strike in
with the chorus. and pulling Wilson down on the seat,
which I had purposely placed by him, he observed, thou
shall sing too, never stir if thou shan't all sing. Charles
thee see there's plenty to drinkstop, (said he) we ought
to give them poor fellows something, it'll go hard
enough with them; they are christian people, d'ye see,
like ourselves. Charles, order the dogs a gill of rum
apiece.
Though I approved this mark of hospitality in my
uncle
,
yet I by no means coincided in opinion with him,
that they were christians. Ferguson and myself set
out to execute this order, and upon our return were
obligedto
join the music party, which had already advanced to
the second stanza of old-lang-syne.
Sambo, who touched the bow with much skill, turned
his melting eyes upon me, as if to challenge my
approbation
.
Jinkins really sung with a great deal of taste;
he appeared to be my uncle's right hand man, and one of
your noble looking men, he was about five feet nine,
dressed in a short green broadcloth coat, with narrow
lace, and under it a rich Brussel's vest. His hair and
sparkling eyes were black; his manners easy and
graceful
;
he was about twenty-three years of age; his features
regular; his complexion, originally fair, was sun-burnt;
his countenance very pleasing, and the very index of
humour
.
To old lang-syne succeeded Mary I believe thee
true, and Larry O Brien, &c. &c. After we were
tired of singing Dick Jinkins produced his flute, and
accompanied
by Sambo, gave us Robin Jones, Jolly Tar,
Nancy Dawson, and a variety of airs, which were
favourites
of my uncle, until the old man, who had been
nodding sometime, thought it was bed time, and saying
we might sit up and amuse ourselves as long as we
chose, called Sambo to help him into his hammock.
After chatting awhile with Jinkins, whom I found
intelligent
and and amusing, we also betook ourselves to
our hammocks. We invited Jinkins to sleep with us;
but he declined, observing that his presence was
indispensable
elsewhere, intimating the confidence reposed
in him by his patronHe and Ferguson therefore bid us
good night, and we went to bed very nearly
whole-seas-over
.
CHAPTER XIII.
The
next morning we all arose well, except Wilson,
who had a violent head-ache, which subjected him to the
raillery of the old gentleman, who declared he would
never do if he could not set out an old fellow like him.
I doubt Mary will have a poor stick of thee, child,
(going to him and feeling of his pulse.) Oh, thou needn't
let blood, thou artn't so bad, man; why Sambo, how
many bottles did we set?
Only five, sir.
Humph, that's a pretty thing to lay up a young lark,
just going to be married, tooGo and tell the cook to
make him some chicken broth, and he will soon be well
enough.
I followed Sambo, and while waiting for some water
to mix the medicine for Wilson, he enquired how his
master come to talk about his mistress and her child.
I replied that I had enquired about them, but that he
began it himself.
Oh, massa, you shouldn't neber say a word about um,
if you do, massa go crazy.
How were they drowned? said I to Sambo.
Oh, massa, he go away to Englan'I 'long to ole
massa, he wife fadda. Dis here massa he stay so long
de nigger risekill ebery body, burn houseOle
massa
he lib close to de sea, he talk hout takin shipBefore
dat, by blood! one night here cum great many niggers:
ole misse she tell me, Sambo run tell youn' misseyoun'
misse she run to one house, tay all nightI run all my
mightknock at de doa to tell um da all will be kill'd
call youn' misse, yerk de chile out out he arms, tell him
run arter me so hard he can.
In short, that most of the inhabitants were massacred
by the negroes, their houses burned, and that his
master's
wife and child, by his assistance, escaped on board
of a vessel; but what vessel he (Sambo) could not tell.
He went on to relate that he remained on the Island with
a view of preventing his master from landing, when he
should arrive, pretending he was on the side of the
negroes
that
his master arrived in a few days, and he
succeeded in getting on board, and acquainted him with
the slaughter of the inhabitants, in which his wife's
parents
fell victims: also the fate of his mistress and her
child.That his master hoisted sail, with him on board,
and visited England and France, and almost every part
of Europe; but never heard more of his wife or child;
concluding that they were cast away or murdered by the
negroes, he gave over the search in despair, and settled
in Havanna; but was often seized with fits of grief that
threatened his life.
And did you stay with your master ever since?
I stay wid she sir.
You are a faithful fellow, (said I) and well entitled
to his regard, I hope he will reward thy fidelity.
Who massa? Ah, massa lub me he do his lifeme
and Dick Jinkin, we dare too.
When we returned to the cabin I found Wilson
laughing
very heartily at something my uncle had said to him.
Oh, he's well enoughye needn't be giving him that
stuff.
He must take it, (said I) it will cool his fever.
Well, thee landsmen knows best what will cure ye
Come Sambo, let's have breakfast, I think the wind has
shifted. Did thee hear the course?
S. S. E. I think, sir.
I hates this tacking business.
After breakfast Sambo produced a back-gammon
table
;
after directing him to go and see to Wilson's broth,
I sat down to play with the old man; but he beat me
every
game. After Wilson drank his broth I told him to
come and try the old colt, for he was too hard for me.
Wilson proving an overmatch for him,
Ah, (said the old gentleman) Dick can beat us all
I'll have him up.
Thus we passed three more days, which brought us to
Havanna. We contrived to amuse the old man during
the time, so as to leave him no opportunity of resuming
the melancholy narrative of his misfortunes.
When we cast anchor my uncle, accompanied by
Wilson
and myself, waited upon the Governor, who
expressed
great satisfaction at the success of the
expedition
,
and invited us to dinner. After dinner Wilson,
and I and the deputy Governor, were directed to see the
prisoners and effects landed.
The specie we weighed, not having time to count it.
In gold and silver there were eight hundred and
seventy-eight
thousand pounds sterling, besides a great quantity
of unwrought gold and silver in ingots. All this
together
with the mules, the prisoners and vessel of the
pirates were delivered to the deputy; only Hunter and
the old woman were retained. Hunter being a citizen
of the United States, my uncle claimed the disposal of
him.
Having delivered a written statement of the prizes we
had made, the governor offered to several of my uncle's
followers liberal presents as some compensation for the
hard service in which they had been engaged. But my
uncle would listen to no offer of the kind. Hunter he
retained
,
and for the old woman he procured a passport
and sent her to Barbadoes, with something in her
pockets
.
According to the directions of my uncle, I
provided
a passage for her to that island, and going down to
the vessel I saw her safe aboard for the place of her
destination
.
When we returned, I found the two old cronies in a
pretty high gale.
Ha! said he to Wilson, we are going to have
another
spree to-nightdo'st think thou can stand the old
colt another bout?We're going to have all the music
in townwhere's Jinkins?
I said he would attend him directly.
Oh, God bless you, my dear sir, said Wilson, do
excuse me to-night; I am not well; I'll set up and sing
for you to-morrow night.
Thou an't well! ah, I knew thou would'st back out
thou can'st not stand service with a tried old sailor.
Getting up and going to Wilson, (who I verily believe
was dissembling) he sat down by him, and taking his
hand, addressed him in the most affectionate terms.
Thou an't sick, child, art thee?
Wilson could not bring himself to impose upon so
much goodness; he smiled as my uncle was, with a
serious
look, endeavouring to ascertain the truth from his
countenance.
Ah, thou art a grand rogue; no more sick than I
bewe'll all be as merry as grigsoho, thou shalt sing
old lang syne.
By this time Jinkins made his appearance.
Oh, there's my boycome and take a full bottle
this is our house to nightwe be the mastersbut prithee,
Jinkins, be Hunter safe?
He is, sir.
I think as we be going to ha' music to-night, and
d'ye see, can't do without thee, better put him aboard our
own ship, release the fellows and put a guard over him.
The company now began to gather. I was glad to
hear that no ladies were to be present, nothing but a
parcel of good hearty souls, as my uncle called them
my poor head you'll go to pot to-night, thought I, but I
comforted myself in thinking it would be the last time I
should be put to such an alternative. Indeed, I felt more
for Wilson than myself, as he was less able to stand it.
I approached him and in a low voice encouraged his
fatigued
spirits by telling him how unmanly it would
appear
to shrink from a participation in this general joy;
that the party was given solely in honour of us; that it
would be cruel not to gratify my uncle with hir presence,
and that after he had sung a few songs I would watch an
opportunity of getting him off upon honourable terms.
He said I would find it very difficult to deceive the
old hero of the isles.
We were now through politeness, obliged to attend to
the music. There were half a dozen of violins, as
many
flutes, flageolets, &c. without number, and two bass
viols. The music was insupportably bad, Sambo and
Jinkins being by far the best performers. Wilson always
sings well, and I perform indifferently on the flute, but
we were borne away with the discordant scraping of
the other performers. In the course of an hour we were
called to partake of a splendid supper, at which no
female
appeared. After supper we returned to the
heterogeneous
collection of noiseswith the exception of a few
tunes they were all new to me; but my uncle who
understood
them, I suspect, was delighted. He also could
speak a little French, while Wilson and I endeavoured
to be good company in bad Spanish. I enjoyed myself
much worse than I expected, Wilson was mad, and my
uncle transported. At length on a sudden he became
much affected. Drawing a chair with me I sat down by
him, and throwing my arm carelessly on the back of his
chair, I pressed his hand and asked him if he was ill.
He shook his head and suppressing his feelings,
that, said he, was my dear Eliza's favourite tune:
but I never finished her story.
Oh, sir, said I, don't enter upon that subject
to-night
,
I had the whole story from Sambomake
yourself
happy. True your loss can never be repaired, but
as far as it is in my power I shall make it the chief
pleasure
of my life to smooth the evening of your age; I
will live with you, and endeavour to fulfil the duties of
a son.
Wilson now approached us, sat down on the other side
of him, and kindly enquired after his health. Fearing
to disturb the company, I left them together and taking
up my flute, the music ceased, and I struck up Yankee
Doodle. To this succeeded a number of our tunes and
by degrees the music gave way to loud talking and
laughter
,
which continued till twelve o'clock. Going to my
uncle I told him that it was quite time for him to retire,
that he would injure his health by such late hours. The
old man made no reply, but giving his hand suffered me
to lead him to his room, where Sambo performed the
rest. I returned to the company who were nearly blind,
and taking Wilson's arm retired without more ceremony.
Next morning I waited upon my uncle before he was
out of bed, and found him far from well. I informed him
that Wilson and I must have some clothes made as quick
as possible, that we were almost destitute of any, and
waited on him for directions where to apply for the
materials
and some one to make them.
To besure, my son, said heprithee, Sambo, get
my clothesheigh-ho, I drank too much o' old Frank's
wine last nightwan't it excellent?tell me. How be
Hal? I got a plaguey head-ache.
I informed him of Wilson's health.
He's a noble fellow, but can't stand service.
By this time he was dressed, and ordering Sambo to
tell the steward to attend him, we walked out in search
of Wilson.
After finding Wilson, my uncle took the necessary
steps for procuring suits of clothes for us both. This he
accomplished in his usual generous manner, and
every
suggestion which our delicacy made, was promptly
obviated by this liberal hearted son of the ocean.
As the time was drawing nigh when we must leave
Havana, I resolved to break the subject of
accompanying
Wilson through Tennessee, to my uncle at once.
After breakfast I called Wilson aside and informed
him of my intention, telling him at the same time to go
to the office of entry and engage our passage to
New-Orleans
at a venture.
Wilson set out to procure a passage, and I with a
heavy heart sought my uncle. Meeting with him in the
parlour I proposed a walk, to which he cheerfully
consented
,
and locking my arm in his we proceeded some
distance before I could bring myself to name the matter
to himI essayed to speak, but the word stuck in my
throatmy uncle in the meantime had commenced a
desultory
conversation on other matters quite foreign to
the point. At length summoning my resolution and
putting
on a serious look, I addressed him in a faultering
voice.
I have a disclosure to make to you, sir, that must
distress you, as it certainly does myself.
He was silentand I proceeded:
It is needless to repeat to you, sir, what I have said
already, that the life you have saved, shall be devoted to
you, and most assuredly it shall, and though the request
I have to make cannot lessen me in your esteem, yet I
fear it will give you pain.
Oh for God's sake to the pointto the pointwhat
dos't want?
12
You know, sir, that Wilson is engaged to my sister;
that he is on his way to wed her if she be alive; you
know that his parents live in Tennessee, and he cannot
think of proceeding on to Boston without calling to see
them after three years' absence. It would be
Can'st thou not tell me what thou would have at
once?
Briefly then my dear sir, he wants me to go with
him.
And be that all?I thought that thou hadst
murdered
somebody, thou began with such gravity. Why as
for Wilson he ought to go and see his parents; but what
dos't want with thee?can't he go by himself?
Sir, if you say so, it
shall
be so; I will not go
without your consent, nor with it, if it grieves you to
part with me. True I love Wilson, I am bound to him
by a thousand obligations; we have lived together our
life time I may say like brothers. He has saved my life at
the hazard of his own. For my sake he concealed
himself
during four long months in the Spanish dominions,
spending most of this time in the woods, and in caves, in
want of every thing, hourly and momently exposed to
the danger of loosing his life, instead of going to visit his
parents, who had at a great expense procured his ransom
from the Spanish dungeon. You are witness yourself,
of his narrow escape from death since that event. It is
for his sake, therefore, that I make this request. The
road is long, lonesome and dangerous.
We'll say no more about it, child; thee can go
thee can goI should ha' been glad for both o'thee to go
with me, but as it is 'suppose can't go'twould be a pity
to part ye, and he's a noble youth too. But my son don't
forget to take a little o'thy uncle to bear thy expenses; I
know thou can't ha' much; thy uncle has plenty, and
'twill all be thine and his together.
Sir, said I, pressing his hand, I neverit was
some time before I had power to addexpected such
goodness as thisthat you were generous I knew, but
this sacrifice was more than I expectedmay heaven
reward
thee, thou best of men.
Our feelings being mutually agitated we spake no
more, but returned in silence. On entering the house, I
asked him when he would set sail?
To-morrow, said he faintly.
Dear uncle, said I, keep up your spirits; we
will reach New-York probably before yourself. You
must be aware how anxious I am to know what has
become
of my poor sister, and Wilson is almost
heart-broken
on her account. I trust we will all meet and be
happy.
Poor Mary, said he sighing deeply, thou wast a
little prattling thing when I saw theebut may be thee
wasn't bornI forget almost about her. But thou did'st
wrong in leaving the poor thing so long.
Oh sir, you are not more sensible of this than I am;
it is an error I shall deplore to my latest hour; but who
could see these events, or who ever did act up to
perfection
?
This pleasure (kissing the dear old man's hand)
repays all my sufferings.
He was greatly agitatedafter pressing my hand in
his with a fervour that bespoke every thing, we entered
the house. Wilson entered in the course of an hour; he
knew by my countenance that I had succeeded, and we
were once more happy. In the evening when wine and
good cheer had restored our spirits, my uncle calling
Hal to him
Ah, said he, thou balked me at last'thought to
a'had thy company, but thou art a good child to go and
see thy parentsCharlesCharleshe blubbered 'cause
I would not let him go; O, he's as cheery since as a lark;
look to him yonder, how bright his eyes shine, 'spose he's
told thee?
He has, sir, said Wilson.
I drew near them and Wilson continued
Your consent has made us both happy, and I trust
we shall soon meet again; I shall just call and stay one
night with my parents and proceed on toHe could say
no more.
Well take care o' my poor boy, and see that thou
runs no more fool's errands.
Oh bless you, sir, we need no caution on that head I
hope; sad experience has taught us a lesson that I dare
say will last us to the end of our lives.
Next morning we waited on my uncle (who was ready
to embark) for the purpose of taking leave of him on our
embarkation for New Orleans. The Governor had
taken
care to convey on board our vessel, several articles
of sea stores as a mark of his regard for us; and my
uncle
being determined to be generous himself in spite of
our delicacy, insisted that we should accept several
presents
in money, which he had prepared for us. He
would listen to no denial.
The boat had now arrived that was to convey us to our
ship, and now came another trial. After a few minutes
silence, during which we all gave way to our feelings:
Dearest of men, said I embracing my uncle, we
wait for your blessing.
God bless you, my child, said he, sobbing aloud as
he pressed me to his bosom. Wilson followed my
example
.
He walked with us a few paces, observing that if
it wasn't for shame, he would go with us, but that his
freight was valuable, and the coast dangerousand I
hates to let the boys go by themselves.
We squeezed his hand once more and stepped into the
boat. After gaining our own vessel the same boat
conveyed
him to his, and whilst the hands were unmooring
our ships, we stood on our respective decks enjoying the
sight of each other as long as possible. The wind,
however
,
being in favour of my uncle, he was soon borne
from our viewthe last I saw, was the old man waiving
his hat, which being returned by us, we hastened to the
cabin to assuage those melancholy feelings which a
parting
of this kind generally creates.
CHAPTER XIV.
Our
voyage to New-Orleans was tedious; although
we took a smaller vessel when we gained the mouth of
the Mississippi, it was twenty days in all before we
reached New-Orleans. Here we procured horses,
saddles
,
and saddle-bags, and set out without delay for
Tennessee
.
Our horses were good and we spared them not.
Nothing worthy of remark happened during our
journey
,
which we accomplished in nineteen days.
It was just dusk when we arrived before the gate of
Captain Wilson. For the sake of the jest, and actuated by
curiosity we concluded to pass for strangers, being
almost
sure that none of the family would recognize our
persons. Accordingly we hailed the house, a servant
came and opened the gate, we rode into the yard and
dismounted
.
The old gentleman who was standing at the
door to receive us, called to the servant and directed him
to bring the gentlemen's saddle-bags in the house,
politely invited us to walk in. We apologized for
intruding
,
saying we were benighted, and begged for leave to
spend the night with him.
Certainly, certainly, gentlemenI am proud of
your company, glad you called.
He then invited us to refresh ourselves with a little
spirits
and water, without the least recognition of our persons.
My dear, said he to his wife, have supper got for
the gentlemen.
[9]
[9]
This is the case universally in the western states, to their honour be it recorded, both
with gentle and simple. A stranger is hospitably entertained by all descriptions of
people
,
and the traveller never hesitates to call for a night's lodging at any private house.
The old lady arose accordingly, and went out to give
the necessary orders. When she left us, the Captain
commenced the common topics, such as the weather,
roads, &c. Meantime a negro girl of about twelve
years of age, seemed to eye Wilson very attentively; it
struck me at the time that she had some knowledge of
her young master. After staring at him some time, she
12*
withdrew, and in a few minutes Mrs. Wilson came in,
and looking in her son's face very earnestly, exclaimed,
My sonmy sonit is my Henry! and rushed into
his arms.
The Captain was thunderstruck, and sat as though he
was nailed to his seat. At length he got up and shook
us cordially by the hand, reproving us for playing the
cheatbut any how I am glad to see youglad to see
youcouldn't tell what had become of you.
Here, said he to a servant, take the keysset the
cellar door opentell every body to come and rejoice.
He ran to and fro like one distractedthe servants,
field negroes and all poured into the house, which rang
with acclamations of joy. Massa Henry's come
massa Henry's come. The little girl I know'd him
fus, I know'd him fa' all he look so sly out o' he eyes.
After the tumult subsided, Mrs. Wilson related the
circumstance which led to the discovery. She said the
little girl already mentioned, came to her in the kitchen
and said.
Mistress, dat dare man what got on de whitish
coloured
surtout look mighty like massa Henry.
He does? said Mrs. Wilson.
Yes, madam, he do so, and I do tink it is him, if
didn't look so old.
Mrs. Wilson soon had a sumptuous supper prepared,
and the Captain invited his nearest neighbours to come
and rejoice with him over his lost son.
In the meantime we gave a summary of all our bad
and good fortune, which have already been detailed. I
thought the old lady seemed to dwell with most pleasure
on that part of it which promised so favourably in
behalf
of the connection, which was to take place between
the two families.
Poor man, she was sorry for his loss, (meaning my
uncle) but such things will happen.
As a proof of my uncle's intentions towards her son,
Henry ordered his saddle-bags to be brought to him, and
taking out a bag of guineas which he had received from
my uncle, and which he had never opened, threw it into
his mother's lap, saying,
I hope, madam, that will indemnify you and my
father
for the expense you have incurred on my account,
though it never can obliterate that distress of mind
which both must have suffered.
Why dear me, what's all this? said she, weighing
it in her hand.
I don't know how much there is. Commodore
Burlington
forced it on me, and I never opened it since it
has been in my possession.
Well he is certainlywhy there must be a great deal
here. (untying the bag and pouring the contents on the
table.) My stars, and all guineas too!
Pshaw! said the old man, what a fuss you always
make about money now. I never cared for money in
my life.
Here old man, do count it.
Faith, I'll not, said he, you may count it
yourself
.
Finding she was anxious to know the amount. I sat
down and counted it for her; there were nine hundred
and ninety-seven. I told her I would make it even
money, and putting my hand in my pocket took out
three more, which made it a thousand guineas.
Oh, dear sir, you are quite too kind, I declareI
have now more than I shall ever find use for.
She continued to poize them backwards and forwards,
admiring them with great satisfaction, until her husband
laughed at her for being so childish. He asked where
she intended to keep them?
My dear, you must hide them better than you did
your butter money.
Indeed I will, she answered.
I will tell you a good story, said the old man,
about your mother.
I was sorry to hear this, as it grew near bed-time, and
his stories were at any time, rather long and dull.
Last fall she was gone a visiting somewhere, I don't
remember now exactly the place; but it happened that I
was sent for to town, to assist at a meeting, for the
purpose
of nominating commissioners to settle a dispute that
had arisen between us and the Cherokee Indians. Some
of our people had encroached upon their lands(I began
to gape and shut my eyes)Well she was gone, I wanted
clean clothesdidn't know what to dohated to go as I
wasI expected to see every body dressed up, and she
had the keys. Upon reflection, I bethought myself of a
key, that opened the drawersIt belonged to the desk
(I desired the servant who waited to pull off my boots.)
Stop, says I, believe I can open themput in the key
(Wilson had his boots drawn)and sure enough opened
them as sleek as you please. Well, I turns over the
things to find my clothes, and what should I come across
but the old woman's bag of dollarsshe wont look at a
bank noteOh, my lad, says I, I'll fix you.
I then took out the bag of dollars, and locked them up
my private drawer, thinking to have some fun when
she came home. Well, so it passed on for three or
four weeks(I rested my head upon my hand)at last,
to cut my story short, she went to put away more butter
money, and here we had it
My dear, somebody has stolen every cent of my
money.
They have! said I.
Yes, they have taken every dollar.
Wilson's patience being exhausted, he put a stop to
the story by saying, indeed father it was wrong in you to
plague my mother so.
Well, gentlemen, I observed, I think it's time to
retire.
Oh, it is quite early yet, replied the old
gentleman
.
Finally we got leave to retire; we chose to sleep in the
same room, though presented with two. Upon gaining
our chamber I applauded my friend for his generosity
to his mother. I never thought of the thing myself,
but it was just what I would have done: indeed it was
a very poor return for that affliction of mind his parents
must have suffered on his account, and though money
could have been no object with them yet still the action
had a charm in it which could not fail to win upon the
heart. I now accounted for his not changing his gold in
New-Orleans, which I did, being unwilling to carry
such a ponderous load.
I shall sponge upon you now, he said, and well
he might.
Before going to sleep we held a consultation
respecting
the time we should set out for Boston. I observed
we should find more difficulty in obtaining his parents'
consent to leave them so soon as we designed, than we
did in obtaining my uncle's.
Wilson was of my opinionI proposed setting out on
Friday: this was Wednesday; one day I conceived was
as much as we could spare, adding, that if any accident,
through my neglect, had befallen my sister, I should be
forever miserable. This affected Wilson like an electric
shockit roused all his energy, which was turned
principally
against me. He walked the floor with hasty
steps, and exclaimed,
You have put me on the rack, Charles, I shall sleep
none to night.
I told him calmly that we had much better deliberate
on the ways and means to obtain the consent of his
parents
,
and asked him which of us he thought possesed the
most courage, as it required no small share to make the
attempt.
I will, he exclaimed, I will myself, I will insist
upon their consentI will demand it boldly, to-morrow
it shall be done.
Very good, I replied, I am pleased to see you so
resolute, it's more than half the battle, go to sleep now
and dream of happinessIn two or three weeks you
will have your bride in your arms, and poor I shall
have none. I have a great mind to return and seek my
Leanora instead of going with a man that's stark mad,
and will be whining all the way about a bit of a girl
shame on you!
Next morning I hid Wilson get up and let's see how
courageously he would carry his resolution into effect.
Oh, Charles, do you open the subject, do you begin
it, you can say the obligations your under to meet your
uncle, you can name the condition upon which you
obtained
his consent to accompany me, and how hazardous
it would have been had I undertaken the journey alone;
in short you are much better in the art of persuasion
than I am. The first word I should attempt to speak
would choke me, and then my mother's tearsconsider
that! Oh, I shall never do it, I shall depend on you,
indeed
help
me out this time, dear Charles.
After laughing at him for his bravado over night. I
told him to cheer up, that I would do all that lay in my
power; in short, that I would not go without him, and
desired he would be ready by the next day; in the mean
time I should ride over to Mr 's to enquire for
letters, and should take occasion to mention the subject
of our departure that morning.
Accordingly next morning I proposed a walk to Capt.
Wilson to look at our horsesHenry declined going
when we arrived at the lot where our horses were
feeding
I
believe sir, (said I) if you will lend me a horse
to ride to Mr. 's I will let my poor fellow rest
to-day, as I intend to set out for Boston to-morrow.
Not going to leave us so soon?
I must go sir, indeed; consider how long it is since
I left my sister, heaven knows what has become of her,
she may be dead, or in some extremity. I am going
over to Mr. 's, perhaps I may hear something
about herbut the worst of it is, I am going to take
your son along with me.
Oh, Lord, sir, that's out of the questionhis
mother
would run crazy; can't you stay this week and start
on Monday? a day or two will make no difference.
I cannot indeed sir; I pledged my honour to my
uncle
that, provided he would consent to let me accompany
your son to Tennessee, we would just call to see you and
proceed on to meet him in New-York; and from thence
we are all to proceed to Boston together.I hope, sir,
you will not act more ungenerous towards me than he
did towards your son. When we represented to him the
dangers of the roads he had to travel, I suspected he
himself would have accompanied him, rather than have
him travel alone.
Indeed it was very kind, very generous! I wish
you had brought him with you; how I should like to see
him! I'll be bound he's a hearty soulI'll see what can
be doneI have no objection on my own account; but
his motherWell, she'll only cry a little, and that she
would do if he was to stay a month with her.I suppose
Henry is going to bring a wife with him this time.
I only surmise so, I can't tellperhaps he may
But let me have a horse, sir, I am anxious to know
whether there are any letters from Boston.
He ordered a horse and we returned to the house.
Wilson examined my countenance with a scrutinizing
look, when we entered the house, but whether he made
any satisfactory discovery in it, or the contrary, he has
never informed me, as an event turned up in the course
of the day that almost deprived us both of our senses.
CHAPTER XV.
Upon
my arrival at Mr. 's I found two letters
from my sister.The first was dated
May
15
th
, 1808.
Dearest Charles
I received your kind letter of November last, in
which you congratulated me on my happy asylumalas,
my dear brother! this proves how little you know of the
worldmuch better, had it pleased Divine Providence,
that I had followed my parents to the grave! Much
better
for me, had I been destitute of those advantages, to
which alone, perhaps, I owe my present distress. But
I will try and compose myself, if it be possible, for the
purpose of acquainting you with the principal incidents
which have happened to me of late.
For six months after you left me, the Simpsons
behaved
toward me with all the attention I had a right to
expect; the substance of which I communicated to you,
in a letter, to which your last was an answer; but since
then they have proved themselves traitors of the
blackest
die.
I should have apprised you sooner of their conduct,
and that of their accomplice, Hunter, the son of the
wretch who broke the hearts of my parents; but
knowing
your temper I did not wish to involve you in a
quarrel
that might cost you your life, (my last and only stay)
but could not undo the past. No, to that God to whom
vengeance belongs let us leave them.
Notwithstanding the overstrained politeness of the
Simpsons, I could discern from the first a great degree
of pride and contempt towards me, particularly when
any of the young gentlemen of the neighbourhood would
call to spend a leisure hour of an evening. It
sometimes
happened that these young men would prefer my
company and conversation to that of the Simpsons (God
knows I would gladly have dispensed with the honour.)
On those occasions, I could perceive their sly significant
looks, the contemptuous nods and whispers.When the
gentlemen would retire I was called the belleno
beaux for themwe stand no chance where Mary is!
All this I could have borne, but the hateful addresses of
young Simpson were insupportable. Being tutored to
this by his sisters. I could get no peace for him;
he would intrude into my chamber, and take such
liberties
that I had resolved to quit the house. For several
days I had kept myself locked up in my room, to avoid
this detested coxcomb, scarcely taking the necessary
sustenance, and whenever I left the chamber for this
purpose, I was sure to meet with insults from the sisters,
and impertinence from the brother.
Oh, miss is very coy sometimes, if it were such
a one, or such a one, she would be more
condescending
.
Though I bore this usage in silence, yet my heart
was full of grief, and my eyes with tears.
One evening while I was deliberating where I should
go, or what I should do, I heard the family sitting down
to supper without taking the least notice of me! I had
not been insulted so often as to be callous to this fresh
indignity
.
After the clattering of knives and forks had ceased,
I walked down stairs for a candle and a glass of water.
In passing through the supper-room, from which the
company had not withdrawn. I discovered several
gentlemen
of my acquaintance, who saluted me as I passed
on to the closet, which contained the candles.
I returned their salute with a silent bow, without
seating
myself or being invited to do so; and as I returned I
discovered the son of our old enemy, (Hunter) amongst
the number of guests, with his eyes bent on me. I
averted
my face from the group as quick as possible, and
withdrew
to my chamber with a trembling step and
beating
heart.
I heard the girls gigling a forced laugh behind me,
poor souls! how truly low they appeared in my eyes at
that instant.I need not tell you how I spent the night;
my dear Charles will enter too readily into my feelings:
13
I resolved, however, that it should be the last day I would
spend in the house.
The next morning before breakfast I stepped across
the street to a Mr. F's, with whom I had a slight
acquaintance, and begged him to aid me in procuring
another lodging, or house to board at, until my brother
would either come or send for me, saying that I could not
be happy at Mr. Simpson's.
He appeared surprised, and asked me what was the
matter. I replied, that my reasons I wished to
conceal
,
at least until the arrival of my brother; that I had
few friends in the place, and wished to say as little about
the family as possible; that it was a question he could
not expect me to answer, and that if he felt disposed to
aid me, it were well; if not, I would intrude no longer
upon him. I was much hurt that he met my confidence
with such cold indifference.
He said he would
see about it
, but at present he could
not think of any place that would suit me. He and his
family were sitting at breakfast; they invited me to sit
down with them, but I could not, although I had eaten
nothing since the preceding morning. After breakfast
he took his hat and walked out; I imagined he was gone
to engage a place for me, and resolved to await his
return
.
He returned in about a half an hour, but I discovered
from his countenance that he had done nothing for me
Not wishing to protract my visit any longer, I asked
him if he had succeeded.
He replied that he had not tried, as he had had a
great deal of business of his
own
to attend. I did not
wait to hear the end of the sentence, but left the house,
surmising what I afterwards found to be true, that he
had been to Simpson's, and they had prejudiced him
against me.
The Miss Simpsons had been in the habit of borrowing
money of me, until they had nearly deprived me of all
that you gave me at partingat length I was
constrained
to deny them; indeed, I had but very little left. I
know you will blame me for this part of my conduct, but
my dear brother you little know the sacrifices a poor
friendless female is compelled to make, to secure
tolerable
treatment from a brutish world. I now resolved to
demand my money, as well as my necklace and rings,
which I had lent the girls to show out at balls and other
public places. Accordingly, when I returned to their
house, I walked to the young ladies' parlour, and there
I beheld again the hated Hunter in close conversation
with them. Telling Clarissa, the oldest, that I wished
to speak with her, she got up and came towards me. On
getting beyond the hearing of those in the parlour, I was
going to speak, when I heard the old lady say,
I wonder where her ladyship has been gossiping
last evening and this morning; she has not been either
to tea or breakfast.
Advancing a step or two in that direction whence the
voice proceeded, I replied,
If you mean me, madam, I was in my chamber last
night. I did not come to tea because I was not sent for;
I have been abroad this morning, but I don't consider
myself accountable to you for my conduct.
I then turned to Miss Simpson and told her I was in
want of money, and would be glad if she could return
the trifle I had loaned her.
Oh dear, is that what you wanted?Indeed, you
might have saved yourself the trouble, for I haven't got
any money; indeed, I never thought of such a trifle
since.
She was walking off, when I addressed her again:
You say very true, madam, when you call the money
I lent you a trifle; but I am in want even of that trifle.
Finding that she continued to proceed without paying
further attention to me, I followed her up.
Well, madam, let me have my necklace and rings
which I lent you some time since.
I know nothing about your old rings or your
necklace
;
ask Matilda about them. I haven't time to be
standing here all dayI've something else to do. At
the same time she had two of the rings on her fingers.
The old lady now appearedMa, don't you think
she has the assurance to claim these rings that you
know pa bought for me at the auction two years ago.
Why, really these are fine doings; indeed, miss,
you'll take the command of the house next. I wish Mr.
Simpson were at home, to know what's to be done, I'm
sorry he ever took you into the house.
Yes, I wish pa was herehe'd turn her out of doors.
You may seek another home, rejoined the mother:
fine doings indeedI'll have no such doings about my
house.
Madam, said I, I lent your daughters money
and jewels; I am in want of them, and I now demand
them; and as for leaving your house, I intended to do so
very shortly.
Get out of my house; begone this instant, you
impudent
wretch, nor dare to repeat your lies.
Yes, indeed mama, she is the biggest liar in the
world.
I turned away from them and walking up stairs,
locked
up my things in my trunk, walked down stairs again,
and without saying a word to the family, left the house.
I remember gaining the street, and a giddiness in my
head, but no more! When I recovered my senses, I
found myself in a strange house, and two ladies (God I
hope will reward them) were standing by me, one with
hartshorn in her hand, the other with a glass of wine.
To their kind enquiries I gave satisfactory answers,
concealing nothing but the name of the people who had
treated me so cruelly. On telling them how long it had
been since I had eaten any thing, toast and tea were
prepared
for me in a few minutes.
After eating I felt quite restored. Mrs. Cary (that
was the lady's name) said she happened to be standing
in the door and seeing a gentleman running apparently as
fast as he could, she stepped out to see what was the
matter. On observing me extended on the pavement,
she likewise ran, telling Martha (her daughter) to bring
the hartshorn. This gentleman and herself brought me
into her house, where I soon recovered.
This widow lady (for a widow she is) has offered me
an asylum in her house. She is indigent, but humanity
itself; she has one child only, a daughter, but she is a
treasure; she is an angel in human shape.
In the evening as we were sitting down to tea, a
gentle
rap was heard at the door: it was opened by
Martha
,
and a gentleman entered the parlour.
I beg pardon, ladies, for intruding: but I came to
see how this young lady is.
Was it to you, sir, said I, that I am so much
indebted
?
He made no answer, except by a modest bow.
I thanked him as I ought, and told him I had a brother
who would be proud to acknowledge the obligation,
should he ever be so happy as to see him.
The gentleman said he hoped I would command him
in any thing; that his name was Dupon, and that he
hoped I would honour him with my confidence. He took
a cup of tea, and after chatting with us an hour or two,
departed.
Next morning I sent for my trunks, and endeavoured
to be happy. The third evening after this, as Martha
and myself were sitting at work, a little boy came in
and handing me a paper disappeared. It ran in these
words: A stranger at No.  has a message from Miss
Burlington's brother. He is confined, otherwise he
would have done himself the pleasure of waiting upon
her.
I flew to the place, enquired for the stranger, who was
`up in a chamber.' Show me the way, said I.
Upon
entering the room, I found no one. I turned to come
out, when a man rushed in, and the door locked on the
outside! It was Hunter! I shrieked as loud as I was
able. At that instant a voice exclaimed on the outside,
Villain, desist, and open the door this instant.
The key is on the outside, said I.
There is no key here.
Then break the door down.
If he does, I'll blow him to hl, said the ruffian
Hunter.
The door flew open and I made my escape.
Run up stairs, for God's sake, or murder will be
done, said I to two gentlemen whom I saw on gaining
the street.
My re-appearance, so sudden, and with looks so pale,
13*
alarmed Mrs. Cary and her sympathizing daughter. I
told them what had happened, and resolved never to go
out alone again. It is unnecessary for me to make any
comments on my situation; you must think what I feel;
you must pity me; you must succour me; fly to me as
quick as possible, my dear Charles.
When I became sufficiently composed we sat down to
supper, and my dear brother, who should enter but my
kind deliverer Dupon.
Do not be alarmed, ladies, I came to see how Miss
Burlington was, and reproach her for not waiting to
thank me this evening.
He had several drops of blood on his bosom, which he
endeavoured to conceal, and his face was much bruised.
That I thanked him you are sure, but what are thanks
when put in competition with his life and my safety?
Heaven has certainly appointed him my guardian angel.
He informed us that he apprehended some mischief from
a partial discovery of the plot in the morning, while
sitting
in a reading room. As he was reading a newspaper
he overheard two men (who sat near him) conversing
earnestly in a low voice; a few words only of the subject
caught his ear, viz: No.  in street at sunset
Burlington
and I'll be revenged.
He knew the house to be ours from referring to a
memorandum
he made in his pocket book upon the day on
which he carried me to it out of the street, and hearing
my name pronounced, he mistrusted some evil. I
hovered
near your dwelling, said he, the whole of the
afternoon
,
taking care to be armed. I saw a boy go into
the house at the time mentioned, and shortly after saw
you come out of it and walk very fast up the street. I
followed you at a short distance, keeping my eye upon
youI was close at your heels when you entered the
house. I entered it almost at the same instant, and heard
the direction given to you to walk up stairs. I was so
close behind you that I heard the door shut and the key
turn, and gained the door the moment you shrieked out
for help. I met an elderly female near the door, and
had I known at the moment it was her who carried off
the key, I would have sacrificed her upon the spot. I
began to shiver the door with all my strength, when the
old woman soon ran to me with the key, and you made
your escape. I was so much enraged with the ruffian
that I should have shot him dead on the spot, had the
old woman not caught my arm; the moment he
discovered
this, he flew at me and attempted to wrest the
pistol
out of my hand, but finding the attempt fruitless, he
struck me on the face, whilst I was engaged in shaking
off the old woman. The moment he struck me. I kicked
him down, and as he attempted to rise I kicked him again
on the nose, and the blood gushing out I got a few drops
on my vest. Just as I gave him the second kick, two
gentlemen ran into the room and separated us. Hunter
(that is his name) is committed, and I am held to bailI
expect to be acquitted if I could prevail on myself to
have the testimony of Miss
Before he finished the sentence I interrupted him,
saying
that nothing would give me more pleasure than to
attend his trial.
I shall not conclude this, until the trial is over, which
is to-morrow at ten o'clock. From the description he
gave us of the other man, it must have been young
Simpson.
The trial is overDupon is acquitted and Hunter
committed
for further investigation. The old woman, who
it appears, kept a house of suspicious character, has
likewise
been taken up. I shall expect you soon. Your
very distressed sister.
M. BURLINGTON.
The other letter was as follows:
Dear Charles
What has become of you? Have you forgot your
Mary? Are you alive? Oh, for heaven's sake send me
but one line, but one wordI ask no more. But it is in
vainyou cannot be livingwhat has become of
Wilson
?
has he too forgot me? Alas then, I have no friend!
ye cannot both be dead!but I will cease to complain
Oh that God would take me to himself! There was but
twobut no matterand yet I cannot think that if
living
,
you would forget me. My last letter you never
answered
I
heeded that not, as I expected to see yourself.
I looked not for a letter, but I looked in vain for either.
This is the last I shall trouble you with; I shall ask no
more for help, where no help is to be found.
In my last I disclosed enough to move a brother's
affection
;
to move a brother's pity; to awaken a brother's
honour. But my once, and ever dear Charles, that
disclosure
was only the beginning of sorrows. Though I
despair of aid from you, yet it will relieve my oppressed
heart, to pour out its feelings, whether you regard them
or not.
Taking up my calamitous story where I left off in my
last letter to you, I continued to reside with Mrs. Cary
better than three months; during which time the family
was often visited by Dupon, and sometimes by other
young gentlemen of his, and Mrs. Cary's acquaintance.
Dupon in his various visits it appeared, had declared
himself an admirer of Miss Martha. But I pass over
things of no consequence, to those which ought to
concern
a brother deeply for a suffering sister. Briefly
then, the Simpsons I suspect (for I have given myself to
trouble to trace it up) reported that Mrs. Cary kept a
house of equivocal characterthat is in a better way,
and not upon so general or notorious a plan as such
houses
are kept. Dupon lay under suspicions with Mrs.
Cary. This report was long in circulation before its
innocent
subjects had the least knowledge of it. Whether
Dupon had any intimation of it or not must remain a
matter of conjecture, as he left the countrycertain it
is, that he for some time before his departure, was less
frequent in his visits, and appeared thoughtful, and more
distant than upon our first acquaintance. He left this
place suddenly for the West Indies, where it seems he
had some important business to transact. Whether this
change in his behaviour, towards the family of Mrs.
Cary, was the effect of distrust, or proceeded from a
desire
to avoid giving grounds for suspicion is equally
doubtful.
Before his departure he gave Mrs. Cary a draft for
five hundred dollars. This act of benevolence proved
a source of overwhelming distress to us all. Her
drawing
the money was proof, strong as holy writ, of her
guilt; it confirmed the report, and poor Mrs. Cary, as
innocent as an angel, was now stigmatized the worst of
characters. But I will try to use some connection.A
few mornings after she drew the money, as we were
sitting
down to breakfast, Mr.  who owned the
house she lived in, came inhe refused to be seated; but
in a very peremptory manner bid her quit his house,
adding
that he had rented it to another person; that he
desired
no such person as she was to live in a house of his
or so near to that in which his family residedto be
plain with you, madam, I shall suffer no such people to
live near me!
This address was like a clap of thunder; the cup
dropped from Mrs. Cary's hand
What is that you say sir? such persons live near
youas he turned his back upon her with a
contemptuous
good morning ladies.
It having struck me instantly that I was the cause of
this unmerited reproach, I sprang after him, caught
him by the breast of his coat, and implored him in a flood
of tears to tell me what Mrs. Cary was accused ofmy
dear sir, tell me, I live with her, it concerns me.
He interrupted me with begone you viperyou
would seduce me too, pushing me roughly from him.
I got into the house, I know not how.
What did he say? enquired Martha, as I entered
the door.
Give me my bonnet, Martha, said her mother
with great composure, though as pale as death.
Dear madam, said I, do take some refreshment
before you walk, you have eat nothing yet, pouring out
a cup of tea for her as I spoke.
No Mary my child, none to-day, I cannot
I entreated her, but she gently pushed the cup from
her. While Martha was putting on her bonnet and
shawl, I approached her with a glass of wine, spilling
great part of it, with my trembling handsDrink
this, then, said I, or you will faint in the street.
That would never do, said she, taking the wine
Dupon is not here to aidme.
She then stepped into the street and was absent,
perhaps
,
an hour. While she was gone Martha and
myself
indulged in mutual condolence, suggesting a
thousand
conjecturesmy suspicion, however, fastened on
the Simpsons.
When Mrs. Cary returned she threw herself into a
chair, and burst into a flood of tears! Martha sat down
by her, drying her own eyes and endeavouring to
comfort
her mother. I walked the floor in a state of
distraction
,
calling on the Almighty to defend the innocent
hapless widow. I bewailed my hard fate in being the
cause of such bitter distress; I remonstrated with him,
that he did not rather let it all fall on me; I called aloud
upon youOh, my brother, how cheerfully I would
have met death at that moment!
When Mrs. Cary's grief had somewhat subsided, I
threw myself on a chair before her, and taking her
hands in mineI am the unfortunate wretch, madam,
that has brought this distress upon you, my dear
mother
,
for you are more than mother to mecan you ever
forgive me? do you not repent your kindness towards
me?
Forgive you, child? you are guilty of no fault; but
my children we must leave this place. No, Mary, if it
were to do again, I would act the same part which I
have
She was interrupted by a knocking at the door; I
opened it and a woman entered whom I had often seen at
Simpsons, and had marked her as an ignorant, vain,
steel-hearted gossip, always retailing scandal. She
had called twice or three times at Mrs. Cary's since I
had made it my home.
Hey day, says she, what's the matter?
None of us making her an answer, she stayed but a
short time. She was, no doubt, sent by the Simpsons,
who wished to enjoy our distress.
Mrs. Cary then went on to relate, that in the first
place she went to see a Mr.  whom she had always
considered in the light of a friendhe was not at home,
he had set out the preceding day for Philadelphia. Not
wishing to mention her distress to his wife, she left the
house, and on her return called to see a Mrs. Jones, a
poor but humble friend, who had received many marks
of Mrs. Cary's bounty, and always appeared what she
really was, grateful and sincere. To her Mrs. Cary
related the shocking incident of the morning, and
begged
Mrs. Jones if she knew any thing respecting it,
that she would conceal nothing from her.
Mrs. Jones then related to her what I have already
observed abovethat Mrs. Cary carried on a guilty
commerce with a chosen few, that she had taken into her
house a young woman of suspicious character; that
Dupon
was one of her favourite paramours; that she had
heard young Simpson sayBy Gd Miss needn't a
made such a demned fuss when Hunter! Oh, virtue,
thrice empty name! Can you stand this, Charles?
can you suffer your orphan sister's reputation to be
blasted
thus? I do not ask you, I would not have you risk your
safety in a quarrel with these wretchesNo, but I would
have you take me away from here.
I pass over three weeks, which were weeks of
suffering
indeed! Although I suffered on a double account,
yet I lost my own griefs in my assiduity to console the
afflicted Mrs. Cary and her daughter, whom it was
evident
incurred this reproach on my account.
Mrs. Cary resolved to remove to Philadelphia, an
old acquaintance of her father whom she knew in better
days, lived in that cityhe had written many friendly
letters to her, inviting her to come and reside there.
She proposed taking me with her if I wished to go, and
share her fortune, let it be what it might. Yes,
madam
,
said I, thanking her, I will never forsake you. Our
clothes were packed up; the day was set for our
departure
.
In the mean time I determined to make one more
effort
to obtain my dear departed mother's necklace from
the Simpsons. The money I cared nothing about; but
to leave Boston without the necklace, was like tearing
the heart out of my body. I plucked up resolution enough
to sit down and write to old Mr. Simpson, who, to do
him justice, is not a bad man, if it were not for the
subjection
in which he is held by his wife.
I disclosed the whole business, which had hitherto
been kept a secret from him. Mrs. Jones, the friend of
Mrs. Cary, undertook to deliver the letter. I informed
Mr. Simpson that I was about to leave Boston, and that
the money his daughters borrowed of me they were
welcome
to keep; but the necklace and rings I must have,
as they were all that remained to me of my dear
mother
.
Mrs. Jones said, when the old gentleman read the
letter, he was very angry, and commanded them to send
the jewels.
It is, said he, a darnation shame to detain any
thing belonging to her.
By Ned, said young Simpson, that's a pretty
high move.
The old woman joined with him, she is an
impudent
liar; Clarissa bought the necklace from her, she
gave her another for it, and a pea-green silk dress, as
good as new.
Yes, indeed papa, that is the truth, I wish I had
mine back again.
But the moneywhat did you want?
She's a lying slut.
Mrs. Jones said they all fell on the old man
Finally
,
Charles, not to trouble you further, I had to
leave Boston without them.
The day arrived when we were to leave Boston
our trunks were in the front roomwe had breakfasted
Mrs. Cary had put on her bonnet to go and pay the
rent, and deliver up the keys of the house; but an officer
stepped in and seized the trunks; Mrs. Cary now paid
to him the rent, and also his fee.
Nothing remained for us but to set out as soon as
possible. Our trunks were conveyed on boardI sent
Betsey, the only domestic Mrs. Cary had, and who
determined
not to forsake us, for a bottle of wine; we left
out three glasses for the purpose of taking something to
enable us to walk to the vessel.
Mrs. Jones was with usthe wine camewe took
a glass roundnot a word was uttered. We walked
along silent and slow. Mrs. Jones, the only kind friend
we had, walked with us. I am now on board.Mrs.
Jones takes this to the Post-Office.
Your heart-broken Sister.
Inured as I was to misfortunes, my fortitude entirely
forsook me under this new calamity. To describe my
feelings would be mockery I remember nothing until
I arrived at Captain Wilson's houseI threw the letters
to Wilson, telling him we must set out as soon as
possible
.
He ran them hastily over, and bursting into
exclamations
of rage and indignation against all mankind, said
he was ready. I pitied Wilsonhe was frantic; I took
the letters from him and handed them to Captain
Wilson
,
telling him I must set out directly.
What? said the old man.
Read the letter, said I, and taking Wilson's arm
I lead him out of the house. We traversed the yard
backwards and forwards without speaking a word. At
length a negro came to us and said,
Mistress says you can't start till arter dinner, at
any rate; your clothes are wet and they wont be ready
in time.
I consented to wait till after dinner: though my own
grief was pungent enough, it was swallowed up by that
of Wilson's. I attempted to rally his spirits once more,
by telling him I would go into the house, and make the
old Pattawattama Chief (as Captain Wilson was often
called) produce his
Redstone
.
Come in, said I, we'll drown our sorrow in the
bowl.Dragging him into the house, I requested his
father to give us some of his best.
The old Redstone soon sparkled on the table, with loaf
sugar, nutmeg and water. I told him that Henry
seemed
rather in low spirits, and I had prescribed a bumper
of toddy.
Oh, it's the best thing in the world for it. I had
one
I was afraid of another long story, and interrupted
him by asking if he had any wine? that Wilson was
so much of a woman he would not drink enough of the
old Pennsylvania.
Wine was soon produced, but we declined it till
dinner
,
and all three took a very liberal glass of toddy. I
knew I would pay for it, but I was little concerned for
14
consequences. I would as soon have died as not, yet
still I had to appear cheerful to keep Wilson in heart.
The glass went round pretty brisk, and we were about
half-seas-over before dinner. I expected to see the old
man knocked up, but he was too tough.
The cloth was laid, and Captain Wilson ordered our
horses; he directed Ned to saddle old Tory for him. He
would go with us as far asto see us on our way.
Stay all night, and we'll have a spree, boys; I'll
knock all these hypo-notions out o' your heads. I
wouldn't give a cent for a man that would grieve about
any thing. I'll spend one more night with you, and
we'll be as merry as hay-makers, when the sun shines.
The old lady now made her appearance with a bottle
in one hand, and wiping her eyes on her apron with the
other, slid the bottle on the table. This was the farewell
treat, as no doubt she had heard the orders given to saddle.
Oh yes, said the old man, there's something good,
boys, I expect. The dl a drop would I have got of it
if you hadn't a come; she would a' kept it seven years
longer for Henry.
Upon tasting it, it proved to be luscious raspberry
bounce, which the Virginia ladies are so famed for
making
.
In the meantime dinner was servedour clothes
were ready. They are packed upNed has our horses
at the gate, together with old Tory and one for himself.
Wilson and his father had concluded while I was absent
in the morning, that we had better take the stage at
KnoxvilleNed was going on with us to bring back the
horses.
After the word that
all
was ready, there was a
long pause I stepped to the table, and filling the
glasses
,
invited Mrs. Wilson to pledge me in a glass of her
bounce: telling Wilson and his father to unite in a
stirrup-cup, and let us be off, as it was growing late.
The old lady approached, her eyes red with weeping;
she picked up the glass, and carrying it slowly to her
lips, with a faultering voice wished us a pleasant journey,
and turned off the glass, at which some of your affected
ladies would have made a hundred excuses. The others
having followed our example, I stepped up to Mrs.
Wilson
and taking her by the hand, desired her to be of good
cheer, that we would soon return and tire her out. I
then walked out and mounted my horse; the old
gentleman
soon followedbut Henry! alas! his mother hung
to himhe walked to the gatehe walked through the
gateNow poor Mrs. Wilson I felt for herI could see
her heart beat. The old man seeing Henry's hesitation,
exclaimed, dn it, don't be standing there all day,
like a goslin by the side of a goose; kiss your mother
and come along. This was enoughWilson was soon
alongside.
CHAPTER XVI.
I admire
a man of independence. Had it been
otherwise
with Captain Wilson, this day would have been
a day of perplexity to us all. There is as much
difference
between the poor, pitiful, mean-spirited wretch,
who is subject to his wife, and the man who nobly
maintains
his own prerogative, as there is between the reptile
that creeps on the ground, and the noble Lion.
Henry rode in the van in silence; the old man and
myself rode side by side, while Ned brought up the rear.
I roused Wilson from his profound meditation, by asking
him how he came on?
Oh he'll do well enough, now he's got clear of the
old woman; no danger of Henry, said his father.
Oh, curse the stuffI'm sick as death and almost
drunk, said Henry.
I observed if he went on as he had to-day, we would
be taken for worse than drunkwe would be taken for
mad people.
Captain Wilson, who had served in the revolutionary
war, entered upon a detail of his former exploits, and of
those brave men who were associated with him. I dare
say he did justice to those heroes of our nationbut I
remember but very little about it, for the trees began to
dance before me, and my head ached violently. We soon
took up more company; three gentleman, two elderly,
and a spruce looking young beau. I was glad of it, as
it relieved me from attending to Captain Wilson's long
stories. I fell back, and Wilson told me he was very
sick, and wanted some water badly. Neither he nor I
had indulged in the practice of drinking any thing,
excepting
perhaps a bottle of porter, or a little wine
occasionally
.
It therefore was no wonder that it had a
different
effect on us, to what it had on the old man, who was
proof against accidents of this nature.
As we now had an opportunity, Wilson enquired how
I happened to succeed so effectually, in bringing the old
man over, to consent so readily as he did to our journey?
I repeated to him the conversation which took place
between his father and me, adding that when I left him,
I was not so confident of success.
He said that his father after my departure called his
mother to him, and desired her to have the boys' clothes
ready that night, that they were compelled to set out
early in the morning.
Indeed my dear, Henry must not leave me so soon.
Leave the dl, I say their clothes shall be got ready.
Do you think I would be outdone by the generosity of the
boy's uncle, that let him come so far to guard my son?
NoI'm not so selfish as all that, and gave him such a
handsome present too, because he was the friend of his
nephew? Zucks, I am a great mind to go with him
myself
,
to thank his uncle in person for his noble behaviour
to my son. No, no, they shall gono shufffing in
ranks.
Henry said there was no more objecting on the part of
his mother.
At this moment Captain Wilson called to Ned to
produce
the bottle and cup, adding here is the finest spring
in Tennessee.
This was agreeable newsbut I had no idea of this
providential precaution of the old man, in bringing his
friend Redstone with him; nor had I the least
inclination
to renew my acquaintance with this old friend of his.
Gentlemen, said he to the strangers, here is some
as genuine Monongahela as ever came down the river.
It was warranted ten years old.
By this time we had all dismountedthe strangers
accepted
the invitation, but no entreaty could prevail on
Wilson or me to join themwe chose rather a draught
of pure water. So soon as the strangers had done
honour
to our fellow-traveller, the dram-bottle, one of them
stepped to his saddle bags and pulled out a Spanish
bottle
,
[10]
[10]
A Spanish bottle is solely intended for travelling. If the reader can imagine a
common
green quart bottle, pressed flat like a flask, decreasing towards the bottom; in
thickness like a wedge, the neck a foot in length and of great strength, he will have an
accurate idea of a Spanish bottle.
observing to our old friend, that his Redstone
14*
was very good it was true, but he thought he had some
equally as good, and invited him to drink.
The old man tasted it, shook the bottle to observe the
bead; tasted it again, faith I believe it is the best;
well, curse them fellows, they sold it to me for ten years
old. I thought he seemed a little mortified that he
failed
to excel.
We mounted our horses again and pursued our journey.
Calling at a house that stood near the spring to enquire
the distance to our stand: we were told it was eight
miles. The sun was low, however, the draught of cold
water and the coolness of the evening, tended very much
to relieve our sickness, and enabled us to keep up with
the company, who rode merrily on before, Wilson and I
bringing up the rear, by which means we lost the
pleasure
of hearing the history of the spring, which Captain
Wilson commenced just as he mounted his horse, after
refreshing himself with a draught of its waters. All that
struck my ear respecting the subject was that the first
time he saw it was seventeen years since; that he and
three others were on a visit to look at the country, and
being tired, thirsty, and hungry, they stopped to rest
themselves under the shade of the trees that surrounded
the spring. Having buiscuit, neats-tongue and cheese,
(and I dare say a bottle of the comfortable, though it
escaped
my ear) they made a sumptuous meal.
The old gentleman having the advantage of a fresh
spur in the head, it was with difficulty we could keep up
with old Tory. It was laughable to witness his
progress
between a pace and a gallop, which proved that he
was perfectly aware how matters stood with his master.
Wilson reproved me for laughingwhen you know
without a miracle, your sister must ere this have fallen
a sacrifice either to want or ill treatment.
Oh don't be prophesying ill, said Ibad news
will come soon enough; keep a good heart; our luck has
turned; I expect Mary is alive and well, and grieving
will do no good; it is useless to afflict ourselves till we
know for what.
With such conversation as this, we passed off the time
until we arrived at the inn, where we found a good fire,
which proved very agreeable. It appeared that one of
our fellow-travellers was likewise an old revolutionary
soldier, and by birth was a South Carolinian. Captain
Wilson was soon in the height of his glory. They had
both served in the southern department, and under the
same commanders; all their battles were revived again.
The conversation, however, had not enough of interest
in it to engage my attention, until I was roused by an
oath from the Captain, execrating a black woman who
had jerked up the candle without ceremony and
disappeared
with it, just as he had the line of battle completed
at Camden. The two armies, however, could not engage
for want of a light. I remonstrated with the old
gentleman
for using such harsh language to one of the
fair sex
.
She soon, however, returned with the candle.
He resumedI held a Captain's commission, and
one of my men began to cry, and says to me, `Oh,
Captain
,
we'll all be killeddon't you see the British? look
at their cannon, pointing right towards us.' `You dn
son of a bh,' says I, drawing my sword, `if you don't
hush, I'll run you throughwhere the dl do you think
they would point them, then?' It was a capital mistake
in Gates, absolutely to be sure, to order militia to charge
with bayonets at the month of the British cannon. I
could freely have seen him shot. However, the North
Carolinians broke and run like the dl, and the
Virginia
line began to give ground.
I think you all run, father, said Henry.
Faith, I covered the retreat, said the old man,
being
unwilling to meet the question.
The Marylanders, oh they were fine fellows! I
could hear them firing at the advance of the British. O,
how I wanted to go back and help them.
In all likelyhood he would have protracted his retreat
to an hour's length, had he not, with the rest of us, been
called to supper. Happening to sit opposite to him at
table, the remark of the negro woman popped into his
head.
What was that? I wish I could think of it, about the
woman's taking away the candle.
Some of the party reminded him
Oh, yes, and Hal too about our running at Gates'
defeat, a sly dog; this morning it was nothing but
whining
and lamenting. I have a great mind to tell on you
both my lads; I haven't forgot the spree; I'll see if we
can't have John Anderson after supper. Landlord,
make a gallon of toddy, and do your best upon it; it aint
every night we'll be together, and God knows maybe we'll
never meet againhis will be done; and as for this Mr.
Charles with his fair sex, and all that sort o' thing we'll
see if he can't sing as well as he used to do.
All this was a sad blow to my hopes, as Wilson and I
had made it up to slip off to bed as soon as we arose
from the table; but it was all over with us now.
Supper being over the cloth was removed, and the
toddy-glasses
,
&c. placed on the table, the landlord was
invited
to join with us. Wilson sighed deeply; for my
own part I submitted with as much grace as I could
command
,
knowing that remonstrance was vain.
Having all drank round I had to begin the first song,
and gave them John Anderson my jo. Wilson eyed me
with evident signs of displeasure, as (of course) he would
have to follow. My performance was received with
great applause. Henry escaped however this time, and
our young fellow guest gave us the Legacy, quite in
taste. All must drink again.
Now Hal, said his father, let them gentlemen
hear that you can sing too; let me see, what song is that
he used to charm his mother with
I asked him if it was not Kitty of the Clyde.
Oh, yes, that's the very thing.
Poor Henry had to comply; when he was done I
observed
it was the old gentleman's turn next. The
Captain
began, when I was a young man stout and brave,
without any hesitation. When he had done we must all
drink againI had much rather have sung all night.
The two elder of the guests were called on next, one
declared
off, saying he never sung in his life. I said he
must tell a story then; it occurred to me that if I could
get a story afloat it would be the means of drawing the
old man into one of his long stories, and by that means
we might find an opportunity of making our escape.
He compromised by agreeing to tell a story after his
friend had favoured us with a song. He gave us the
loss of Paddy's Mill, a song of Allan Ramsey's
composition
;
when this was ended, the other told us the
story
of Kate Snyder, which every body knows; but he told
it to admiration.
After him I told one very similar to itthis put an
end to the singing. As I had foreseen, Captain Wilson
began one of his hour long stories; I made a sign to
Henry
to retire, choosing to stay a little longer, to make an
excuse for for him, should he be missed The young
gentleman soon followed him, and I remained but a short
time behind, when I also withdrew, leaving the old man
to finish his story and toddy together.
We soon fell asleep, and slept sound until I was
awaked
by Captain Wilson, who came into our chamber and
called to us to get up, saying our fellow travellers were
up an hour ago, and were ready to ride, adding that he
had a foaming egg'nog ready, and a julep as good as
ever
was drank.
We jumped up, and after dressing and washing, took
a glass of julep, the egg'nog looking rather too lucious
for our stomachs. I was well pleased, however, that
our fellow travellers joined the Captain in partaking
with him, in the egg'nog.
All having drank, and our horses ready, I proposed
to ride, to which the guests assented. Captain Wilson
had settled our billsnothing therefore remained but to
bid him adieu. Going up to him I told him the best of
friends must part; he shook me cordially by the hand
wishing me all the success in the world; he walked a
short distance with us before taking leave of his son, and
here a violent contest took place, between the old man
and Henry; Captain Wilson was endeavouring to force
a purse of money on him, which Henry as peremptorily
refused.
At length he came to me and sorrowfully entreated
me to take it My dear sir, said I, we do not want
it indeed; I have a much greater quantity now than is,
perhaps, safe to travel with; do excuse usyou know
sir that if I wanted that or any other favour from you,
I would use no ceremony.
He semed to be somewhat satisfied, but observed that,
some accident might befal us.
And if there should sir, I rejoined, we have
another
father where we are going, therefore it is quite
unnecessary
,
and even dangerous.
This called up all of the good old man's tenderness
the big tear trembled in his eye.
Take care of yourselves my boys, said he, as I
squeezed his hand for the last time, and then rode
forward
to overtake my companions, who had all moved
on.
Give my kind respects to your uncle, said Captain
Wilson, as I parted from himbring him with you if
possible.
In three days we reached Knoxville, where with much
regret we parted with our fellow travellers; they
pursuing
their journey on horseback, while we took the
stage; sending Ned back with the horses, with many
kind compliments to Captain Wilson and his lady.
In seven days we arrived in Philadelphia, without
meeting with any thing worthy of notice.
CHAPTER XVII.
Upon
our arrival in Philadelphia, our first business
was, to enquire for Mrs. Cary; no one knew any thing
about her: we walked until we were weary, enquiring of
almost every one we met.We searched the newspapers
and missed no place where we thought there was any
probability of gaining intelligence, but all to no
purpose
.
Fatigued and heartless we went to the office of
the Daily, and desired him to publish a short notice of
our arrival, in his paper.
Having done this we returned to the tavern, changed
our clothes, took some refreshment, and sallied forth
again, with a determination to search every street and
alley in the city; and should we prove unsuccessful, we
designed to visit the city of Boston, and enquire of Mrs.
Jones, as probably they had kept up a correspondence
with her.
We walked through the city until it began to grow
late, and were seized with despair; yet still we
continued
to examine every place and enquire of every one we
met.
We turned into an alley, which we agreed should be
the last for that evening, and resolved to await the
result
of the advertisement for the rest. We walked on,
very slow, sometimes enquiring, and often passing the
houses without speaking. When we were about half
way through the alley Wilson happened to say that Mrs.
Cary must have left Philadelphia.
At that moment we heard foot-steps behind us, and
female
voices. As the pavement was narrow, we stepped
on one side, to give the ladies room to pass, just as
Wilson
was speaking. The females (there were two,)
appeared
to examine us closely as they passed, and finally
stopped.
Did we understand you, sir? said one of them, I
thought you mentioned Mrs. Cary.
Heavens, it was Mary!!
Mr. Wilson, said she.He caught her in his arms
in an instant, where I must leave them. I addressed the
lady, in the meantime, and enquired for Mrs. Cary,
telling
her at the same time, of our arduous search.
Finding that my sister paid no attention to me, I said
Mary does not know her brotherthen lovers eyes
are quick.
Are you Mary's brother, sir? asked the lady.
I am, madam.
Mary, don't you see your brother?
Mary broke from Wilson and caught me round the
neck, as I bent forward to salute her, and almost stifled
me with kisses! She wept, she laughed, she acted
ridiculous
.
Yes Martha, this is my dear long lost brother.
Miss Martha, shew us to your house, I long to see
your mother, and Mary seems to have lost her senses: I
am fatigued and wish to rest.
Ah, sir, she replied, our house is not fit for you
to go into.
I don't value the fitnessit's not the house I wish to
see, it is your mother.
Oh, brother, said Mary, you cannot go in, it is
an old dark room up stairs; and the steps leading to it
are rotten, they would not bear your weight.
I will go, I replied, angrily, show me the way
Mary, do not be foolish.
When they found I was determined to go they set
forward
.Wilson
supported Mary, and I led Martha, or
rather she led me. The house was close by, in
Strawberry
Alley
; I shall remember Strawberry Alley as long
I live.
After walking a few steps they turned an angle into a
short lane, alley, or something, being very narrow,
giving
scarcely room enough for two persons to walk
abreast, and at about ten paces distant we came to the
house, in fact we came to it at the angle, it being the
corner
house, a large and handsome one once no doubt, but
then it was tumbling down. I felt the cold chills run
over me at the sight, but was silent.
I found the girls had not exaggerated when I came to
ascend the decayed stair-case, which in many places was
broken into holes, and so dark that it was really
dangerous
.
It led up the back part of the house into a gloomy
looking
parlour, or whatever it might be called; but I never
should have succeded, if Martha had not led me by the
hand and pointed out the places of danger. Mary
acted
the same friendly part towards Wilson, and we at
length effected our landing, into a place little better than
the Spanish dungeon; all the difference was, one was
above and the other under ground.
Martha led me to her mother, a middle-aged pale faced
female, and told her who I was. She shrieked for joy,
while I took her by the hand, and kissed the cheek
which she presentedthe scene that followed can be
better
imagined than described; besides, to repeat what
each one said would take up too much time and lead me
too far from the main story.
Martha had given me to understand, briefly, as we
walked along, that they had occupied their present
dwelling
only a few days, that in consequence of not being
able (from sickness and other misfortunes) to pay the
rent of their former dwelling, they were turned out of it,
and every thing they had that was worth taking, was
taken
to pay the rent!
The sight of the wretched apartment, almost destitute
of furniture, pierced me to the heart; besides Mrs. Cary
and the two girls, it contained another female, who
showed great confusion at being taken by surpriseit
was evident she expected no such visitors.
I told you, said Martha, what a house you would
see.
You shall not be in it long, madam.And your
sufferings
madam, (addressing Mrs. Cary) are over, I hope;
compose yourself and be happy.
Here Peggy, said I, handing the girl some money.
Betsey, sir, is my name.
Then go, Betsey, and bring me a couple of bottles
champaign, and turning to Mary, I told her in a low
voice that she must, with the other ladies, get ready to
leave the place that evening.I was going out to
prepare
15
lodgings for them, by which time they must be
ready.
In the meantime the girl returned with the wine, only
two wine glasses could be found, one of these was
cracked
and the other had a piece broken out of the top.
You have seen hard times here Betsey, said I, as I
poured out the wine. Yes indeed sir, that we have.
I waited on Mrs. Cary with the first glass, in which
I joined her; I then waited on Martha, pledging her
also
Let you alone Burlington, and I believe in my heart
you will drink all the wine yourself.We, I suppose,
must wait until our betters are served, said Wilson,
handing Mary up to the table.
I was in the right humour for mischief, and asked him
if he we would not rather lead her up to the parson?
This was answered no other way than by a look of
gentle reproof from both. Mrs. Cary smiled, Martha
sighed, and Betsey simpered. When he and Mary had
finished their glassCome Betsey, said I, it is long
since you and I joined in the pleasure of taking a glass
of wine together. She declined until Mrs. Cary spoke
to her.
Why, confound the fellow, said Wilson, is he going
to take the advantage of us so, ladies.
I cut him short, telling him we would walk. He
however
resolved to be within one of me, and helped himself
to another glass, the better he said, to keep his
balance
in descending the stairs.
I hoped you would spend the evening with us, said
Mrs. Cary, sorrowfully.
Yes, madam, I will spend the evening with you: it
would be something very extraordinary indeed that could
tempt me not to do so; but I am going to provide a
more suitable place than this, to spend it with you.
I then called Mary aside and told her to leave or give
away their furniture, if they had any, that such as I saw
was not worth moving.And taking my hat, called
Wilson
to walk saying to the ladies, we would not take leave
as we should soon return, and charging them not to
get tipsy, we sought our way down the old stairs.
We enquired for the nearest and best house of
entertainment
.
This being pointed out to us, we desired the
landlord to prepare supper for six persons, and
lodgings
for the same number, three chambers, a parlour,
and dining-room.
I directed him to get the best supper Philadelphia
could afford, and have all ready as quick as possible.
I could not forbear smiling to see the bustle and tumult
produced by this noticethe servants running against
each other, overturning chairs, tables, cats, dogs, and
every thing that came in their way.
Get out of the way, says one.
Take care, says another.
Have coffe, tea, and chocolate, says the landlord to
the cook.Sweep them rooms quick, and dust the
furniture
.
I dare say they expected at least two foreign
Ambassadors
and their suites.
My next step was to order three carriages to
Strawberry
Alley
, which had probably never been so highly
honoured
before. The sight of three splendid carriages, in a
huddle, excited even more curiosity than the orders of
the Mansion-house, where I engaged supper. The
exclamations
of the passengers were amusing
What's to pay here?
Who's dead? who's dead?
Upon my return I asked the ladies if they were
ready
.Soon
would be, they had only to dress.
That is the last thing I should have thought of, but
I believe it is the first thing with womenperhaps in the
present instance it was well enough, as they were to
figure
away as lady embassadresses.
We intimated to them not to hurry their toilet, as it
would be sometime before supper would be ready, and
they retired into a small chamber to dress.
In the meantime a little ragged girl came in, where
Wilson and I were sitting, and hoisted off old pots, pans,
and such things, which I suspected Mrs. Cary had
given
her.
Will you drink some wine, my pretty little girl?
Yes sir, said she.
Where is your mama?
At home sir.
Take your things home and tell your mama to come
here.
Here, said Wilson, buy yourself a coat with
this, handing her a dollar.
Thank you, sir.
Poor thing, she had great need of one; she received
the money with a smile, and ran home with great speed,
holding her pans on her head with the same hand in
which she held the money, and grasped the rent in her
petticoat as well as she could, with the other.
In a short time she and her mother both cameshe
was a young and handsome looking woman. I asked
her to be seated, and gave her some wine, telling her
we were going away, and should not want it.
She was a widow, it appeared, with four children, and
being distinguished by our friends, Wilson and I both,
gave her a trifle.
The ladies now appeared; I gave Mrs. Cary my arm,
and led the way down the dangerous steep, leaving
my friend to take charge of the young ladies and follow
after. When they were all landed at the bottom, I
helped
Betsey (who took charge of the baggage) into her
carriage
first, being determined to cut a dashour females
looked respectable, and might pass better than us.
I laughed at Wilson, telling him he looked very
shabby to play off the ambassador, and asked him why
he didn't put on his new dun-coloured coat? You will
not do for the principal, said I: you will have to act
the secretary.
Presenting my hand to Martha, after helping Mrs.
Cary into her carriage, I told her she must ride with
me, that probably Mary had some tender things to
say to Wilson.
Poor Mary, she loved me too well, to scold me for
this, and it is quite likely that she loved the idea it
conveyed
much betterI should think so.
Begging your Excellency's pardon, I am of opinion
your conduct presents stronger evidence of a desire to
say tender things, than mine.
Whether or not he availed himself of this opportunity
to breathe a tender sigh in the ear of his mistress, I have
never understood.
We soon arrived at our lodgings, the landlord leading
way to our destined parlourhe informed us supper
would be ready in twenty-five minutes, and the interval
was spent in that sort of conversation which was most
likely to dispel all recollection of the past, and create a
lively anticipation of the future. When supper was
announced
I led Mrs. Cary to the head of the table. I
entreated
her to take that seat, and consider herself at
home, until one more agreeable to her could be provided,
and that in every respect she was to consider herself
mistress of this temporary establishment.
Taking Mary's hand, I led her to the next seat on
Mrs. Cary's rightWilson of course took the opposite
one. I led Martha to the seat opposite Wilson, taking
my place opposite to her, and next to my sister, telling
the servant who waited, to withdraw, that Betsey (who
had just appeared) was all the attendant we desired.
Let the miser take pleasure in contemplating his
secreted
treasure, let the monarch take pleasure in
beholding
his willing subjects at his feet, let the hero take
pleasure
in that just applause which is due to his valour, and
greater still, let let the patriot take pleasure in those
immortal
honours heaped upon him by his countrybut I
would not have exchanged the pleasure I felt on taking
my seat this night at supper, for all of them.
If there be real happiness on earth, it consists in that
pleasure which results from a sense of gratitude due to
a benefactor.
Wilson was happywe will suppose that he wasyet
his happiness was terrestrialmine was celestialTo
relieve the indigent, to console the distressed, to cherish
the widow, the orphan, and to protect the friendless, has
something in it very far removed from earth. Our
Saviour
says, in as much as ye have done it unto one of
these, ye have done it unto me.
So far as I had been the instrument of contributing to
the happiness of this family, so far I certainly did feel
all the pleasure of which it was susceptible. But I was
15*
not happy! this may seem strange, and yet it is most
true. What then, blessed as I was, with so many
amicable
friends, my fortune about to be restored to me, my
sister soon to be united to the most worthy of his sex,
my uncle fulfilling the place of a father.I felt all the
affection for him of a son, and still not happy! Why is
this? it proves, if I am not mistaken, that complete
happiness
is not to be found in this world. The reader has
set me down, to fall in love with Miss Martha.No, all
lovely as she is, I love her indeed, but it is the love of a
brother for a sisterthen it must be Leanora!not
thateitherthough it was something very much like it
I esteemed Leanora, I adored her, and would have
loved
her, if it were not vain. But had it even been the
case it would have yielded to reason, it would have
yielded
to necessity, it would have been guided by that
strength of mind which had sustained such a variety of
vicissitudes; but the thought, the impossibility, of my
having it in my power to requite the generosity of
Leanora
poisoned all my joys. Thousands of miles
separated
usnot even the shadow of hope that we should
ever meet again, affected me so deeply as to betray my
feelings to this happy company.
Mrs. Cary first observed it, and Wilson threw out
some sprightly sallies, which, though very delicate,
insinuated
as much as though Martha had entangled me in
her chains; but he never was more mistaken in his lfe.
True I esteemed Martha, and hope I ever shall; but to
forget Leanora was to have ceased to live. Had I done
so, I must have been the blackest of villains! no, never,
never, Leanora will I forget thee.
Observing that the party imbibed my depression of
spirits, I shook it off, and assuming a gayer countenance
I told my sister, I had good news to tell her.
What is it?
You have an uncle in New-York, I suspect, by this
time.
An uncle, brother: what uncle?
Thomas, your father's brother.
No, I do not recollect him.
Don't you remember to hear your father talk of a
brother who went to sea when a youth.
Yes, he died, did we not hear
That report was erroneous; he is alive and well.
I then informed her that we parted in Havanna; I was
engaged by promise to meet him at New-York, where I
must set out very shortly.
She hinted, though in a very distant manner, that she
would be glad to know what accident had detained me
so much longer than I intended, from coming to see her.
I gave her to understand that it was too long a story for
me to begin that night, and that I should leave Wilson
with them, and he could relate it at his leisure.
And are you going to leave us so soon, brother?
I must go Mary, but I shall soon return, and bring
my uncle with me; he says he will dance the first reel at
a certain young lady's wedding.
Mary and Wilson both blushed; after swallowing with
much difficulty, what tea was in her saucer, which she
had raised to her face to hide her confusion. Mary
wondered what young lady it could be.
Oh, for heaven's sake, said Wilson, you are too
bad Burlington, let's talk about something else.
I told him not to be taking hints that perhaps were
not intended for himhe would induce people to believe
he was a party concerned.
After enjoying their embarrassment awhile, I changed
the subject by enquiring whether they had heard from
Dupon since he left the United States?
They had not.
At the name of Dupon, Martha who as I before
observed
,
sat opposite to me, threw her eyes downward and
changed colour.
I am unfortunate, thought I, and changed the
subject
again, by enquiring what had become of Hunter?
He had broke jail and was not heard of since.
By this time supper was concluded, and after chatting
an hour or so with the ladies, not overlooking the
faithful
Betty, Wilson and I retired to sleep (or intending to
do so) in the same room as usual.
It had been agreed upon that Wilson and my sister
should be united as soon as they met, but the
circumstance
of our meeting with my uncle was a sufficient
reason
for postponing the nuptials until he could be present,
which I had gently intimated to her at supper.
Whether this delay gave Mary any unpleasant
feelings
or otherwise I could not ascertain, but certain it is
that Wilson submitted with great reluctance.
CHAPTER XVIII.
When
we retired to our chamber he asked me if I
was serious in my conversation at supper, as it respected
the delay of his marriage until the arrival of my uncle
why this arrangement was made, and why he was kept
in ignorance of it?
Wilson was, at any time, irritable when he supposed
his honour assailed, and on the present occasion perhaps
the impatience arising from disappointment, excited those
nice feelings to a higher degree than ordinary.
I informed him that no arrangement had been made,
or most assuredly he would have been the first person
consulted, that the uncertainty of my sister's fate had
not permitted me even to think of the subject until that
moment in which I jested with her at supper.
I then suggested the propriety of postponment until
my uncle would arrive, that it would be almost an
insult
to him to treat him with so little respecttrue, said
I, years have long since elapsed when you were to have
been united, and as all three are bound under the most
solemn engagements, I would be the last to infringe an
obligation so sacred; but the thing was so reasonable in
itself, and so much the desire of all parties, except
himself
,
who was little better than crazy, that I hoped he
would consent to wait, that it would not be more than
three or four weeks at most; that I should leave him to
take care of the ladies, and in the meantime he could
indemnify
himself, measurably, by sundry tender things
which he understood better than I could tell him.
Finally
,
I besought him to gratify me for once, as the
sacrifice
would be productive of general satisfaction to so
many deserving people.
After a great number of Oh, Lords, Oh, heavens and
earth, and other interjectons, Wilson said he supposed
then he must wait another age, that he had served
already
as long as Jacob did for his wives.
Next morning upon entering the parlour, we found the
ladies, who had been up sometime. They were all well
and in fine spirits except Martha, and in spite of her
efforts
at gaiety her countenance was overcast with
melancholy
.
I took a seat by her (it is needless to say any thing
about Wilson, as every one can guess how he disposed
of himself, but I rather think he'll tell his beloved a
doleful tale of protracted bliss, pains, and darts, and
aching hearts,) and entered into conversation with her.
This amiable girl, who had endeared herself to me by
her humane attention to my friendless sister, independent
of her transcendant charms, was the counterpart of her
mother.
She was in height rather above the middle size, her
figure symmetry itself, her hair and eyes were black, her
skin rather fair than otherwise, her face oval, teeth
as white as ivory, but her chief beauty was her
modesty
,
she had the most diffident countenance I ever beheld,
and her voice was magic, soft, and melodious.
I never recollect seeing a female who was
remarkably
modest that had not a soft sweet voice; they are
invariably
united. A bold female has on the contrary a
loud coarse voice.
Miss Cary, (said I,) I esteem this occasion amongst
the happiest of my life, to have it in my power to
acknowledge
my obligations to you, and to assure you of
the deep sense I have of your goodness.
Martha, nothing short of heaven can repay
goodness
like yours, and that of your matchless mother.
But at the same time it yields me inexpressible pleasure
to be able to discharge some part of the debt I owe you;
that I have it in my power to call myself your friend and
your protector.
Yes, Martha, while I live you shall never want
either.
Oh, sir, you are too good, said she, you overrate
me beyond, far beyond, what I deserve.
No madam, indeed I do not; but it is you that would
underrate yourself.
Mrs. Cary had retired to her chamber, Wilson and
Mary were sitting at some distance, too much engaged
to observe usI took her hand, Martha, said I, all
is not well with you; it is with much pain I discern that
something preys upon your spirits.
My dear girl honour me with your confidence;
repose
your sorrow in my breast, and in me you will ever
find the inviolate friend, the tender brotherfear not to
trust me.
This was too much for her sensibility; she burst into
tears: no one saw them but myselfprecious drops! the
unsullied effusion of friendship, constancy, and love.
I drew out my handkerchief and wiped them away.
I arose, still holding her hand, and led her to her
chamber
,
where she could indulge her feelings without
restraint
.
Seating myself by her side in silence, and
leaning
my head on my other hand I gave wayshall I say,
then I was very near if not altogether in the same
situation
with Martha, that is I had not the power of speech.
I thought however, that Martha was more prodigal of
her tears as they fell in copious drops upon my hand,
which lay carelessly on her lap with hers still grasped
in it. As I sat in the manner just described, I was
roused
on a sudden by a deep sigh from Martha, immediately
followed by a shivering. Seeing a cloth shawl on the
bed, I got up and wraped it round her, resuming my
seat by her side again. After wiping the tears from her
cheeks, (and my own too Martha, said I, confide in
my honourtrust me for oncetell me the cause of your
distress, it will relieve your heart and confer a treasure
on me.I thought last night, but I may be mistaken,
thatbutmy dear girl I do not wish to urge my
confidence
but
tell me am I rightDupon.We are
engaged, said Martha, fetching a sigh that seemed to
contain her soulBe composed Martha, he will come,
he never can forsake worth like yoursnohe never
can, it is impossible. I am going to New-York,
perhaps
to-morrow, I shall hear of him. I shall make it my
business, if he is on the face of the globe. Be assured
I shall find him. Oh Mr. Burlington you are too,
too generous,Dupon,I fear, ah I dare not say it.
Dead you mean Martha, then it is vain to grieve for him,
the same if he is falseBut how long has it.Six
months, if no accidenteight at the mostI can not
think, Burlington, I can not believe Dupon is false, if
you knew him you would be of my opinion. I know
not what to think of it, said I, I know from sad
experience
one thing, that our actions are controlled by
destiny, and that accidents happen to all, it may be the
case with Dupon. Take my advice therefore Martha,
and be happy, content your self a little longer; amuse
yourself until I return, I beg of you for my sake, to rest
assured that if he is on earth I will find him. I will first
attend my uncle here, to the marriage of my sister, and
then I shall devote one year at least to your happiness.
She had ceased shivering, but continued cold, I
proposed
going to the parlour fire, but she declined, saying
that I must make her excuse at breakfast. I called
Betsey, and desired her to bring Martha a cup of hot
coffee
,
and send some one to make a better fire in the
chamber
.
I had some apprehension that the shivering would be
followed by a fever, but I now discovered it was nothing
but a hysteric fit.
When Betty brought the coffee, I took it from her and
told her to go and hasten the word, telling Martha with
a smile, as I cooled her coffee, that should a certain
gentleman happen to step in, he might be tempted to be
jealous. This set her to laughing, which brought
Wilson
and Mary to the door, and in the same instant
breakfast was announced. I arose to attend the
summons
taking Wilson away, and saying to Martha, I
would send her breakfast to her chamber.
I suspect it would have been difficult without knowing
the truth, to have persuaded Wilson that I was any thing
but Martha's humble swain.
Mrs. Cary asked if her daughter was ill. I told her
she was not, and taking her hand, led her to the eating
room. Mary soon joined us, a look enterchanged
between
her and Mrs. Cary, explained that nothing of
consequence was the matter, and the old lady eat her
breakfast quite cheerful after sending her daughter at my
request to her chamber.
For myself I was far from being cheerful, the distress
of this unhappy young woman pierced me to the soul.
O heavens! if she suffers thus thought I, in her present
situation, what must she have indured, when thrown
friendless and indigent on a cruel world. Great God!
the thought, even the thought is insupportable. A man
if he be overtaken by misfortunes, stands a double
chance of relief. If he fails with his own sex, (which
is seldom the case) he is sure almost to succeed with the
other; but a poor friendless woman has none, and more
O heavens! if she be possessed of personal advantages.
She is then the never failing victim of her own sex, and
sorry am I to say it, too often of ours.
Solomon said he had not found one good woman among
ten thousand, when he was upon earth; God only
knows how many he would find were he here now. I
do suspect it was no easy matter for a woman to impose
herself upon a man of Solomon's wisdom.
After breakfast I called Mary, and bid her see Martha
and propose for a little walk; that I wished to attend
them to the shops before I set out, so that they might have
time to get their finery made for the wedding, before I
returned.
Perhaps many of my female readers will expect Mary's
reply. I therefore beg to remind them that I have on all
occasions avoided such things in the course of this
narrative
,
not because I was ignorant of them, for it may
well be supposed I was not, but because I denounce such
nauseous stuff as unworthy of consideration, and highly
pernicious to my fair readers in particular. But
marriage
is an honourable thing  True, but it some times
happens that courtships are not quite so.
I have always been of opinion that those tender things
that pass between two ingenuous lovers are only
valuable
in proportion as they are kept inviolate from the
world.
Wilson was my bosom friend, Mary was my sister,
in the course of their long and ardent affection, I heard
and saw enough to have filled ten such volumes as this.
But to be telling what he said, and what she said, and
what he said again, would be a jargon of nonsense
unworthy
16
the perusal of rational readers, and permit me
to observe once for all, that it is solely for the sake of my
fair readers, that I have excluded this fulsome stuff from
these memoirs. Without my aid they will (or at least
many of them will) learn those things perhaps too soon,
and repent too late.
But to return: The ladies were equipped for walking,
and had taken their seats by the parlour fire, until
Wilson
was ready, who forsooth must shave and dress
before
he could venture to appear, in the character of a
gallant
.
In the mean time, I took out my pocket book, and
threw a hundred dollars into each of the ladies' laps, nor
did I forget my friend Betty Watson, as I had learned
that was her name. This faithful and deserving young
woman was intitled to this mark of my respect on a
double account. Although there was little prospect of
Mrs. Cary's situation being such as to indemnify her for
the sacrifice she made in sharing her precarious fortune,
yet she never once showed the least disposition to leave
her; gold, therefore was a poor reward for fidelity like
hers; I had none about me, but I told her she should
have it so soon as Wilson came out of his chamber.
I then sat down by Martha, who had pulled her
bunnet
over her eyes, which were red with weeping, and
taking hold of the notes which she held in her hand. I
asked if that was sufficient to equip her as brides-maid.
Before she had time to answer Wilson entered quite
irresistable
.
I desired him to give me ten eagles, which I
handed to Betty telling her not to consider that, or any
part of it as imbracing wages, that it was merely a
present, the reward of her fidelity to Mrs. Cary, and
that she should have her wages besides. She was about
to overwhelm me with thanks when Mary interrupted
by exclaiming, now I am jealous of you Betsey
Brother has put us off with paper, and given you gold.
I cut their dispute short by telling them we would walk,
calling Betsey to come along too, that she should have
fine clothes as well as the rest. She ran for her bonnet
we waited till she returned and all six then set out.
As we walked along, I requested Wilson, the first
thing he did, after we returned, to seek another girl to
attend on the ladies, that Betsey had waited on them
long enough, she ought to have a little rest; besides, she
has her clothes to make, and would be wanting to help
the ladies prepare for the wedding. I dare say
Betsey
heard every word, for she was walking by my
side, as I could by no means suffer her who was no
longer to be considered in the light of a servant to
walk behind. I had learned from Mary, that Betsey
Watson had been brought up by Mrs. Cary; that she
was much attached to her, and was a virtuous well
informed
girl, I therefore resolved to extend my
protection
to her, so long as she chose to live with Mrs. Cary.
While the ladies were engaged in selecting such things
as they wanted, Wilson and myself strayed about the
doors of the respective shops, lest our presence might
embarrass Mary, in the choice of the sacred robe. At
length we were called to attend them, when I observed
that Mrs. Cary had considerable change left, as she was
stuffing it in her ridicule.Stop, stop, my dear
madam
,
that won't do said I, you must not stint yourself in
this manner, you have need of all this I know, lay every
cent of it out, don't be afraid dear mother,should you
want a little change while I am gone call on Wilson.
Oh sir, said she, indeed you areI cannot think of
imposing on you.
No words at all madam if you please, said I, leading
her back to the counter.
She took a pile of fine linen, and a few other little
things.
They loaded Wilson and myself, and had a small
parcel
apiece themselves.
When we arrived at home, well Betsey, said I, let
me see what pretty things you have.
Oh dear me sir, I have so many things I don't know
what I shall do, I am afraid it will make me too proud
combs, crapes, shawls, silk dress, cambrics, &c. &c.
What's this for Betsey? (taking hold of a piece of
fine linen,) a dress too?
Oh dear me sir, I can't tell you what any of 'um is,
for I am crazy with joy.
Tell him to mind his own business, said Mary,
and take them away from him, don't let him be
tumbling
your things about so. Oh, Mrs. Touchy and I'll
see what you have, (seizing hold of her bundle,) she
siezed it at the same instant, I pulled, and she pulled,
after I made Martha laugh, I let her take it without
looking at any thing. I would not have done so had
she been willing.
Wilson was gone to hunt a servant, Mary and Martha
retired to put a way their things, Mrs. Cary was gone
upon the same business, I called Betsey to me and giving
her some change, requested her to go and purchase
some cakes, sweet meats, pine-apples and some good
pippins, in short every thing you see, that's good Betsey,
I shall leave you to-morrow, and I intend to feast all
this day.If you'll be a good girl, I'll when I come
from New-York bring you a sweet heart. I thought
Jinkins
would make her an excellent match, and she was so
fine a girl that I wished to see her provided for. She
blushed, and ran off to the landlord to procure a basket.
When she left me, it came into my head, to steal
upon
the girls and have some more fun with Mary, as she
no doubt was engaged in arranging the wedding
materials
,
the door was standing ajar, I stepped along on
tiptoe
,
when arrived at the door I stoped and listened.
Oh now don't this trimming look lovely? won't it
look elegant by candle light? said Mary, my shoes,
I am sorry they are too small, I'll have to get Betsey to
go and change them, I was in such a hurry lest brother
and Mr. Wilson should see me.
That was a pitty, said I, bolting into the chamber.
Mary shrieked and gathered up her things, which were
spread over the bed.
Martha laughed heartily I declare now brother, you
are too bad, said Mary.
Where is that trimming that will look so well by
candle light? I want to see how it looks by day light.
she began to push me out of the room, as Mrs. Cary who
had heard the uproar, came to see what was the matter,
She cautioned the girls to be more careful in future.
I declared they should not engage in any sort of
business
that day, that they should keep me company, as it
was the last day I should spend with them for some time,
and led them to the parlour.Just as we were seated,
Wilson and Betsey Watson made their appearance, the
former saying he had procured a servant, she would be
there in the evening, whilst the latter brought me the
basket saying she had obeyed as near as possible, and
there was the change. Keep it Betsey, (said I) to
purchase
more when these are gone.
What good things are these you have here brother?
said Mary looking in the basket.
Go away (replied I) you would'nt let me see your
fine things, you saucy baggage, you shall not see mine,
clear out, you shall not touch a thing till Mrs. Cary has
her choice, as she was attempting to out squabble
me in retaining a pine-apple, which she had laid hold of.
Wilson came next, I arose with them both hanging upon
me, and going to a table dislodged the contents of the
basket on it, telling the ladies that that was terrapin
alamode, called Mrs. Cary to come and take her
choice.
Indeed, said the charming woman, Mr.
Burlington
you will spoil us all.
She began to understand my nature too well to add
any more, and she was too refined.In short we added
wine and porter, and spent the day, in eating and
drinking
,
laughing and talking.
Martha became quite cheerful. Betsey skiped about like
a fawn, Mrs. Cary discharged the duties of her new
station with dignity and grace, and I acquiesced in the
general joy.
Wilson and Mary looked pleasant and tranquil, except
when my evil stars would put it into my head to enquire
whether she had exchanged those shoes yet, on these
occasions
,
I would receive a look from Mary, which I could
not refuse to understand.
Toward evening I directed the landlord to procure us
some music, it having been agreed upon that the ladies,
and Wilson were to sit up till 12 o'clock, that being the
hour of my departure for New-York.
The music came, 12 o'clock came, and the parting
scene came.
16*
When the clock struck, Mary began to weep. Wilson
turned pale, Mrs. Cary looked sorrowful, and the
pensive
Martha sighed, bestowing on me a look the most
earnest, the most winning I ever beheld.
I shall not forget you Martha, said I, taking leave
of her first, be happy dear girl till I see you again.
I next took Mrs. Cary by the hand. Betsey presented
herself next, she held out her hand, but I extended my
adieu a little farther and snatched a kiss.
Mary was sobbing on Wilson's bosom, she jumped up
however, when he told her I was waiting, and seized me
round the neck, she held me so long and so tenaciously,
that Wilson had to take her forcibly away. I pressed
his hand without speaking, and departed leaving them
all in tears.
CHAPTER XIX.
When I arrived at New-York, I hastened to the place
appointed to enquire for my uncle, which was the City
Hotel, and to my infinate joy, the first person I saw was
Sambo, Ah old fellow, said I, how do you do, how is
your Master? Oh Massa, said he, shaking my hand
and pulling off his hat, how you do, how you do.
Massa
in a chamber, he talk'bout you all a time, he be so
glad.
How long have you been here Sambo? said I, as
he conducted me to his master.
We jes here day fo yessaday, Massa he cus, he cus,
all de way, dn de gup steam, de ba what ebe he call.
Massa been sick too.
My uncle sick, not now is he? as we entered his
room.
The meeting was joyful enough on both sides. I
enquired
whether he had been long or dangerously ill.
Oh yes, I have been very sick child. I once thought
I should never see thee again.
Sambo get some refreshments.
I had
telled
Jinkins to write down what I wanted
thee to do, and all that, but thank God he has let me see
thee once more.
Where is Jinkins? said I. Don't know.
Sambo answered, he was gone to see Hunter.
Yes, O he'll soon be here, he never stays long from
me, but where be Hal?
He did not come sir, I left him to take care of my
sister and two otherladies, who had afforded her relief
when she was in distress, and briefly related to him the
situation in which I found them.
Then thee hast been to Boston.
No sir, they are in Philadelphia. When I arrived
in Tennessee, I found two letters from my sister,
informing
me of her distress, and her departure from
Boston
,
and that they were now happily situated, and all
well when I left them, that Wilson and Mary promised
themselves the pleasure of seeing him return with me to
honour their nuptials.
Thee did right, child, but I must fix thy business
with Hunter, first thinghe tells me he's lost his
pocket
book and some o' his little bits o' papers, and receipts,
and such thingsI doubt his honesty my son, a sort a
quivecates a little.
I have his pocket book, said I, telling my uncle
how I became possessed of it. I have brought it with
me, but what is in it, I know no more than you do, for
I have been so hurried from place to place, that I have
never examined it; but it must be his, as his name is on
the outside.
Well, tell ye what thou do child, just write a little
line or two to Bostonwill soon get an answer, and in
the meantime we'll see what he has here, and get thy
own out o' him, and we'll just tell him, d'ye see, to clear
himself to the farthest end o' the world.
Aye, we'll not be hanging up a poor dl that's
not worth the halter that's round his neck'told
Jinkins
and Sambo to not be talkin' about 'um at allOh,
they're as true as steel.
I approved of this humane design of my uncle indeed,
though I had nearly fallen a sacrifice to the villainy of
this man, yet I felt not the least desire of revenge. I
then directed Sambo to furnish me with pen, ink, and
paper, and wrote to Mr. L of Boston, who was the
person pointed out by Hunter to my uncle, as being
qualified to give correct information on the subject of his
property.
His word will pass, said my uncle, as current as
goldI been asking my old friend B about um,
he was here to see me just a little afore you comehe
lives in Chatham-street.Oh, yes, he says I can depend
was just going to get him to write this very evening
if thee hadn't a come.
I finished the letter and sent it by the landlord to the
post-office, and in a few minutes Jinkins made his
appearance
.
He was overjoyed to meet me, and saluted with much
cordiality.He enquired very particularly after
Wilson
and my sister. As I finished the answer to his
questions
I thought of my promise to Martha, and begged
leave of the company to retire.
I flew to the post-office and addressed a second letter
to Mr. L begging him to enquire of Mr. P of
Boston, whether he had heard lately of Dupon, and
what had become of him.
Martha had found an opportunity during the last
evening
I spent with her, to slip a memorandum into my
hand, informing whom and where to address my
enquiries
.
As the mail was still unclosed, I addressed another
letter to Mrs. Jones with my address. In this letter I
informed her that I was the brother of Mary Burlington,
that she was well and was shortly to be married, that
Mrs. Cary and Martha were well, and in affluence. In
the next place I begged to know when she had heard
from Dupon, or whether at alland finally what had
become of the Simpsonsto write as quick as possible,
that shortly I would leave New-York for
Philadelphia
.
Having finished my letters I returned to my uncle's
room. I observed to him, after supper we would look
over Hunter's papers and see what they were.
Very well, thee and Jinkins can do that; but thee
didn't tell me when Mary was going to be married, hang
it;it was a plaguey unlucky thing that I should have
been sickit's wasted me mightilyI was nation fraid
that thee'd not get thine own out o' Hunter; but as to
that, I would a left thee and that there sly fellow that
lets on, he's so saintish, that's going to be married to
Mary, I'd a divided it all between thee and him Jinkins.
Faith, Jinkins wouldn't that I should a died to a had
the whole worldwould'st?
I would not sir, for ten thousand such worlds,
replied
Jinkins.
Believe what thee sayest? do think of ithadn't a
been for him I should a slipped cable;nation nigh as it
was.
But(getting up and stepping across the floor)
begin
to feel pretty stout again. I must be at the wedding,
wouldn't miss it for a dealOh, if I don't plague that
Sly Boots.Mary, most forget her, don't think she
could be born when I left Boston, couldn't a been more
than a babe.
Thee I remember as well 'twas yesterday, used to
have fights and quarrels about riding in the shayze wi'
me.Ah, many a time thee clinched thy teeth in me for
breaking up thy nut-cracking, when by chance I'd whip
up a handful and run awayAh, well, who would ha'
thought o' thee?
He called Sambo to light his pipeI told him he had
learned to smoke since I saw him; I had never seen him
with a pipe before.
Yes, I always smoked a little, but thee never noticed
it.
In the course of half an hour, we were told supper
was ready, the good old man had ordered supper for us
three in a private room, that we might enjoy ourselves
without restraint.
When supper was over we returned to our chamber,
and Jinkins and I had smoked a segar, and my uncle his
pipe, I produced Hunter's pocket-book. Upon
examining
his papers we found several bonds of considerable
amount, some valuable receipts, and a few old letters,
which I could not decipher, being written in secret
characters
,
and evidently appeared to have been a
correspondence
between him and the pirates, the oldest date
was as early as 1795, the latest two years!Shocking
to think how human nature is debasedwhat sort of a
soul can that man possess who can in cool blood, spill
that of a fellow man, and take all he hasand yet this
wretch, this Hunter, at the time he was aiding, abetting,
and no doubt perpetrating those crimes, crimes of the
blaskest die, was no doubt esteemed a respectable
member
of society, caressed and admired; whilst such a
woman as Mrs. Cary was thrown an outcast from
society
.
Wretched infatuation! that wealth should be attended
with such accursed consequences; let those who possess
it fear, and tremble!Whilst these reflections were
passing through my mind, some one knocked at the
door, which Sambo (who had taken a seat in the corner)
opened, and who should appear but Horton.
I could not like this fellow, although he had been the
means of saving of my lifehis ill looks, his avowed
baseness, and his treachery to my fatherI never could
view him without horror. I was sorry when I saw him
that I had not in the course of the evening's
conversation
ascertained my uncle's pleasure respecting him; he
certainly ought to be acquitted, so far as he was
concerned
with the pirates, as he had turned king's evidence,
but whether he ought in the case of his theft in stealing
the bonds out of my father's desk, admitted of some
question; besides, he had spent his whole life in the
employment
of Hunter, and was now to be thrown on the
world without a penny; this would never do, he might
from necessity be tempted to resume his piratical
practices
but
what was to be done, I left to time and my
uncle to decide.
Well, Horton, said I, we have met once more
how do you come on? what do you intend to do? as we
are all arranging our situations for life, and you have
acted a conspicuous part amongst us, I have some
curiosity
to know what you intend to do with yourself.
Take a chair, said my udcle to him, and answer
my nevy, he knows more about them things than I do.
I have acted a very bad part, sir, indeedI have
acted so that I have nothing for my labour.
This is what you ought to have expected; and you
may think yourself well situated, when compared to that
of your employer.
I do not murmur, said he, I throw myself on
your mercy, and that of yournonobleuncle,
bursting into tearsI deserve ten thousand deaths, I
plead guilty.
Horton was really sincere in his repentancehe held
his head down, supported by both hands, and sobbed
like a child.
Oh, thee needn't be making such lamentations, child,
no one is going to hurt theemy nevy was just talking
his own way, d'ye see, he's no notion o' hurting on thee,
and if so be that thou'lt be an honest boy in time to
come,here's old Tom, he never forsook a comrade,
thee shall have sailors luck amongt us, so prithee don't
be making a bothertake some brandy and hush thy
womanish
tears, and tell Charles there, about the papers
Sambo bring us some wine, said my uncle, striving to
hide the tear, that in spite of his efforts rolled down his
cheek.
Your heart is too tender (thought I) old man, for this
iron world, as I asked Horton to look at Hunter's
papers
,
and see what he could make of them.
Let him take a glass of wine, and that will brighten
his ideas.
After Horton had drank, and wiped his eyes, he
lookover
the papers; but it was all Greek to him, he could
make nothing of them.
Some people will perhaps, suspect Horton's sincerity
on this occasion; but I did not. Indeed the
astonishment
he evinced upon the discovery of the artifice
practiced
upon him by Hunter, was sufficient evidence with
me, that this secret correspondence was the first
intimation
he had had of Hunter's real character.He had
always
been led to think that he was the only and sole
confident
of Hunter.No wonder he was astonished at the
consummate duplicity exercised towards him by this
man!
It was evident that he (Horton,) was used as a tool,
and must inevitably have been sacrificed in the end, and
in all probability the time had arrived when he
fortunately
made his escapeHe had been the bearer of all
these letters written to the pirates, and yet was ignorant
of this secret precaution, with which they were written!
My uncle broke in upon us by telling Horton that
the upshot of the business was, that they had been two
grand rogues together, only Hunter had most sense; and
tell'e what friend, it's bad on both sides and thee's
gained
nothing but a bad name, see, so just quit it and betake
thyself to an honest way o' life, and if Hunter can't
give thee something to begin upon, we'll see to that, so
just go about thy business and come to-morrow.
Horton burst into tears afresh!
What ails him? maybe poor dl has nothing to
buy him a supper, here take this, said my uncle, (
handing
him his purse) and get thee gone;'wants to talk
to my nevy.
Thank you sir, said Horton, refusing the purse
I have enough for present demands, it's not on account
of my poverty that I am distressed; but I have
murdered
my dear wife, I can hear of her nowhere, nor can I
find any one who can tell what has become of hershe
has certainly broke her heart, or perished for want, and
my poor little childrenIhad threeand left her
pregnant with another.
Oh, GodI shall forever be miserable if I cannot
find them
He gave way for some time to his feelings without
uttering
a word.At length he resumed
Your generosity, noble sir, and that of your
generous
nephew, has quite unmanned me; and you are the
only persons to whom I have disclosed this
circumstance
.
Where didst leave her, and how long be it? said my
uncle.
Oh, sir, it is six years since I saw or heard from
her. I left her in this cityI was seduced from her
arms by a vile wretch, who haunted me night and day,
and finally eloped from me, after stealing my gold watch
and all my money.
In short she stripped me of every thing, even to my
clothes.My wife came to the lodgings I had hired for
this wretch, and implored me with tears not to forsake
her.
But villain that I was, I heeded not her tears, I was
deaf to the voice of natureI kicked her out of the house,
and have never seen her since I left the city the next
day, taking the wretch with mewe sailed to
Charleston
,
where she left me without a cent.
Be composed, said I: Horton I will assist you in
searching for your wife and children.
Oh, sir, she cannot be alive; she would break her
heartbut if I could knowif I could find my
children
17
Well, man, thee needn't be making such a fuss; thee
is not the only one that's lost a wife and children.
Horton now took leave, without speaking a word.
Poor soul! said my uncle, he suffers for his bad
doings.
I was afraid my uncle would relapse into one of his
melancholy fits, and endeavoured to divert him from it by
jocosely telling Jinkins that I had a sweet-heart for him
in Philadelphia.
That is good news, said he, we'll have a double
wedding, then, for I know nothing about the forms of
courtshipshe will therefore have to take me at a word,
or not at all.
That's cleverly said, replied the old man, and if
I don't give thee a wedding that'll be talked on for
twenty
years to come I wonder if thee hasn't got one for
thyself?
No sir, but I have one for you.
Better, still.
There is a beautiful widow there, about ten years
younger than you are, that I think it will be difficult to
resist, at least I found it so with myself, although I
spent but one day in her company.
Sambo, said he, (wishing as I thought to avoid
the subject) pray thee go to that old hulk of a
landlord
,
and tell him to send us an oyster or two, and a bit
of good old Cheshire cheese, thea suppers o' fresh meats
and stuffssets too fresh on my stomach, and the boys
will take a bit too, them cursed broths and things, that
they fed me upon when I was sick, be never going to put
strength in tome, and wish, d'ye hear, Sam tell 'um come
along and give us a songa's jolly old soul.
But, as was saying, 'wants to be stout against the
wedding'me if I don't foot it away with the best of um
I'll dance the first reel with the widow, stepping
exultingly through the chamber.
Oh, yes, said Jinkins you'll play the old game,
as you did once before. I suppose you'll be for hoisting
more sailmore sailall said, quickand I had like to
have fallen overboard in my haste to execute your
orders
.
He burst into laughter at this premonition of Jinkins.
Ah, thee art a sly dog, nobody minds thee; now if
thee mind him he'll tell thee a thousand fibsand 'tells
um wi' such a face too, that nation a bit but it seems to
be the truth.
As to the Algerin', who the dl do'st think, would
stand to wi' them, when we had neither men nor metal
that would ha' shivered a sailhe'll never be done with
that.
Brag's a good dog, said Jinkins, I would'nt be
at all surprised to find you shut up in a closet, on the
night of the wedding, instead of dancing the first reel,
with the widow.
The old gentleman made no reply to this, except by a
loud laugh. Sambo entered, followed by the landlord,
whose physiognomy bespoke just such a companion as
suited my uncle's disposition and temper.
Well my old comrade just tell thee what it is, (lay
them things on the table Sambolet the boys take a bit
when 'likes) tell'ee what friend, thee must give us a
song'told my nevy that thee could sing an excellent
song.
I was tired enough to go to bed, but found it
indispensable
to humour my uncleand here we have heavo, and
old lang syne againnor had he forgot that I could
sing John Anderson my joe.
The landlord was very lively and facetioustold us a
number of humourous anecdotes, and Jinkins shone
forth in his real character, displaying a fund of wit and
pleasantry.
I had almost overlooked this talent in him, on our first
acquaintance, being but little in his company, and my
mind far from being at ease, though I saw that my
uncle
reposed the utmost confidence in himbut I now
discovered
that he was the life and soul of his existence.
The good old man, all affection as he is, must
necessarily
fix on something; Jinkins was therefore well
calculated
to arrest it, and thrice worthy of the choice.
We sat up till dawntaking out my watch, I mildly
observed to my uncle, that he ought to retire, he would
retard his perfect recovery by keeping late hours.
The landlord took the hint, and very politely took
leave, saying he had business. After he left us we had
no difficulty in persuading my uncle to retire to restI
slept with him, Jinkins and Sambo reposing on pallets,
in the same chamber.
CHAPTER XX.
Next
morning after breakfast, we all three walked to
the bank to ascertain Hunter's claim in stock, and found
it correctalso the real property preciseley as he stated.
We returned to our lodgings after taking from the books
a memorandum of the exact amount, dates, &c.
Our next business was to see Hunter and adjust so
much of the business as was practicable that day: I
wished to see if any thing would be left to remunerate
Horton; neither was it my design to strip the creature
of every thingthis would have been barbarous.
I wished my uncle to be present, and Horton's
presence
might not be amiss. But he had not appeared, and
I began to be alarmed on the account, lest the unhappy
man might be tempted to commit some desperate act.
Hunter was yet in the ship, under guard, as he could not
have been brought ashore without betraying his crimes,
by securing him in jail.
I resolved, therefore, to keep him where he was until
our business was finally finished with him. Accordingly
I procured an attorney, and Sambo a hack, to convey his
master to the wharf, leaving instructions with the
landlord
to send Horton thither, should he call during our
absence
.
I found Hunter with a long beard, his dress entirely
neglected, and very much reduced in flesh.
Hunter, said I, how do you do? giving him my
hand.
He seemed somewhat cheered by this friendly
salutation
:
I told him that an attorney waited in the cabin
with my uncle, to execute the conveyance of his
property
,
that I wished to know if he was perfectly willing of
his own accord, to transfer itthat it would not be valid
without, and that he must shave and dress, whilst the
lawyer was drawing up the writings, and go up to the
17*
cabin. Sambo would assist him or help him to any thing
he might want.
But, said I, Hunter, I wish you to understand
me distinctly; I believe you own the property which
you have stated to be yoursthere is enough to pay the
bonds, and likewise for so much of my father's property
which was sacrificed for your debts, as well as his own:
you understand that the sacrifice of his property, of his
whole estate, and his consequent death, was owing to
your agency, was it not? speak Hunter!
He seemed to hesitate
Sir, said I, I have no more to do with you then,
I shall go and dismiss the attorney.
He dreaded a prosecution, and was wise enough to
know that I had it amply in my power to compel him
to pay me. He knew therefore that on the one hand he
might stand some chance to save his life, with the loss of
his property, but on the other he stood little chance for
either.
Hunter, said I, I want nothing from you but
what is justly my own, and that I will haveso just say
whether you are willing to acknowledge the claim, and
willing to pay me in such a way as I have proposed?
He answered that he was. Well sir, said I, I will
go and request the lawyer to begin the writings.As
I walked from him he begged me, after giving
instructions
to the lawyer to return, that he wished to speak to
me.
Very well, I shall return.
When I returned to Hunter, he was in the act of
fixing
himself up to appear aboveWell Hunter, here I
am, what do you want?
Oh, sir, said he, I have treated you and your
family so ill, that I am ashamed to tell you; I deserve
death, I acknowledge, but
You wish to know your own fate, said I, finding
that he hesitated.
If you will be so good sir
Hunter. rejoined I, taking your life cannot undo
the past, and I presume your are not fit to die.If I
could have any assurance that you would reform, and
quit your evil practices, I would gladly intercede for
your life.
But what security could you give, that you would
not resume your wickedness again? It is so prone in
you, that I much doubt whether you could live out of the
practice of that manner of life, in which you have
hitherto
lived.
It would be doing a great injury to society to allow
you to escapewe would be answerable to our God, our
country, and our consciences, for the lives you would
take.
Your are a perfect ruffian, you are worse than
wicked
,
you know not how to be merciful, how can you
expect
mercy, when you have shown none yourself?
I expressed myself in this manner to him, to observe
whether it would produce any signs of repentance. He
began to weep, but there was not that sincerity in his
sorrow, that was evinced by Horton.
I told him that he had very different men to deal
with from himself, and that his case would admit of no
question, if they were not.
It actually began to be a question with me, whether I
was doing right or not, to suffer Hunter to escape: but
as the judges say, (if we have any doubts on our mind,)
we ought to lean to the side of mercy.
I then asked Hunter what he was going to do with
Horton? that he had kept him in his employ ever since
he was able to do any thing, that he had corrupted his
morals, and on that account he was as dangerous to the
peace of society as he himself was, that he was now
advanced
in life, and destitute of supportwhat are you
going to do for him?
He disliked, I saw very clearly, to answer this
question
.
He at length stammered out that if he had any
thing left, Horton might take it.
Then, said I, if you are pardoned what will you
have, you are old now, and have nothing. Your ill gotten
wealth has not throve with you.
But if I were sure that you would reform and behave
yourself, I could venture to say, that either my uncle or
myself would support you.
Your son, I suspect, is hung by this timehe broke
jail in Boston, for using, or attempting to use. violence
to my sister, and since my arrival in this city I have
understood
that he was taken up for passing counterfeit
money.
The more I conversed with the wretch, the more I was
prejudiced against him: I therefore pulled out his
pocket-book
and gave it to him, telling him where I found it,
and how; that I had never had time to look at the
papers
until last evening; that they were all safe, I
believed
.
He thanked me again, asked if I knew in
what part of the country his son was? I answered I
did notthat it made little odds where he was for all the
good he was likely to do, as he was bent upon the
gallows
and no matter how soon he obtain his object.
Upon going into the cabin I found Horton there and
asked him if he had made any discovery respecting his
wife. He shook his head sorrowfully and intimated that
he had not.
The conveyance of the shares in Bank Stock being
finished, that respecting the two houses which Hunter
owned in the city I objected to, on the ground that they
ought to be valuedperhaps they might over-run the
amount due: however, if they should, the attorney
remarked
that as I intended to sell them I could return
the overplusI was not so sure respecting that,I
should want a house for Mrs. Cary, and my uncle as he
only came to the country upon trial and might chuse to
reside in one of them. After hesitating some time, at
length I resolved to consult Hunter, and my uncle
desired
him to be called. When he came and signed the
conveyance
for the stock. I asked him what he thought his
real property was worththat I did not wish it
conveyed
without being valued by himself or some other
person
,
if I did not chuse to take it at his price. He
replied
that he could not tell at this time what
was
the
value, and the lawyer made out the conveyance, leaving
a blank for the consideration. I paid him for his trouble
and he departed.
We remained but a short time behind him, to know of
Hunter who he would prefer to value the property; he
answered he had no choicethat any two respectable
men might set a price on it. I observed that I would
rather he would name some of his friends, if he had any;
that as to my own part. I cared not much who valued it.
He then mentioned a Mr. S, and said I could chuse
another myself.
This being understood, we left him: my uncle
returning
to the hotel with Sambo, whilst I accompanied by
Jinkins and Horton, set out to have the property valued.
It was quite a show to see how Hunter and Horton
eyed each other: two mastiffs, eager to attack each other,
could not have looked more hostile. The sight filled me
with horror.
The property was valued at ninety six thousand
dollars
.
This added to the shares, which was four
thousand
sixty-six each, made $112,264. I desired Horton
to go and stay with my uncle until we should return,
taking
Jinkins with me as one of the witnesses to the
conveyance
.
We were not long in the transaction.
Hunter
was well pleased with the valuation, and asked me
how much I conceived to be behind. I gave him a
memorandum of the amount of the whole I had received.
The bonds he could calculate at his leisure, saying I was
not determined whether I should exact interest or not
for the debts my father paid of histhat I did not know
the amount exactly, and I thought the best way would
be just to lump it, and be done with it.
True, half of the goods that were sacrificed were his,
but that he had never paid for them, and my father's
part was entirely sacrificed for that purpose, besides all
his real property: that this was all his own doings and
richly did he deserve to pay the utmost farthing.
There was agreeably to the appraisement (which can
only be referred to) ninety thousand dollars worth of
goods, which sold for about forty, or forty-five thousand
dollars.
Two houses and lots worth fifty thousand dollars each
at the lowest calculation, did not sell for more than half
that sum. I shall exact the value of these at the time
when they were sold, undoubtedly, and very likely the
interest, which, between brothers, would be reckoned
just. The damage my family sustained through your
inhuman treatment is incalculable.
Having said this I asked him if he had any money
for present use, and whether he was well supplied with
necessaries, he replied that he wanted for nothing,
and we left him.
Jinkins was well pleased that I was likely to be
independent
.
In the goodness of his heart, he could not help
observing that he was glad the fellow had enough to
pay me, and that his lot was cast amongst such noble
hearted people.
If it had not been for you, dear Jinkins, and the best
of men, you would have had one less.
He said he was sorry for Horton, but that other dI
was beyond every thing.
These pirates are mostly from the north, said
Jinkins
:
I should be afraid to live in a cold country like
this,it's just a nest of cold hearted, cold blooded,
heathen
sort of folks,they look as shy at one, as if 'twas
old Davydamme if I like to be amongst 'um, to tell
you the truth.
He forgot that my uncle and I were born in the
northern
states.
I enquired of him, as we walked alone, whether it
was a general practice with my uncle to sit up so late
that his hours and mine by no means agreedthat I felt
quite unwell.
O, he has no particular rule, answered Jinkins,
he is fond of company night or day.
With such conversation we gained our lodgings.
Well child how do'st thee and Hunter make itdo'st
think he'll pay theecurse himI wish thee was done
wi' him'let him get out o' my sightI hates the looks
o' him.
I informed him that I had received one hundred and
twelve thousand two hundred and sixty-four dollars from
him, and that there were still one hundred and twelve
thousand two hundred and sixty-four dollars behind,
counting the interest only on the bonds, which were
upwards
of twenty years, though I had calculated them at
twenty years only.
Ah, the dog, thee oughten to bated him an acethee
has too much o' the Burlington blood in thee.
Perhaps it is all I can get, replied I, and much
more than I expected.
Thee'll have to divide with Horton here, just a sum
for gratuity: I'll make it to thee, my son, thee knows,
and it would seem doing one good turn for another, thee
understands me? and when I hears from Boston we'll
give Hunter a bit, and just let him go to the dI his own
way.
The men now arrived, who were the other witnesses
to the conveyance: after treating them with the best we
had, we all set out to have the conveyance proved, that
I might take possession of the property.
I was put in possession of the houses by the same Mr.
S, who had been appointed by Hunter to value it.
This man, it appeared, acted as agent for him.
When I handed him the letter from Hunter, (which
was open) requesting him to put me in possession, he
seemed to be much surprised, and asked me where was
Hunter himself? he would be glad to see him first?
Here is the conveyance, sir, said I, you see it is
signed by himselfyou see the consideration and you
have written instructions to give me peaceable
possession
,
which I demand before these witnesses: if you do
not, you must abide by the consequences. I have no
more to say, and was about to return, when he called
me and said, he would give me possession.
Whether he suspected the truth, as regarded Hunter's
situation, or whether he was ignorant of Hunter's
character
and practices, I was at a loss to determine:
certain
it was that he appeared to me to be afraid to enquire
further about him, yet I might have been mistaken.
CHAPTER XXI.
Upon
being put in possession of the property, I
requested
the names of the tenants and the rate per annum,
in order to exact from them the rent, which was to go on
from that day. One of the houses was a very spacious
brick building, containing three stores or shops, several
lumber-rooms and four families. The other was
comparatively
small;only two stores were kept in it, and
three families above stairs. I determined to let them
remain
in it until I should consult Mrs. Cary. If she was
willing to remove to New-York, this house would suit
her very well, but if she preferred a residence in
Philadelphia
,
she should certainly have the option.
One of the families in the latter had the appearance of
being in perfect indigence. They were lately from
Ireland
,
(indeed they were all Irish, but this family had not
long arrived from thence,) had been sick and made
a wretched appearance.
The family consisted of a man, his wife and six
children
.
Two of their children had died since they landed,
and two others were then lying in bed very ill. The
man looked like a ghost, and the woman very little
better
.
He reeled as he attempted to walk. I informed
him I had become his landlord, and that he would have
to give a new lease, as I walked to the bed on which
the children were lying, to examine their pulse. Their
fever was excessively high indeed.
Ah, poor things, said their mother, they're very
ill, they haven't tasted mate these eight days.
I asked her if a physician attended them?
No indeed your honour, they're no the sort o'
Doctors
that we have in the aul counthryhe's just been,
but the bare
twiste
, and gives them a sort o' stuff, a don't
know what it is.
Jinkins, said I, go for the best Physician you
can get, my friend.
The Lord bless you, for that's the kindest word I
heard spoken since I been in the counthry, said the
afflicted
mother.
I asked her if she was able to walk out, to get a
little
wine, and such things as might be necessary?
Aye, indeed am II'm not overly strong yet, but I
ha' been up and down tha stairs twenty times a day.
Here then madam, take this (handing her my purse)
and go get some wine and such things as you may want
for yourself and your children.
The Lard presarve usbut you are no a man at all,
you're just an angel, so ye aresave us, what will I do
with all this?
Go on, go on madam, said I, there is only a few
dollars in it.
When she left the room, the man expressed, or began
to make great acknowledgments, but I silenced him by
asking how long it was since he landed in the United
States?
He replied that it was three months, and that he had
not been able to do any work since.And what would
your honor be after asking for the rent, said he you
were saying I'd be
till
give a new lease?
Nothing sir, said I, I just want your obligation
to deliver the property to me, or my agent.
No thought I, sooner would I beg my bread from door
to door, than exact ought of this poor man.
He was about to overwhelm me with thanks, as
Jinkins
and the physician entered the room.
The doctor bowed, and asked if those were the
patients
?
I told him they were, and getting up gave him the
only seat there was in the room.
After he examined them, I asked him if he could do
any thing for them?
Certainly, said he, they are not beyond the reach
of medicine: with attention they will recover.
My dear sir, said I, do your best, I will amply
reward your pains.
18
He made no reply, but called for a string to bleed
them. He then gave them an emetic, and said he would
stay and see it operate.
Just as I had agreed to meet him there again at six
o'clock that evening, the mother returned with a fowl, a
bottle of wine, and two or three small loaves of bread;
she bowed to the doctor, and setting her things out of
her hand on the floor, (no table being in the room) she
approached me with
God preserve mebut ye told me there was only a
few dollars, and it's all goold, half-joes and some sort o'
guineasI never see'd the like. O, if I wasn't scared
out o' my wits when I went to pay the man for the wine,
I trembled like a leaf. `What's the matter, good
woman
?'
said the man`Nothing,' says I, `but the
gentleman
has surely been mistaken to rust me with so much
goold, Agles I think he called them, makin' his fun.'
Marcy, if I didn't fly, wi' all speed back, fearing
somebody
would rob me; ye shouldn't trust a poor woman
body like me wi' all your money, it might have been all
robbed from me, said she, handing me the purse with
its remaining contents.
I could not forbear laughing at her, as I took the purse
out of her hand, not with a view of taking back the
money, but to empty the contents into her hand, not
caring to part with the purse.
Aye, sir, do look, alay my life she's let them chate
her, she is such a simpleton, said her husband; but
when he discovered my object, he was thunderstruck.
Before I left her, however, I explained that the large
pieces, pointing them out to her, were ten dollars, and
the smaller ones five. I told her that I should return
again in the evening and in the meantime I should
send her a girl to assist her: that the fatigue she must
undergo, attending upon her children was more than she
was able to bear in her present situation.
I waited not for a reply, but telling Jinkins we would
walk, took leave and proceeded to our lodgings.
As we walked onward, I asked the first person I met,
where I should find a girl? that I wished to procure one
to attend a sick family.
He told me to step into any of the alleys, and I would
find one almost at every house.
I thanked him, and proceeding into one of those alleys,
found no difficulty whatever in obtaining a servant; I
might have got a dozen had I wanted them. I stepped
up to one and told her my businessshe very readily
assented. I enquired her name.
Sarah Murphy, sir, said she.
Irish to Irish, I thought.
Well, Sarah, my good girl, I wish you to proceed
to my house, telling her the number, without delay.
Make hastethe family is in great distress. I'll pay
you your wages: here, I'll give you earnest, (pulling
out my empty purse.)
Jinkins laughed, and told the girl as he handed her a
dollar, that I was the greatest cheat in the city: not
to believe a word I saidbut put off Sarah, you shall be
paid, said the mischievous Jinkins.
As we pursued our walk, I picked up a lawyer to do
the necessary writings respecting the leases, giving him
a memorandum of the business I wished him to perform,
I directed him to bring them when done to the City
Hotel.
When we arrived at home we found dinner ready, and
my uncle chided me for staying so long. But when I
explained
the cause to him he was pleased.
Ah, said he, thee's my fellow; I wouldn't give a
rope's-end for money to hoard it up, and a comrade
dying o' wantod if 'don't go and see 'um myself. How
far does't live?
I observed that the evening was too cold for him to
turn out, but he could wrap himself up warm to-morrow
and go, and look at my property; that the poor family I
mentioned lived in one of the housesmeantime if he had
no objection, I would invite the doctor to sup with us,
provided he was unengaged.
Oh, to be sure, I am surprisedwhy can't ye have
whoever thee likes, child, without axin o' me. And
Jinkins
did go the rounds wi' thee?
Yes, I replied, Jinkins went for the doctor, and
gave me some other very seasonable assistance.
Yes, said Jinkins in his usual mannerhe
looked
well after telling the girl he'd pay her earnest,
pulling
out an empty purse.
My uncle laughed at the jest, and we sat down to
dinner
.
Being fatigued from incessant walking in the
morning, I proposed some game of amusement to my
uncle.
Well, choose your game, I'm your man.
You will beat me too easy at backgammon, let's
have a game at whistI'll take Jinkins, and you take
the landlord.
Agreed, said he.
But, where is Horton? I asked.
Was he not here?
Oh! yes, he keeps a grieving about his wife and
childrenhe'll be back again he said. Sambo, go and
tell the landlord to come, and bring a pack o' cards.
In a short time he appeared.
I requested Sambo to recruit the fire and we sat down
and played till six o'clock.
I requested the landlord to have a good supper,
observing
,
as I put on my great coat that I would have a
stranger with me when I returned.
He bowing and retiredI set out alone, leaving
Jinkins
to keep my uncle company.
Tell 'um, said the old man, I'll come and see 'um
myself to-morrow, God willing.
The Doctor had been there but a few minutes before
me, and upon enquiring how the patients were, he
informed
me that the fever had abated considerably; that the
pulse promised favourably, and there was little doubt but
they would be better by morning. He gave them some
pills, and said he would call again early in the morning.
The poor woman was in raptures, upon hearing the
report of the Doctor.
Both her and her husband eyed me, as if I had been a
Deity, whom they seemed to love, as well as fear.
She was making herself a coarse dress, which was
barely fit for a human being to wear. I suspect the poor
creature had purchssed it out of the money I gave her,
and grudged herself a better, lest she might encroach too
much upon her funds. I therefore, while the doctor was
engaged with the children, entered familiarly into
conversation
with her upon the impropriety of working with
a needle, until she was perfectly wellthat she would
injure her eyes.
The Doctor said she could not do any thing worse;
it was too severe upon the eyes.
I desired her to send Sarah out and get plenty of
nourishing
food and drink for herself and her husbandthey
ought to have plenty of wine, fresh broths, and such
things, and not to stint herself in any thing; that I
perceived
she was quite too stingy.
I was telling her so myself, said her husband,
just a bit ago. She says we'll want wood to keep the
children warm; if such a gentleman as this comes across
us, says I, we'll want nothing.
I saw nothing to eat or to drink in the chamber, with
the exception of the bread, &c. she bought in the
morning
,
but some raw potatoes. The children, those that
were not sick, looked as though they were famished.
Ah, poverty! thou art an ugly thing.
I addressed the Doctor, when his visit was over,
telling
him I should be happy if he would favour me with
his company that evening, that I had bespoke an oyster
supper at the City Hotel, and every thing else that the
city afforded, that he would meet an old gentleman there,
who was rather uncouth in his manners, having been at
sea most of his life, but one of the best hearted men in
the worldhe was another uncle Toby.
He thanked me, and said he would go with pleasure.
When we arose to depart, I shook hands with the
family, telling Sarah if she would be a good girl, and
attend well upon the children, I would buy her the finest
gown in New-York.
Indeed, I will do that, sir, if you were to give me
nothing at all.
As I walked down stairs, I called to mind my uncle's
message, it would have been cruel to have neglected it.
Though couched in few and plain words, it shewed the
genuine qualities of his heart. I begged pardon a
minute
,
and turning back, delivered the message.
18*
God bless him, say't we're much obliged to his
honour. exclaimed both.
As there was no other alternative, we, I mean the
Doctor and I, introduced ourselves to each other. His
name was Nevitt. As we walked to the hotel, he
observed
.
You are a stranger in this city, I presume?
I told him I was.
I knew almost, said he, that you were, from the
sympathy you expressed for those poor people. We who
are accustomed to see such things daily, have become
quite callous to it. Perhaps no city in the universe
evinces
a greater proof of charity than New-York; humane
societies both public and private, are established
throughout
the city, of both sexes, who make it their business
and pride to attend and relieve the poor, and yet numbers
die for want of attention. So many foreigners pour in
upon us, particularly from Ireland, who generally
arrive
sick, and have not the means of providing for
themselves
,
that I assure you it keeps us busy to attend to
them, and after doing all in our power many of them
suffer
as you see. The poor creatures spend all they have
in getting here, and then they are mostly so sick, (
particularly
their children) that they are unable to get any
further
,
and here we have them upon us. I am certain that
in the course of my practice two-thirds of it has been
devoted
to those poor people. You have seen nothing of
our city; if you were to spend a day or two visiting
those alleys, you would be surprised to see the number of
poor people, and particularly when any epidemic rages.
If you were to relieve all that actually stood in need of
relief you would soon have nothing to relieve with; and
at this season of the year their situation is at the worst,
wood being so high that the poor cannot afford enough to
keep themselves warm. I have known instances of their
lying in bed all day for want of fuel.
I was much pleased and improved by the Doctor's
conversation
.
A sad picture, sir, you have given me of human
distress
,
but I have suffered so much myself that perhaps I
feel more sensibly for their situation than one that has
not; merely seeing and not feeling misery cannot have
the same effect on us.
Very true, said the Doctorbut what would be
the conclusion, because you felt more sensibly you would
relieve more bountifully and more extensively: you
would find no end to it, and by that means you would
soon put it out of your power to relieve any. For
instance
,
you would relieve all the distressed this year:
next year you might do the same, and so on; and by an
imprudent liberality to some, would deprive others who
might be equally entitled to charity.
There was a great deal of justice and reason in the
Doctor's remarks, and I resolved to profit by them.
Tell me what you would have done, said I, had
you happened upon those poor people we have just left?
Most certainly, sir, replied he, I would have
given
them physic, or probably had them conveyed to the
hospital; I would have given them a moderate share of
food and clothes, or have seen that it was done.
I must keep out of those alleys then, thought I, as we
entered the Hotel; it will not do for either me or my
uncle to visit them.
I introduced the Doctor to my uncle and Jinkins.
Well, how do'st come on, Doctor, with the sick
people? said the old man, take some wine, sirdo'st
think can cure 'um?
I think I can, sir; the fever seems to yield
considerably
.
Ah, curse the fevers, I had 'um myself, they're not
good company: I had 'um best part o' three weeks see,
and I'm not quite over 'um yetbut mighty glad as
Charles happened on 'um to-day. How did come to find
'um out my son?
They were in one of the houses I purchased of
Hunter
,
sir; and in visiting the apartments to take down the
people's names, for the purpose of executing new leases,
I found this family in distress.
Didn't tell 'um should pay rent, did ye?
I did not, sir; on the contrary, I told them they
might live there gratis until they were all well.
Thee did'st right, me son, that was right'calls.
him my son. Doctor, though he's only my nevyBut
he's just as like me as if 'was my son, and I don't see
how that can be: you landsmen be always as fraid o'
your purse, as if ye thought some serpent in it would
bite off your fingers.
The servant entered and before any of us could reply,
told us supper was ready.
The landlord had fulfilled his promise with much
honour
to himselfa fine dish of oysters was smoking at
each end of the table, which was set as usual exclusively
for us, and every other dainty the market afforded at
that season. Wine and cheerful conversation seasoned
the whole After supper the Doctor sat a couple of
hours, conversing principally with the old gentleman;
on taking leave he said he would visit his patients
early in the morning, and probably they would need no
more attention.
Od, Doctor, thee must visit 'um till 'gets wellI'm
going to see 'um myself, in the morning, I wants to see
how 'looks when 'is just saved from starvation, with
sickness, and want, and such things.
Oh, sir, they are quite ravished with your nephew,
after he made his escape from them in the morning`the
Lord save us, and what sort of a man is yon, see the
goold he's given me,' said the woman. `And wouldn't
wait till he thanked an' our last fire of wood was just
laid onI tould you, William, till trust in the Lord when
ye were loth till
purt
on, but ye never believe what I
say. Ye see now what he has done, when I mind ye of
that again now ye'll believe. Oh, blessed be his Name,
for He is the God that helps in
throuble
. It would be
long ere ye'd get this in Ireland, ye might get a few
saxpences or there-away, maybe, at a fair, and he's
gone till send me a nurse for my children, bless the man.
I don't know who he is, and sent the gentleman that was
wi' him, almost the moment he come in for a Doctor;
ye'll mind now, William, when I bid ye trust in the
Lordsee here how much there is, one, two, three, four,
five, six o' these big ones, Agles I think he called them,
and how many o' the little ones, let me seeseven, and
ever so many silver pieces, I don't know what they are:
but maybe I didn't give them the goold a day, weary on
themthe Lord forgive me, but I thought the gentleman
would have me hanged if I touched his goold, and see
he's give it all to me.'
Ye can pay your rent now, Matty, it's due in a few
days, said her husband.
Yes indeed they may come as soon as they like, I'll
warrant they come time enough, they're not like his
honour
that's got the house now long life till him, said the
man, he tould me when ye wer' gone to buy things, that
I might stay in it rent free.
Did he? rejoined the woman.
I left them both praying for his long life and
prosperity
.
Good evening gentlemen.
You must call again Doctor, wont'ee? said my
uncle
,
as the Doctor withdrew.
The next day when the cool of the morning was over,
and I thought my uncle could go out with safety, I had a
carriage brought to the door for him to ride to the
Irishman's
,
while he was wrapping himself up in a double
portion
of flannel, cursing the cold country all the while,
the lawyer came with the papers.
After every thing was ready, I stepped into his
chamber
for the old gentleman. I saw him as I entered,
sliping
something in his pocket, telling Sambo to stay in his
room until he returned.
On our way, we drove by the other house, wishing to
show it to my uncle likewise, he expressed great
satisfaction
upon seeing it, saying it'll bring thee some rent
child, better saved than lost.
I asked him if he did not want an apartment or two
in it to stow his freight, as I perceived it still aboard
the ship, that it would suit him very well, and I wished
to know, as I was about to rent them.
O I han't much there, I ha' sold the most o' it.I
got but a few things, one small store-room will hold it,
thee may save one since it 'ill please thee to do thy uncle
a kindness.
When we arrived at the other house, the old man's
patience
was almost overthrown again at the high houses.
He made out however, with Jinkin's assistance, and a
great deal of grunting puffing and blowing, to effect his
landing at the head of the stairs, swearing all the way
that none but a lubberly landsman would build such a
house, and that if it was his, he would throw it down
right away, fore some body would break their necks.
When he entered the chamber, he greeted the lady and
shook her husband by the hand, and enquired how
doest all do, how is thy sick ones?
Oh God be praised your honour, but their getting
bravely, said their father.
I'me glad to hear it, glad to hear it, but friend thee
must tell us thy name.
William McCallester, please your honour.
Well Mr. McCallester
The Lord love you sir, don't Mr. me, William's my
name.
Well William then, to tell the truth, o'the matter,
I was raised a bit that way myself, but went to sea and
forgot all thae things, and learned to swear, and say bad
words to boot, but my nevy was sayin' see' that 'had
been sick and puny, and thought would ride over a
bit, and see how come on, and I ha' been sick myself
too.
May the blessing attend you for that, but your nevy
and yourself both thegether, has saved all our lives,
said Matty, her husband (as she appeared to think,)
being
too cold in his plaudits, God knows for I don't know
where's the like o'ye.
I saw by the wrinkle on my uncle's brow, that it was
pouring upon him too fast.
Where be the children, said he, paying not the least
attention to Matty.
There they are, said William, pointing to them as
they lay in the bed.
He got up and went to them, felt of their pulse, spoke
kindly to them and told them when they got well they
must come to his lodgings and get some sugar-plumbs
must be good children and take what the Doctor tells
thee, be well in a trice, I ha' got the most sugar-plums,
apples, oranges, and ginger-cakes ever thee seed, soon
be well, must'nt eat um till gets well.
Jinkins who had stepped down stairs almost as soon as
we entered, re-appeared with calico to make the little
girls dresses, cloth to make the little boys' pantaloons
and roundabouts. There were three boys and three
girls; he handed it to Matty who was in raptures again,
but Jinkins was as unconcerned at this ebullition as
his patron.For myself, I was displeased that she
had not appropriated part of the money I gave her to
this use, as the poor things were all in rags, nor could I
perceive any addition to their general comforts, with the
exception of a bottle of wine, and one or two old chairs,
that I presumed they had borrowed from their next
neighbour. After my uncle had gratified his curiosity
and his feelings, I proposed that he should return with
Jinkins, that I had some business to attend to and would
return on foot, getting them first to attest the obligation
between me and McCallester. We took leave of the
family, Matty accompanying us to the head of the stairs,
blessing and re-blessing us while we were in hearing.
Being advanced rather before my uncle and Jinkins, I
turned round to get hold of the old gentleman's hand,
when I saw him hand Matty something with the
quickness
of lightning almost; she was going to speak, but
he silenced her with a prithee not a word, and gave
his hand to descend the stairs. I seemed not to see what
I thought he wished to conceal. He and Jinkins
entered
the carriage and drove home, whilst I repaired to the
respective tenants to receive their acknowledgments, and
joined the party at dinner.
Well, my son, just wondering what had become of
thee, take some wine, 'dare say thee needs itmade
Sambo keep up a good fire gin' would come, said he,
taking a glass of wine himselfbut thee don't mind
these cold winds at all like Jinkins and II thought
would afroze coming home, don't think thy uncle can
stand it in this cold country, and Jinkins and Sambo
complains almost as much as I do.
Charles, said he, as we were seating ourselves at
tablewhat sort o' a woman does that be? didn't
know what to make o' 'um, thought she had taken a fit
when the boy brought 'um the garments'think it's a
tantalizing sort o' thing, said he, as he supped his
brothdidn't know what to make o' her sort o'
language
.
Oh, sir, she followed the dictates of her heart no
doubt, she knew no other way to express her gratitude,
and her rescue from pinching want. Hunger, sickness,
and cold, are dreadful calamities, and she was actually
relieved from them all; no wonder at all to me, that her
joy was so extravagant.
I wished to set his mind at rest, on a subject so near
his heart, though I disliked the fulsome stuff as much as
he did.
And what do'st think o' Jinkins, see how gallant he
behaved too?
I did, sir, but he is too much like yourself in that
respect, he is too modest to listen to applause. Any
man who does a generous act, never wishes to hear of
it more. You ask me what I think of him? but this
question you did not expect me to answer in his presence.
Enough, said Jinkins, you make me sick.
Well tell'ee what, my sons, Jinkins is my son too
but what 'was going to say, is that thee and I, Charles,
just think alike a out thae things, but thee's got a
glibber
tongue in thy head than I, and can fetch it out
better.
Having finished our dinner, the Commodore thus
addressed
me and Jinkins
Tell'ee what thee do boys, if 'baint too tired, 'wants
to go to the Eliza, (name of the vessel) and tell'ee what
'wants thee to go for.
First thing thee does deliver the balance of the
freight that be marked S. T. to him, or his agent, and
all that be marked T. B. put into the ware-house that
thee's kept for me, Charles.
And the things that the governor of Havanna put
aboardJinkins knows um, ship um to Mary forth with
the pipe o' wine, and box o' china, d'ye hear, 'don't
know what could 'think I'd want wi' china, did think
'was goinga house keeping again?
But since old Frank showed a kindness, they'll
serve for Mary's wedding, and d'ye hear, write to
Mary that her uncle will be there and help to drink the
wine.
Send um off directly, that 'may have um in time
wouldn't miss their being sent for ten times the worth of
um, and should a sent them before now, but thou bast
been engaged with thy own business.
And harkee boy, don't stay long, I be lonesome and
like o' thatthank God I'm no coward, but atween
ourselves
,
I don't like these out-landish folks muchan
impudent
scamp o' a fellow bolted into my room this
morning
if
'hadn't a been off 'soon as he did I'd a shivered
his upper works for him.
I am just going to take a nap, and Sambo will stay,
and you'll soon be back.
We assured him we would use all possible despatch,
and putting on our great coats we set out.
As we pursued our walk, I observed to Jinkins that my
uncle spoke as if he had not that confidence in his situation
consistant with his happinesshad he much money about
him? or what did he (as he seemed to do) distrust in the
citizens of New-York?
He replied, that he never kept much about his
person
,
the small trunk in his chamber was all, that his
funds were principally in England, with the exception
of a few thousand dollars, which he deposited in the bank
in New-York, upon his arrival, for safe keeping.
That the dislike I heard him express, merely
extended
to the manners and ways of the people, being so
different from his own.
This explanation relieved me considerably by
removing
that anxiety I should otherwise have felt, while
absent
I nevertheless lost not a moment and proceeded
to procure cart-men to convey my uncle's reserve, while
Jinkins waited on S. T. requesting him to come and
receive
his goods.
In the course of the conversation with Jinkins, on the
subject of my uncle's wealth, he stated the amount at
upwards
of a million pounds sterling!
I obtained from Mr. S T. the address of Wharton
& Co. of Philadelphia, to whom I consigned the present
for Mary. In the meantime I paid Hunter a visit, and
19
informed him that I had received the property at its
valuation
,
and asked him
If he had made an estimate of the amount himself,
that I wished him to be satisfied, and not to say
hereafter
that I had taken advantage of his situation.
He replied, that the interest of the bonds was
easily
counted, that in twenty years they would double
themselves
,
and that I could if I chose, exact interest for
the property, as he felt perfectly unconcerned about any
thing whatever.
I told him I should not, and addressing him in a more
friendly manner than I had hitherto done, entreated him
not to be discouraged, that he would be restored to his
liberty once more, and I hoped his misfortunes would be
attended with a salutary effect; it would be the best
incident
of his life, if it should be productive of
reformation
.
He began to weep, I pitied him sincerely; he asked
me if I had heard of his son?
I replied I had not heard a word of him since I left
Philadelphia, but I would enquire and let him know the
result. I recommended to him to bethink himself of
some asylum, to which he could retire: that perhaps it
would not be safe for him to remain in the States,
although
neither my uncle or myself had any intention to
injure him, yet I could not be certain that Horton would
not, though my uncle had strictly charged him not utter
a word on the subject; but we were going to
Philadelphia
,
and no one knew what he might do in that event
he might however act as he pleased, I merely suggested
the propriety of the thing.
I enquired how much money he had, or whether he had
any about his person? He pulled out a small purse of
gold, which I did not wait for him to count, there might
have been forty or fifty guineas in it.
I shook hands with him, told him not to despond, that
he should not be stripped of every thing, that I would
divide
with him as long as he lived, provided he behaved
himself, and would let me know where to find him. He
shed a flood of tears, but made no answer. As I left
him I desired the guard to let him want for nothing.
Upon enquiry I found that S. T. would by no means
succeed in receiving the goods that day, nor for two days
to come, at the rate they proceeded. It was now nearly
sun-set, and excessively cold, I therefore proposed to
Jinkins that we should return home, and let them attend
in the morning with a more effective force.
In fact I shivered with cold, as also did Jinkins, and
was very near being provoked besides, at those hardy
sons of the north, who, with shirt sleeves rolled up,
perfectly
unconcerned, burst into a loud fit of laughter at
Jinkins and myself.
When we returned home we found Horton and the old
man thereas much rejoiced to see us as if we had been
absent a week.
Horton had been twice to see me in the course of the
present and preceding day; I apologzied to him, saying
that the pressure of business had put it out of my power
to attend to him.
I told him, said my uncle, that thee was run off
thy legs.
He had made no discovery relative to his wifethe
last that was known of her, was, that she despaired
of paying her rent, and absconded in the night, taking
her children with her, and what little movables she had;
and that her youngest child was six months old. These
particulars he learned from her next neighbour.
I observed it was pretty evident she had left the city,
and that she must have taken water, as she could not
have conveyed her children by any other means: he ought
to put an advertisement in the papers, I knew of no
other
way.
It may be that she has gone to Boston, or perhaps
Philadelphia: I should enquire when I arrived there, but
the surest course would be to advertise.
Calling for pen, ink, and paper, I wrote to Wilson, for
the first time since I left him, instructing him to attend
to receiving the groceries, which would be delivered to
Wharton & Co. that it was a present to Mary from her
uncle, and that he would shortly be there himself, and
help to drink the wine: briefly, that the whole of the
articles
were to decorate the wedding supper, which she
might expect in the course of eight or ten days, at
farthest
.
I gave him a summary of all the news I deemed of
interest
to him, and enclosed one hundred dollars for each of
the girls, to make any further addition they might chuse,
against the long looked for day.
Being at leisure I repeated to my uncle the particulars
of my interview with Hunter. The old gentleman
seemed
much perplexed in mind on account of this wretched
man, he seemed to be at a loss what course to pursue in
the final disposal of him.
Charles, said he, I wish'ee would give thy
opinion
about him, I hates to see the fellow hanged after
taking
from him all he's got, and yet it seems to be kind o'
taking the laws in one's own hand. Hang it all, 'wish
'ad been to the dI before 'come across himDoesn't
seem sorry?
He does sir.
Curse him, 'don't want to hurt a hair of his head.
I hastened to set his mind at ease, by telling him that
were I in his place, as soon as we heard from Boston
I would just give him the balance of his property, if
there should be any left, and if there were not I would
give him enough to support himgive him his liberty
and let him go where he pleased. I saw no impropriety
in it at all, that if this course was not consistent with
justice it was with mercy.
As for taking all he has, I have notI have only
retaken my own, at infinite loss, and with his own
consent
,
(I gave him the option) and this I should have done
in any event.
But my son thee knowest he's a vile wretch, 'may
turn about when's got his liberty, and swear that thee
tak'd it unfair, or somehow like that, and would make it
out as force work, being confinedI ha' been thinking
a good deal about it.
Let him try that, no dangerhe could take no step
on that ground that would not tend to his own
destruction
.
Don't you believe, sir, that Hunter, knave as he
is, would be such a fool as to attempt any thing of that
sort?
Make yourself perfectly easy, sir, on Hunter's
account
;
I will take the entire responsibility on myself in
every thing which relates to him.
As to the suppression of the prosecution against
Hunter, so far from considering it culpable, it would be
thought malicious and revengeful. What did I know of
Hunter? my testimony would not criminate him, I saw
no overt actstrue, he was, in company with the
pirates
by whom I was taken, but I knew him not as
Hunter
until we were in the cavernhe plotted my death,
but I am still alive.
Horton's testimony would condemn him; but who is
Horton? equally as notorious as Hunter by his own
confession
.
In the event of a prosecution I, as well as
yourself
,
would be compelled to declare the whole truth,
which would go very near invalidating, if not altogether
defeating Horton's testimony.
I see nothing therefore incompatible with the nicest
sense of justice in the contemplated lenity to Hunter.
Well my son, thee may take the disposal of him
thyself
,
said my uncle, I know nothing about thae law
matters, I likes to hear thee speak kind hearted about it,
and if thee had been a lawyer pleading for 'um, couldn't
ha' said more.
The next morning Jinkins went to deliver the balance
of the freight, and as this was the first opportunity I had
had, I related to my uncle the distressed situation in
which I found my sister and her companions.
Taking the letters I had received from her in
Tennessee
out of my pocket book, I read them to the old
gentleman
.
It was with great difficulty I got through the
performance
,
and it was indeed the first time I had dared to read
them with any kind of attention. As I proceeded, the
perturbation of my uncle's feelings increased, until in
the end he wept like a child, and I was very little
behind
him. The first sentence he uttered after wiping his
eyes, was
Well, thae Hunters must be limbs o' the dl;
'couldn't let a poor woman alone. That Dupon, or
whatever
be his name, is a prince of a man; Oh, how 'do
19*
love himand what be the names of thae women that
showed a kindness to your sister?
Mrs. Cary and her daughter sir.
And shall 'see 'um?
Yes sir, they are all together.
Oh! if 'don't hug 'um'wish 'was there now,
getting
up and walking the floor with hasty steps, and as
for thae Simmons or Simkins, the dl if there be's
any dl ought to get 'um'cant see how. Well, a
bad woman's a bad thing.
Give me some wine, SamboGod Almighty will ha
ye happy at last in spite o' 'umall but me; ah, my
son, this is a short life, but long trouble; but I shall see
my Eliza and my babe, and would cheerfully leave this
world to-morrow.
The Lord has truly laid heavy afflictions on our
house, my child; but 'twas his will to do so and I submit
whom he loveth he chasteneth, my father used to say;
I ha' often thought o' that. He chastened him sore, and
has chastened his sons.
He was a good Christian man'was meek as a
lamb. And thee tak'd the women out o' the old house
first thing, that was right'ought to ha' been hanged if
thee hadn't.Alligators, alligators all! why they're as
bad as pirates.
At the end of seven days from the time I wrote to
Boston, I received an answer to both letters, one from
Mr. S and one from Mrs. Jones. Mrs. Jones' letter
was as follows:
Sir
I received your favour this day: I am truly glad to
hear that you have returned, and that Mary is at length
happy. I have never heard of Dupon since Mrs. Cary
left hereold Mr. Simpson is dead. His oldest
daughter
,
Clarissa, ran away with Hunter, it is supposed, as
she was missing the night he escaped from prison, and
has never been heard of since.
It was thought by some that she assisted him in
getting
out; some say they went to Philadelphia, others
say to New-York. It was thought that this conduct of
his daughter, and that of his profligate son, broke the
old man's heart.
The family is now in great distress, having had
almost
every thing sold by the creditors of Mr. Simpson.
The young Simpson roams about the town a despised
vagabond. Dear sir please to give my love and best
respects to the ladies, and tell Mary I wish her a great
deal of happiness, and shall expect a bride's favour.
Yours, respectfully, SARAH JONES.
Mr. S's letter ran thus:
Sir
I hasten to reply to both yours of this instant.
Hunter
owns the property mentioned in your letter. You
refer to me for information respecting its value: this I
would wish to decline.In the first place I am not a
judge; and in the second place the price of property is
so fluctuating that it is not easy to say. It might sell to
day six per cent higher than it would to-morrow.
It rents at present for  dollars per annum:
perhaps it might sell for  thousand dollars. I
have  thousand dollars in my hands, subject to
Hunter's order. There is no incumbrance on the
property
,
at least none that I know of.
I have just seen Mr. P he says Dupon left this
city two years ago, supercargo for a trading house in
Kingston, Jamaica.
He superintended some commercial concerns for the
house of P & Co. in this city, as being concerned
with the aforesaid house in Liverpool. Dupon was to
have returned to the United States, but hearing his
father
was in bad health, and of some other indispensable
business, he proceeded to Liverpool, and sent an agent
here who has continued to act for the firm ever since.
This is all the information, sir, that I am able to give
you respecting him.
Your obedient servant, S.
I waited on Hunter the moment I received the letters,
taking witnesses along with me to attest the conveyance
of the property. I left it to him, however, to execute
an order for the money, as I wished to have done with
him, or a title to the property, alledging that perhaps he
might sustain loss in selling it just now, as the
apprehension
of war would undoubtedly influence the value of
such property in Boston, and I wished him to make no
sacrifice on my account.
True, the money did not quite amount to the balance
due me, but this I told him made no differenceI would
execute a receipt in full.
He preferred the latter alternative and executed an
order
for the money, which I received that evening, through
Mr. L. of New-York, who very politely paid the
money
and took in the orderand once more I waited on
Hunter. I gave him a receipt in full, told him he was
now at liberty to go where he pleased, that I should
preserve
inviolable secrecy on the subject of his late
conduct
,
so long as he continued to behave well, and would
undertake for the rest of our party.
But the moment I hear of the smallest deviation in
your conduct, Hunter, you are done for this worldthe
property owned in Boston, and the bonds he possessed,
would support him handsomely, and maintain his son,
should he ever find him.
I asked him if he had any other children?
He had not, he had never had but that one, and
wished he had never been born.
Where is your wife?
She is dead.
Well, you have enough left yet, and perhaps more
than in strict justice you are entitled to: but I spare your
feelings Hunter, since I find you are possessed of some
God grant you may reform and become a good man, and
should you ever happen to fall into want or distress,
Hunter, call on me, I will divide my last dollar with
you.
He wept during the whole conversation. I told him
I must leave him, being in haste to prepare for leaving
New-York, and that if he wished to leave the country, I
wonld aid him in any way he wished, or render him any
other service in my power.
He asked me where Horton was?
I replied, I believed he was still in the city; that
he was almost in a state of distraction on account of his
wife and childrenthey had left New-York, and no
one could tell where they had gone.
I saw her in Philadelphia, said Hunter, the last
time I was there, about two years since, and have seen
Horton often since; but as he never mentioned her name
to me, I never thought of it since. I understood he had
another wife.
Yes, he acknowledges that to his sorrow; but she
has left him and he is very anxious to find his real wife
he will be glad to hear of her.
Mr. Burlington, said Hunter, do you think
Horton
would betray me? I have some business I wish to
arrange in the city, and then I would gladly seek my son
and endeavour to reclaim him.
To this I replied he had promised the contrary both
to me and my uncle; but what confidence his word is
entitled to, I cannot say. You know the man better
than I do, you must judge for yourself.I shall,
however
,
name the subject to him again, and make it the
condition
of exemption from prosecution to which he has
subjected himself by his own confession. You wish,
then, to remain in the city?
I believe I will remain here a week or two, said
he, as he discovered I was about to leave him.
Horton, you said, ought to have somethinghere's
a bond for seven hundred dollars, please to
I interrupted him, telling him to keep it, I would give
Horton a trifle to begin the world withthat he had
little
enough for himself.
He began to make acknowledgments of eternal
gratitude
;
but I interrupted him, saying he must excuse me:
that indispensable business pressed me to leave him,
telling
him that I should leave New-York early in the
morning
for Philadelphia, where I should be glad to hear from
him when convenientthat nothing would give me more
pleasure than to hear of his well doing: that I should
enquire for his son, and not fail to let him know, should
I discover any thing of him.
I for this purpose took a memorandum of his address,
and shook him cordially by the hand. I forgive you
sincerely, said I.
God bless you, Mr. Burlington, said Hunter, the
tears streaming down his cheeksGod bless you
wherever you go.
The sailors, mate, and captain, who had accompanied
my uncle from Havanna, and who had been previously
paid, although they acted as guard upon Hunter, were
ignorant of the cause of his confinement. Nothing
therefore
was to be apprehended from them injurious to him,
had they remained in the country, but they were on their
way to Havannahaving discharged them in the
morning
.
On my way to the Hotel I was met by Horton, who
was actually going to see Hunter to enquire about his
wife. He had called to see me, and being told that
Hunter
would soon leave the place, he hastened thither to
demand
something for his services, and enqure (as his last
resort) respecting his wife, as Hunter had been twice in
the States since he had.
I told him what Hunter had said about her, and had
he wished to have known what had become of her he
might have done so long since.
He now resolved to go on with us, to Philadelphia, if
we wold permit him.
Certainly, said I, Horton you may goand as
for taking any thing away from Hunter it is out of the
question: he has barely enough to support himself, he is
old and you are not, therefore you can do better
without
.
He said he should not have pretended to ask any thing
from Hunter, but for me and my unclehe had
understood
us as enjoining it upon him to do so; he was not
in wantthe Governor of Havanna had given him
sufficient
to keep him from want, though he had strictly
charged him to conceal it from the Commodore, lest he
might be offended.
Curse the money: I didn't want it at all.
Well, come along, said I, I have several things
to do this evening; I hope you will find your wife yet,
and be happy.
I told Hunter I would give you a trifle, he was
going
to give you a bond of seven hundred dollars, but I
would by no means take it from him. I would rather
have paid it out of my own pocket.
But let me tell you now Horton, as perhaps I will
not be at leisure shortly, never do you mouth about
Hunter
,
I have forgiven him for all his cruelty and
oppression
to me and my family, and I think you may extend
your lenity to him for crimes of which you have been
equally guilty.
Besides, you engaged with him with your eyes open
you were a free man, and can have no motive under
heaven for informing against him, other than revenge
you would gain nothing by it, you have tried that; and
you may rest assured, that the very moment you disclose
one syllable respecting his conduct, I will invalidate
your testimony.
I will enter a prosecution against you as his
accumplice
,
and you will find it go much harder with you than
with him. By invalidating your testimony he would be
acquitted. He has taken nothing from you that you or
he either have a right to. I believe in justice you ought
both to be hung; but I shall never injure you. In fact
I know nothing of him that would convict him, but I
know enough to convict you.
Horton declared solemnly that he never would attempt
to injure him; and so far he has kept his word, for they
are alive yet.
So soon as we entered our lodgings I desired Jinkins
and Sambo to get every thing ready for our journey to
Philadelphiathat we would set out by day-light next
morning.
That's good news, replied the old man, I hope it
aint so nation cold there as 'tis here. How did thee
make it wi' Hunter, my son?
Very well sirsettled every thing to my
satisfaction
;
but I'll relate the particulars to you when I return
it's growing late, and I have a little business to do in
the city, and then I shall devote the balance of the
evening
to you; and stepping into the street I left Horton
to disclose his good news at leisure.
I wished to purchase some jewels, to adorn the bride
and brides-maid likewisesettle with the Doctor and
Sarah, and bid my Irish friends adieu.
In going to the Doctor's shop I passed a Jeweller's.
While I was looking over and selecting such articles as
I thought suitable, a little girl came into the shop, and
handed the man a paper with something rolled up in it,
and desired him to give her the worth of it in money.
He opened the paper and took out a gold necklace. It
came into my head to purchase it as a present for Mrs.
Cary. I took the necklace out of his hand, and asked
him how much he thought it was worth. Looking at it
attentively I beheld my mother's name!
Who gave you this? said I to the child.
A sick lady, sir, that lives close by my mama's.
Come and show her to me, litle girl, I will purchase
it.
She ran before me to the house of the sick woman.
Upon
entering the same, I discovered a woman stretched on
a wretched bed, pale and shivering with cold, and not a
spark of fire in the room.
I asked her if she had any wood. She said no. I
pulled
off my cloak which was lined with flannel, and spread
it over her, stepped to the next door, and giving the man
of the house some change, begged him for God's sake to
get the sick woman some wood, as quick as possible,
while I went for a Doctor.
Take some of your own wood, and make her a fire,
quick my dear sir, for she appears to be dying. I then
ran for Doctor N, desired him to go with all speed,
telling him where, and that I would meet him there in a
few minutes.
I next ran to the Irishman's, gave Sarah some change
and begged her to get some wine with all haste, a
woman
is dying at No. 3, Dutch-streetbe quick my dear
girl, and follow after me.
She overtook me long before I got there, and was at
the place first.
When I returned I found a good fire She had drank
some of the wine, but the Doctor said she must have no
more, that it was not good for her complaint.
Get her some coffee, Sarah, or tea, something my
girl quick as possible.
I will, said Sarah.
And some toast too.
The Doctor said he would go and bring her some
medicine
in the meantime.
I told him I would walk with him, that as this was the
last evening I should spend in the city, I could not do
without his company. Asking the sick woman if she
felt any better? she said something, but I could not
understand
her. I put on my cloak and we set out. It
was now dark, and all the business I had started upon
to do yet.
As we proceeded, I asked the Doctor if the patient
was in danger?
He replied No, if she was well nursed.
What is the matter?
She has the , and she tells me she has had an
abortion lately, and with all, she is very low-spirited;
she seems as though she would rather die than live.
Wishing to have the business over as quick as
possible
,
I asked the Doctor to step into the first shop and
get the medicine, as my uncle would be looking for us to
come to supper.
He went in, got what he wanted, and we returned.
On our way back, I informed him how I happened to
to find her, and that I suspected it was a young woman
of good family in Boston, and that if it was the same,
she had been seduced by a man whose name was Hunter,
under promise of marriage, and left perhaps in this
situation;observing I would show him a letter to that
amount. We entered her abode once moreshe was
drinking her tea, and seemed greatly revived.
While the Doctor was preparing his medicine, writing
directions, &c I paid Sarah her wages for attending the
sick children (whom she said were well) and gave her
something to buy a her a dress, agreeably to promise. I
also paid her a month's wages in advance to attend on
the sick woman, telling her the Doctor would write to
me, and I should know if she failed in her duty; but I
don't think you will, Sarah.
No sir, indeed I will not, you have been too good to
me ever to do any thing to displease you; and I know
that if I was to be a brute and neglect the sick woman,
you would be very angry, and good right you would
have.
20
I then gave the sick woman what I thought was the
value of the necklace, and the Doctor having completed
his visit, we took leave. I shook hands with the invalid
and with Sarah, giving her another injunction to take
care of her charge.
As we returned, I called at the jeweller's, took those I
had selected, paid him, and proceeded to my uncle's. On
our way, I requested the Doctor when the patient got
well, if ever she did, to tell her that I was Mary
Burlington's
brother, and that I knew the necklace to be one that
once belonged to my mother, and I did not wish it to go
out of my family; and if she chose to return to Boston
and would let me know, I would aid her in the
undertaking
.
I requested him to excuse me to the McCallesters,
that I fully intended to call on and take leave of them,
but it so happened that I could not. In short, I begged
of him to write to me in the course of a week, and
inform
me how he succeeded in his efforts to restore the
young woman's health; and if he could at any time
beguile
her of her story, I should be happy to hear it.
When we arrived at the Hotel, my uncle said: What
happened too thee, my son, that thee 'staid so long?
why supper 's been waiting.
I beg pardon, uncle, I
O, now none o' thy pardons, thee knows 'was thy
safety; but I see as thee's got the Doctor, suppose ye'd
helped one another if had been any combat. Take some
wine and let's go to supper, thae ha' been for us 'dont
know how often.
The Doctor and I took a double glass apiece.
I asked my uncle if he thought he could stand the
cold to-morrow?
I don't knowcan't be worsted, Jinkins ha' got me
a stove to put my feet upon.
I told him if I could once get him to Philadelphia,
he would do wellthat there were so many ladies there,
that would take pleasure in waiting upon him, and
amusing
him; and there is your old acquaintance,
Slyboots
,
and here's myself, and Jinkins, and Sambo and
Ling
[11]
[11]
A favourite spaniel of my uncle's, which I have hitherto overlooked?
why there will be a large family of us. Uncle
you'll have to be the chief or headman, as you are the
oldest; they made me the man of the house during the
short time I was there. You have been used to command,
and I think it will look more in character.
He laughed heartily, and said Ling would make
a much better commander o' a house than he would,
wouldn't know stem from stern o' it. Well Doctor, wish
'could go too.
I wish I could sir, I should be happy to do so, but
your son has found another patient that will require all
my attention for some time.
Another patientwho may he be? said my uncle.
It is a woman, sir. If she recovers, he may truly
say he has saved her life'been one hour later 'twould
been all over with her in this world.
I informed him whom I thought it was, and that I had
recovered the necklace mentioned in Mary's letter. It
may be presumed this part of my conduct met with the
warmest approbation from the old gentleman, though he
did not express himself after the modern fashion.
The Doctor spent the night with us, as we wished to
enjoy each other's company as long as possible; he and
I slept in the same chamber, and conversed till after one
o'clock. I was much pleased with the Doctorhe
displayed
an intimate knowledge of the world, a highly
improved mind, and refinement of manners.
In the morning we bid him and New-York adieu
going
part of the way by water (which is the usual way)
and part by land, taking Horton with us to his exceeding
joy. We arrived safe in Philadelphia on the second
day, which was the twentieth December, at ten o'clock in
the morning.
CHAPTER XXII.
Proceeding
to Mrs. Cary's, we drove up close
under
her parlour windowMary was at the door in an
instant
.
While Jinkins and I were helping my uncle out
of the carriage. Wilson followed by Martha and Mrs.
Cary, likewise appeared. Wilson met him as he
touched
the pavement, and after saluting Jinkins, Horton and
Sambo, helped him in the house. He was so benumbed
with cold, that he could scarcely walkMary had him
round the neck the moment he was at the threshold of
the door, and after `my dear uncle,' and `my dear niece,'
she led him, assisted by Martha, to the fire, where Mrs.
Cary was placing a chair to the best advantage, by
which to command its gladdening warmth.
The fire was ample and glowing, and by it sat a
pitcher
of hot toddy, from which Mrs. Cary filled a glass and
presented to my uncle the moment he was seated.
Indeed, said the old man, this is kind, after
drinking himselfthee must drink some too, madam,
and Mary here, and 'tother young woman 't helped me
in the house, tell 'um to come and drink for better
acquaintance
.
Martha drew near and giving her hand, asked him
how he did? and said that she was happy to be
acquainted
with him.
Miss Cary, uncle.
How do'st thee do, child? I'm glad to see thee
glad to see thee all.
Mrs. Cary now approached, giving her hand.
Mrs. Cary, uncle, said Mary again.
Finding Miss Watson stood back, I led her up to him
(for he was not permitted to rise)and here, said I,
is another friend of yoursMiss Watson, sir.
Miss Watson had become a little affected since I saw
herno wonder that. I next introduced Jinkins
separately
and severally to the ladies, taking care to give
him a gentle twitch on the arm, as I presented him to
Miss Watson, giving her a significant glance over his
shoulder, at the same time.
In this general and joyful meeting, I by no means
overlooked the faithful Sambo, who had very sociably
drawn up to the fire, amongst us.
Sambo, said I, stand forth and pay your respects
to the ladies.
He stepped out into the floor, and bowed profoundly
to each of them as I pronounced their names.
Now Sambo, said I, we will help ourselves to
some toddy, as the ladies are so taken with your master,
that they have overlooked you and I. (Wilson had
just helped Jinkins.)
A general pardon was asked for the omission on the
one part, and granted on the other. Indeed, they had
not had time, but this was no reason why I should not
have my jest. I helped him first.
And now, said I, go to the kitchen and set by
the firewhen your master wants you we will let you
know.
Horton had very prudently betaken himself to the
public portion of the house as soon as he got out of the
stage.
In the meantime the table was set for breakfast in the
parlour, and not very far from the place where my uncle
was seated. While Mrs. Cary, Miss Watson and the
new maid, (as I presumed) were issuing out and in,
bearing in dishes, coffee pots, tea urns, &c. Martha and
Mary had seated themselves by the old gentleman,
holding
his hands between theirs, at once to expel the cold,
and communicate heat, from their own. Seating myself
for the first time, on the other side of Martha, I
observed
to my uncle, that he was quite extravagant. I
think you had better have two more ladies, one to pull
off one gambado, and another to pull off the other, and
a fifth one to pull off your great-coat, cloak, &c.
O go to the deuce. Thee art a vile rogue, thee's
only jealous 'cause this young lady's warmin' my hands.
I see how the land lies.
Scarcely had the hint been given, when they untied his
20*
gambadoes, and disrobed him of his upper garments.
After a few minutes delay, and another dram round
(Christmas times) we sat down to a hot savoury
breakfast
.
To account for the prompt and very seasonable
accommodation
which met us upon our arrival, it is
necessary
to explain, that I had forwarded a note to Wilson,
by the driver of the mail stage, that we would be with
him to breakfast, and to have us a good fire, and plenty
to eat and drink. The family upon receiving this
intelligence
,
declined breakfasting until we came, and we
all sat down together. This, if it was not the feast of
reason, was truly the feast of ineffable delight!
When our spirits became exhilerated by hot drams,
hot coffee, &c. (I speak only for myself) I turned my
head round to the servant girl, who was standing but a
very short distance from the back of my chair, and thus
addressed her:
Sweetheart, have you heard anything of a wedding
that is to take place shortly, somewhere about here?
She seemed a little isconcerted, looking first at Mary,
and then at Mrs. Cary, as if to adapt her answer to what
she might discover in their looks; whilst I was leaning
with my arm over the back of my chair, waiting for a
reply. At length she answered she had not.
Thee have not? said my unclethen Charles has
dragged me here for nothing. Its very odd that I should
hear it at New-York, and know nothing 'bout 'here.
Well, markee Charles, thee don't fool old Tom so again.
Mary's face turned as red as scarlet, Martha with her
wonted sweet pensiveness, sat perfectly unconcerned
Mrs. Cary seemed to double her assiduity in plying my
uncle with the good things on the board, while Betsey
Watson primed up and cast a glance at Jinkins; Wilson
I thought seemed to be hurt, and evinced some anxiety
for the sensibility of his bride, which had mounted to her
eye, and seemed ready to violate every rule of politeness
by falling on her plate. I found this would not do.
You shall not be disappointed, sirI'll get married
myself first, that is if I can get any body to have me.
Seeming not to notice the disturbance I had excited in
the lovers' feelings. I asked the waiting-maid if she
would have me? This set them all to laughing, and
arrested the falling tear. The rest passed in mutual
enquiries
after each other's health, and how we had
severally
enjoyed ourselves, while Jinkins amused the
company
at intervals, with sundry ludicrous stories, which
he invented on my uncle and me.
While we were thus agreeably engaged, Ling taking
the advantage of our absence from the fire, had stretched
himself at full length in front of it, and testified his total
exemption from worldly cares in a profound slumber.
Breakfast being ended, poor Ling is now interupted.
He must have his breakfast too, said Mrs. Cary,
I dare say he would much rather have slept.
Sambo is not forgot, his breakfast is selected from the
best of every thing and sent to him by the servant.The
table is removed to make room for us to share alike in
the benefit of the fire, before which we seated ourselves
promiscuously.
Taking out my pocket-book, and opening it with great
deliberation, which drew the attention of every one
present
,
I produced from thence the jewels. There were three
sets, one a piece for the ladies, and a plain ring for Miss
Watson.
I waited on Mrs. Cary and laid them in her lap,
telling
her to take her choice, and devide the ballance
between
Martha and Mary, adding that perhaps they
might need them ere long.
Oh how beautiful! how briliant! how rich!
prodigious
!
inimitable! and all that.
After the astonishment subsided, I drew the gold
necklace
out, and holding it up by one end, asked Mary if
she knew it?
Do I know it, let me see? It's my necklace!Oh
brother how did you get it? I am delighted you have
been to Boston.
I will tell you some other time Mary, it is sufficient
for the present that you have got it.
Oh brother you are too good!
Better than you deserve Mary, for acting so foolish
at breakfast, said I, in a low voice.
Dear Charles, forgive me, said she, and leading
me to her chamber, she caught me round the neck and
kissing my cheek, fervently, the tears streaming down
her's.Dearest brother forgive me, take the necklace,
take every thing, I shall never he happy till you forgive
me, said she, while she held me clasped in her arms,
with her head reclined on my bosom.
I pressed her to my heart, and kissing off the tears,
told her to be a good girl. I forgave her.
Indeed brother I strove all I could against it, but
I was so glad to see my uncle, and to see you return safe,
that indeed I don't think I was rightly in my senses, and
besides Charles, I was ashamed before Jinkins, you don't
know how it hurts a girls feelings to be teazed at such a
time. I should not have car'ed a straw had it not been
for Jinkins.
In the mean time we had sat down on the side of the
bed, all the chairs being occupied, I asked her if she
was ready?
She hung her head, and answered she was.
Mary, said I, kissing her again, I am afraid you
will behave bad again to-night.
Indeed I expect as much myself brother.
You hurt Wilson's feelings to-day.
I don't care for him, he had no right to be hurt.
You don't care for him? that's a fine story, I shall
tell upon you.
Dont's care for that either, all that I regret is
displeasing
you.
Dear Mary I am not displeased with you, I did
speak a little inconsiderate, but my object was to cheer
my uncle into spirits. The good old man is subject to
fits of melanchoy and distress, on account of his
misfortunes
:He
still laments the loss of his wife and child,
and often weeps bitterly; we must therefore do every
thing in our power to drive away those sorrowful
reflections
,
duty and gratitude enjoin this upon us both; he is
remarkably fond of lively conversations mirth and
jollity
,
and is one of the best men in the world.
Wilson now entered with permission. I told him, I
had to pet the baby a little, and I suspected he was come
on the same errand, that between us both, we had
entirely
spoiled her. What do you think she says? (Mary
clapped her hand on my mouth, she says she don't care
for you. You did'nt speak truth then, did you my
. I slapped her and bid her go to her uncle and
chat with him, I wished to have some conversation
with Wilson. When she left us, I asked him if he
was ready?
Yes, he said he had been ready these five years.
Then I presume we may prepare as quick as
possible
;
said I, has the wine, &c. arrived?
Yes.
Well, and where is it, in the cellar hard by, the
china?
Mrs. Cary has taken care of that.
The sweet meats! What the girls have left of
them are in the closet.They must all be forthcoming
at supper, or the old hero will not be pleased. I
directed
Wilson to take somebody and have the wine and
spirits tapped, whilst I waited on the landlord to order
supper, and then we would go and get the license, so
that we might have time to dress, &c.
Wilson therefore walked with me to the landlord's
apartment; as we passed through the parlour, I was
much gratified to see Mary sitting on her uncle's knee,
with her arms round the dear old man's neck, Ah said
I, uncle you had better whip her, and make her go to
work.
Oh, s'can work some other time child.
I asked him if he had any objection to my bringing
Horton in to see the ladies?that it seemed like treating
him with rather too much contempt to exclude him
entirely
from our company.
O yes, to besure bring him in, what dos't ask me
for, can't 'ee bring who thee's mind to?
It had always been my opinion, that mildness and
clemency
are better calculated to reform mankind, than
cruelty
and harshness. In the present instance it, may be
thought by some, that I stretched my maxim rather too
far, but I do not think so; if I can by any means effect
a reformation in my fellow creatures, those means which
are dictated by humanity ought certainly to be attempted
in the first place, and in labouring to this end, we ought
never to forget that the offender is our brother. Every
symptom of a thorough reformation was signally
displayed
in Horton's appearance.The keen remorse, and the
deep sorrow for his crimes, and his conduct to his wife
and children, were indubitably marks of true repentance.
Should I abandon him now, all would be lost! No, my
object was to attatch him to me by kind treatment, and
by every possible means cherish a work so happaly
begun
.
I therefore after giving the necessary directions
to the landlord, asked Horton to walk into our room
and see my sister, and accordingly he followed me to
the parlour.
Scarcely had I introduced him to the ladies, when a
tap was heard at the front door, it was opened by the
girl, and a female entered whom I recognized to be the
poor widow whom I had seen at Mrs. Cary's, on the
evening of my first arrival in Philadelphia.
She seemed somewhat disconcerted upon finding
strangers
in the house, and obeyed the hospitable
invitation
of Mrs. Cary, to approach with a slow timid step.
We arose from our seats until she was accomodated, but
before she reached her chair, Horton sprung to her, and
caught her in his arms, exclaiming my dear Susan
have I found you!
She shrieked Oh heavens! and appeared for some
time bereft of her senses.
Horton bore her to a chair, while he supported her in
his arms, almost every one in the room were
contributing
to her restoration.
The first words she uttered were, Never did I
expect
to see you more Horton, I received a letter that you
were dead.
My dear Susan that was more of my wickedness,
do you forgive me? say you forgive me, said he
sobing
lamentably. Where are my children Susan?
At home, said she weeping likewise.
Let us go to them Susan, rising from his chair, I
am not completely happy until I see my dear little
babies
.
In the mean time, every one in the house was deeply
affected, amongst whom, and not the least so was my
uncle. His heart was so tender that the smallest thing
touched his feelings.
The tears which had wet his cheek, being hastily
wiped, never seed the like on't if 'bee'nt as glad, thee'll
behave thyself now, I warrant 'would'nt left such a
woman
for all the wenches in christendom, how dost do
madam? (shaking hands with her as I introduced her)
thou'rt a thousand times too good for 'um.
You are right sir, she is indeed, ten thousand times
too good for me.
Great mind thee shant have her at all.
When Horton proposed to his wife to accompany him
to her dwelling, the old man made out to rise from his
chair, advanced up to them and said, Go Horton and
see thy children, and when's done hugin' and bussin', and
like o' that thee must bring 'um here, 'want to see 'um;
must all come, thee wife must come, 'is goin to be the
greatest merry makin' here to nightdos't hear bring
'um all.
Oh sir, said Susan we an't fit to come, excuse us
if you please sir, I am greatly obliged to you, but we
would only disgrace you.
Never stir if thee shan't come, and thee shall be
spliced over againthee's fit enough.
I told Horton that since it was my uncle's desire, I
would be glad if he would bring his family. While we
were speaking, Mrs. Horton and the ladies retired to
one of the chambers, it seemed that she had brought home
some work which she had been employed to do for them,
and which she had let fall on the floor at sight of her
husband.
Whether the object of this cabinet counsel was to
settle the affair of the work, or to make arrangements
for equipping Mrs. Horton to make her appearance on
the approaching evening, my sagacity did not enable me
to discover.
When the ladies returned to their seats, and Horton
and his wife had departed to their dwelling, I snatched
an opportunity of shewing Martha the letter I had
received
from Boston, and not wishing to disturb the
company
,
whom Jinkins was entertaining in his usual style,
I took the letters from my pocket without being observed,
and sitting down by her, addressed her in terms
preparatory
for the disclosure I was to make. When I
opened the letter which concerned Dupon, I threw my
arm over her chair, holding it before her.
My uncle exclaimed, I told thee how the wind lay
should'nt be surprised to see two weddins instead of one.
No objections child, if thee and the girl can agree see',
may have it all over at once, have it to night if thee's
mind to.
This blunt and unequivocal address, came very
seasonably
to Martha's relief, whose bosom began to beat
high at the sight of Dupon's name, and set us both to
laughing.
I was just making the proposition to her sir.
And what do'st say?
She says we had better postpone it to another time.
Oh nonsense! just have it over at once, and be done
we'it, and we'll crown it in a flowing bowl, quoth my
uncle. I'll try sir and remove her scruples. He
speaking
at the same time with myself apprized Martha that
sh' better take 'um while's in the humour, don't meet
such offers every day, giving a significant nod of the
head as he closed the sentence.
Jinkins being a man of discernment and feeling,
poured
in upon him a double portion of raillery.
Can't you let the young folks take their time?by
the wars I think you had better be courting yourself,
or seeing to get your pumps, you know you are to
dance the first reel to night.
D'ye hear to him!
We'll send 'um all to old Davy, you know what I
mean, Captain.
Ho JinkinsI thought 'twas to clear the deck for
action.
Well let the world say what they will Dick, none
o'um can't beat thee for lying, and for story tellin' when
they's mind to. If the woman-folks mind thee,
meaning
the ladies present) thee'll have better to mind.
I observed to Martha, that as soon as matters were
settled a little, I would go to Liverpool myself, that I
wished to see England, and begged of her to shake off
that melancholy look, and grace the evening with her
smiles, that I could not be happy while I beheld her a prey
to griefBe happy dear girl, you will know the worst
in six months, till then cease to afflict yourself.
Our attention was now attracted by my uncle and his
niece.
He told her not to be tellin' stories like Dick, there.
What's happened between you and Mary, uncle?
Why I told her she ought to be a puttin' on her
garments
,
d'ye see, and like o' that, and 'says there's no
weddin' to be here, and if there was she'd get married in
thae she's got on.
She has time enough to dress, this four hoursit's
just twelvesix o'clock is the hour: they certainly can
dress in an hourcan't you Martha? said I, for I
suspect you are to be brides-maid, are you not?
She smiled and answered in the affirmative. I
repeated
to her what Wilson told me after breakfast, about
his being ready this five years.
I suspect you have been ready to wait on Mary, or
she on you, since you have been acquainted.
Wilson now made his appearance. I asked him if
he had engaged any other liquors?
He replied, he had engaged Claret and Champaigne,
a couple dozen of each, and if that was not enough, we
ought never to drink any more.
I called him aside and enquired if he had formed any
acquaintance in the city, it would be well enough to
invite
a few, it would help to keep up his spirits, and some
ladies also, and let us have a little dance to pass off the
time. He was acquainted with no lady in the place,
except
the landlord's wife and daughters.
As good luck as any, said I, I will invite them,
and you can write a note of invitation to one or two
gentlemen
,
if you know any, and we will send it by the
landlord'
This being assented to, he desired the maid to furnish
him with pen, ink, and paper; and setting down by the
21
fire, he wrote the notes on his knee, and folding them up
handed them to me.
Once more I must leave the fire and good company.
My business was soon donethe landlord set off with
the invitations, directed to C G and M
Esqrs.
The ladies promised to attend, and leaving a verbal
invitation for the landlord, I returned. Wilson smiled,
telling me I had once more to face the cold,
whispering
in my ear, the license,and accompanied by
Jinkins, we took hats and set out.
As we walked to the Clerk's office, it was mutually
agreed upon that Jinkins should act as brides-man.
Thus having made the final arrangement, we
determined
to sit by the fire and enjoy ourselves until it was time
to dress.
Sambo came in to see his master, and replenished the
fire. I gave him a dram, and invented a story about him
and the old West India lady, for the amusement of the
company.
Humph, said Sambo, you always funnin': which
ob de young ladies goin' 'get married to-night? which,
massa kinfolks?so many(looking over them all)
lady'can't tell one from turra!
This was a solecism to the matter in hand, which was
to keep clear of the wedding by all means.
That is her, said Jinkins, pointing to Martha.
Well, I 'comin' to play da brideI larn him in
Lonnon
.
Well, Sambo, we'll let you know, said I. Having
got rid of Sambo we renewed the conversation, which
turned upon subjects most likely to promote good
humour
,
every countenance was animated, and pleasure
beamed in every eyenor did we forget to acquaint
Wilson with the happy meeting of Horton and his wife.
Thus we as one happy family passed away the time
until four o'clock! when something was said about
shaving
.
I have been shaved once or twice to-day, (meaning
the cold) said Jinkins, I think that's often enough.
A fire was ordered in the dining-room for us young
men to dress in, while my uncle was prohibited from
joining us, by the ladiesHe must not leave the warm
roomSambo must come in and perform his toilet,
when the ladies retired for the same purpose.
All matters being adjusted, while preparations were
going forward for our accommodation, I took out my
pocket book for the purpose of looking out a piece of
waste paper for my razor, when a bold knocking was
heard at the door. It was opened by the maid, and a
gentleman of genteel appearance entered the parlour.
He bowed, and was proceeding towards us, when a
violent
scream issued from all the ladies at once, while
they flew to meet him.
It was Dupon! Dupon, who rescued assaulted virtue!
the man who bore my expiring sister to a place of
safety
!
the man who had in the most delicate manner
contributed
to her pecuniary aid! Dupon, the orphan's shield,
the widow's friend!
Such was the man who now entered the roomhis
genteel manner, his dignified appearance, but above all,
his magnanimous soul captivated every power of my
mind. His conduct to my sister commanded at once my
gratitude, admiration and esteemnew feelings and new
duties seized upon my heart, as I fondly embraced him.
To pass over the particulars of this scene in silence
would be unpardonable: but to do it justice, will not be
expected from me. The total absence of ornament, and
still less of talent, throughout the narrative, is
conclusive
evidence that the task is far above my abilities. If
the candour of this declaration be questioned by some,
it will stand acquitted by others, particularly when they
come to learn, what they will very shortly, that this same
Dupon, was no other than the long-lost, long-lamented
son of my uncle! Leaving it therefore for the reader to
imagine what cannot be expressed, I take up the
narrative
.
When I saw him enter the room, I concluded he was
one of the young men whom Wilson had invited, and
that he had either mistaken the hour, or that something
had turned up, to prevent his attendance, and that he
was come to make his excuse. While all this was
passing
in my mind, I was stunned by a universal shout from
the women. We were sitting (as may be supposed from
our number,) as close to each other, as one chair could
be wedged by the side of another, the ladies springing to
their feet as they shrieked, just as though they were
going
to take a fit, attempted to make good their purpose
in vain, until Jinkins and Wilson arose to make room.
I intended to do the same, but Mary waited notshe put
her hand upon my shoulder, as I was in the act of rising
and sprung by me, pulling me down again, and dashed
my pocket-book with its contents in the middle of the
floor. Mrs. Cary came in contact with me next, after
treading on my uncle's gouty toc, which made the old
man roar, and bolting upright to his feet, he again
trampled
on the foot of poor Ling, and set him a yelling. In
the meantime the name of Dupon was repeated, I don't
know how often, which explained the whole matter. I
thought the ladies would have torn him to pieces, and I
believe he thought so too. Martha, however, (I think)
obtained the first kissMrs. Cary was transported out
of herselfMary (I was ashamed of her) acted like one
who had lost her reason, while the sedate Martha
acted
as she always didin her I saw very little difference,
in her actions I saw none, but her countenance was more
animated. After the tumult had a little subsided, Dupon
was presented to us by Mary, who introduced my uncle
first.
Ah, said the old man, who had continued standing
(and whose eye began to run over at the name of Dupon,)
Tip us thy hand, comradeglad to see thee, glad to
see theeno wonder the wenches made such a squalling.
I don't know how much more he would have said, but
he was interrupted by the approach of Wilson, whom
Mary introduced with much awkwardnessnext
Jinkins
,
and last of all myself. Her gratification on this
happy event, may easily be imagined.
After mutual expressions of joy and congratulation
were exchanged, Dupon was permitted to be seated. He
then briefly stated, that he hoped to have met with me
at New-Yorkthat he arrived at Boston about an hour
after Mr. S dispatched the answer to my letters,
and set out immediately, thinking to arrive at New-York
before I left there. When he came to New-York, we
had left it about an hour only; he therefore obtained my
address at the Hotel, and set out without delay,
expecting
to overtake us.
Why don't give him something to drink? thee
lubbers
don't think wants it comin' out o' the cold? said
my uncle.
This command was instantly obeyed by Sambo, who
had just appeared for the purpose of dressing his master.
Well tell thee what, comrade, thee's come in good
time, main glad on't, d'ye see, the girl (speaking low)
that thee defended so gallantly is goin' to be spliced
to-night
,
and oh, I warrant she's glad on it too, but sort o'
bashful, d'ye mind. Well, well, (resuming his common
tone) never thought to see thee lad. Charles was
readin'
o' telling and like o' that: but any how, thee's just
the lad after my own heartYes, that was my own
brother's daughter. Poor Charles! he's dead and gone,
but she'll never want a father.
Dupon interrupted by saying
If I am not greatly mistaken, sir, I have a much
higher claim upon your affection, than that of which you
speak. Your name is Burlington you say, sir?
YesThomas Burlington is my name.
Had you not a son that with his mother narrowly
escaped from St. Domingo?
Yes.
Dupon while this short address passed, took out his
pocket-book, opened it, and drew from thence a
miniature
of my uncle, a pearl necklace, a set of diamond
earrings
and sundry other trinkets.
Yes, said he, in great perturbation, looking now at
the picture, and now at his fatherit must be,
handing
them to the old manYou know these?
MyEliza's!where is she?
Dear fatherI am all that remains of your Eliza!
embracing him. It was some time before he could add,
She is no more!
Neither of them spoke for several minutes. I was
alarmedI flew to my unclehe had fainted! we tore
21*
them asunderall was confusion! the ladies shrieking,
Sambo ran to and fro in distraction. I was forced to
get angry before I could get a smelling-bottle, or other
restorative. Jinkins always cool and collected, soon
produced hartshorn, and assisted in chafing the old
man's hands and templesDupon (or Burlington as he
is henceforth to be called,) broke from Wilson and hung
over his father, whilst the tears ran down his manly
cheeks. I intreated him to retire and compose himself:
that his father's nerves were weak, and his feelings so
easily excited, it would be dangerous to permit him to
indulge them just now.
When the old man recovered, the first word he
uttered
was, Where did my Eliza?
Oh uncle, say no more about it to night, you have
found your son whom you never expected to see, and
that's enough. You act childishhow do I, that lost
father
,
mother, and every thing else?how does hundreds,
thousands others, that lose wives, and husbands? Come
let us all be merry to-nightI'm sure you ought to be
so upon the recovery of your son, and such a son.
Leave him to me, said Jinkins: if I hear any
more snivelling and piping, I'll out with the Algerine.
This set my uncle to laughing, and the party resumed
their cheerfulness.
In the meantime Thomas Burlington had seated
himself
by Martha. Sitting down by my uncle, I in a low
voice, let him into the secret of his son's attachment to
her, telling him he might see how the land lay now, with
a view to divert his mind from recurring to the old
subject
.
I informed him that his son had been long
engaged
to Martha, and if he had no objection and they were
willing, it would be well enough to let them get married
to-night, and let one frolic suffice for both.
Ah! said the old man aloud, sets the wind that
way? od zucks, and so we willshall be all spliced
together
to-night. What do'st say to that, my son? do'st
hear? I understand as that's thy sweet-heart, shall
marry
her to-night.
Getting up from his seat and going to where they
sittingWhat do'st say? do's say she'll have thee?
do's say she'll be spliced to-night?
She has not said yet, sir.
O, silence gives consentshe's willing enough, 'can
see by the lee o' her eyeshiver my limbs, if 'knows
how to woo; lay thy arms round her neck and give her
a
bass
, an't had one so long too, laying his son's
willing
arm round Martha's neckthat's the way, now
squeeze her up close.
For Martha's sake I proposed that we should all go
and dress, otherwise the parson would be here before
we were ready.
Addressing my new cousin, I invited him to
accompany
us, and participate in the requisite preparation,
particularly as he was one of the brides-grooms; he
smiled
and arose rather reluctantly I thought, and took the
precedence in walking to the dining-room, where, as
already
mentioned it was agreed we should dress. I
dropped
behind a moment to request Mary to let Martha
know I was seriously disposed to urge the union of her
and my cousin that evening, and should name it to young
Burlington, whom I had no doubt would readily
acquiesce
that
I had already obtained my uncle's consent,
and finally I should expect Martha to comply, and
without
waiting for Mary's answer, I proceeded to join my
friends.
Whilst we were employed in dressing, &c. I ordered
a cold check for Thomas, as dinner was out of the
question
;
and begged of him to avoid by every means, any
further conversation with his father on the subject of his
mother's fate, until the old gentleman should gain
sufficient
strength of mind to hear it, and recommended the
propriety of imparting the subject to him by degrees.
He thanked me in the warmest terms, and began to
express his obligations.
Say nothing about obligations, dear Thomas, said
I, it more properly belongs to me to make
acknowledgments
of that nature; but we must waive every thing
of the sort for the present, and as time presses, you will
excuse me dear Tom, for the liberty I have taken; if I
have acted right, you will place it to the credit of the
debt I owe you, if I have done wrong, have the goodness
to forgive me.
No ceremony, said helet me know what you
wish.
There are none here but our friends. Jinkins I
may say is your brother, and Wilson is soon to be mine;
briefly, I have learned that you and a certain young lady
whom I need not name, have been long attached to each
other; your father knows it and approves of the match:
in short, he wishes you to consummate the nuptials this
evening.
Heavens! are you serious?
I am.
My generous friend! my noble father! was all the
reply he was able to make.
If you therefore consent, you have no more to do
but get ready as quick as possible, your father being
anxious it should take place, when Mary and Wilson
have the knot tied, you will have but three-quarters of an
hour to prepare; six o'clock is the hour, so you had
better
change your clothes and walk with me to obtain
your license. Wilson had got his as you arrived,
and in the meantime, if you resolve to do so, you had
perhaps (though you will act as you please) better
consult
Martha.
Jinkins observed laughing, it would be a good joke
enough to carry the thing so far, and the bride not be
willing.
Burlington smiled at the remark, which seemed (at
least I took it so) to indicate little doubt.
When we were dressed, Burlington and I took our
hats and proceeded.
On gaining the parlour we found not a single lady:
they had retired to dress. I told my cousin I could
settle
it for him, and going to their chamber door, told them
I wished to speak with Mary.
She replied I am dressing.
Can't you come to the door? said I, I want to
have a peep at that trimming.
The plague take you, for you torment me to the last
moment, said Mary. She drew near the door, which
she opened with great caution to the distance of an inch,
and asked what I wanted.
I replied, loud enough for Martha to hear, that I
wished to know, or at least my cousin did, whether
Martha
would consent to consummate their marriage that
evening; and was now waiting for an answer, that he
might get ready.
Yes brother, tell him she is willingShe pretends
she is not willing to be married so soon, but it is all
pretence
with her, I knowshe would not miss it for the
world.
Shame on you Mary, said Martha.
Shame on you to be so silly, when you have been
dying for him these two years:So tell him to get
ready
,
I'll be security for Martha.
In the meantime Thomas had taken the opportunity
of obtaining his father's consent, as he had stated to me
on our way to get the license.
During our walk, I intimated that I promised myself
infinite pleasure in his society, and much gratification
in learning the particulars of his ilfe, which seemed to
involve a great deal of mystery, particularly that of his
name; but the present opportunity was quite too short,
besides, my spirits as well as your own, are not
sufficiently
composed.
He briefly observed that his mother died in a few days
after the massacre of St. Domingo of the fright, that she
never recovered her senses sufficiently to tell her name,
or to converse rationally upon any subjectthe second
day after the ship left St. Domingo a Mr. Dupon, (who
had likewise escaped from the Island, after having his
wife and children massacred before his eyes by the
negroes
)
went down, perhaps, for the purpose of seeing
who my mother was, and found her in a swoon, lying on
the floor, while I (then about a year old) was sitting by
her crying.
He, thinking she was entirely dead, picked me up to
convey me out of the way until she was shrouded, but
sending one for that purpose, she had come to: but
cotinued to rave until the next day, when she died; that
Dupon had reared him, gave him his own name, and
treated him with all the tenderness of a son, that he was
now dead; but during his illness, which preceded his
death, he disclosed to him for the first time, that he was
not his father, and gave him the jewels that I had seen,
which was the clue to the discovery of my real father,
but which would not of themselves, perhaps, ever have
led to the discovery, had it not been for other
co-incidents
.
We now arrived at Mrs. Cary's, where we found
Horton and his two oldest little girls; one of them (our
old acquaintance) was sitting on Wilson's knee, dressed
in style. The other one was sitting on the knee of her
father. Upon enquiry I found Mrs. Horton was in the
chamber with the ladies. It was now within half an hour
of the trying time: taking out my watch, I showed it to
Wilson and my cousin, telling them their time was short,
and asked them if their hearts did not go pitty patty?
No, was the answer.
Faith! I would not like to be so near mooring for
life, said Jinkins.
Wishing to fill up the time with some amusement, I
asked Jinkins to favour us with the Down Hill of
Life. He had got through but one verse when our
guests arrived, and soon after them, the Parson.
At length the long-looked for and much-desired six
o'clock came. It had been intended. I suspect, that
Martha should attend my sister, as Walter Scott would
say, on this memorable occasion; but what is to be
done now? Martha is a bride herself, forsooth! then
Betsey Watson or the landlord's daughter must officiate.
I did not care how they managed it.
Making a sign to Jinkins we hunted up the brides.
I led Martha and Jinkins led up my sister. They were
soon united by the Parson, he being very agreeably
suprised
at receiving two fees instead of one. It is a question
with me whether he ever made as much in so short a
time.And so endeth the twenty-second Chapter.
CHAPTER XXIII.
Here
again I expect to be blamed for omiting the
timid step, the down-cast look, the scarlet blush, the
snowy dress, &c. &c., how Mrs. Cary was dressed and
what Miss Watson had on; and how they behaved and
how they looked; also the superb supper, the merry
dance, the comic tale, the cheerful song, and a great
many
&c's.
But these particulars I have thought proper to leave
to the imagination. It would require very little thought
or reflection to swell them into a mighty long story; but
for this I have not timesuffice it to say, that every
thing was conducted with great decorum, and to the
infinite
satisfaction of all parties; at least I have never
heard any thing to the contrary.
Jinkins and I, having slept together, were up before
any of the family. By the family I mean all
appertaining
to our own party. It was the first opportunity I had
had to enquire how he liked his sweet heart?
He didn't knowhe was not in such a haste about
things, he was not so eager to leap under the hatches.
I told him I thought he was perfectly in the right to
take his time in a matter of that importance, that it was
nothing more than a jest of mineThough Miss Watson
was really a fine girl, well informed, chaste, industrious,
and possessed of much generosity and good nature; she
had been reared by Mrs. Cary, from a child; and such
was her gratitude to her that she had never forsaken
her when she became reduced to indigence and every
species of distress.
With such conversation as this, I essayed to make an
impression on the open hearted Jinkinsleaving the
matter
to rest there for the present, I asked him what he
thought of a match between my uncle and Mrs. Cary?
He laughed heartily at this, saying, I was
all-determined
to go on with the match-making businesswhy
don't you hunt a match for yourself?
I replied, I had been crossed in love, and therefore
intended to live a bachelor the remainder of my days.
My cousin making his appearance, the conversation
between
me and Jinkins concerning match-making, was
dropped.
I was pleased to have an opportunity of settling the
mode of communicating his adventures to his father, and
told him, it would never do to relate that part of it
which related to his wife's catastrophe, in its fullest
extent
it
would serve no purpose except that of exciting
his feelings.
Upon submitting the matter to Jinkins, who was a
much better judge than I, he declared decidedly against
it; it would go near to taking his life.
Thomas said he had intended to soften the thing as
much as possible. Finally it was concluded between
us three that the subject of his adventures should form
that day's amusement. He was to commence after
breakfast
,
and no other subject was to interfere until he was
through.
This point being settled, some desultory conversation
filled up the time until breakfast, in which, however, I
was much pleased to find that my new relation possessed
much general knowledge. His conversation, so far as
I was able to judge, proved him to be a man of business
and reflectioneasy in his address, and seemed rather
to lack culture than genius; he possessed enough,
however
,
for the common concerns of life.
In his stature, complexion, and features, he resembled
his father. He wanted little, if any, of being six feet in
height, stout, and well made, his hair a shining brown,
his eyes deep blue, and very expressive, complexion fair,
his face round and full, his cheeks blushing like the rose
he was in mourning.
When the party assembled for breakfast I gave them
to understand the pleasure that awaited them, and in the
meantime directed a good fire to be furnished in the
parlour
.
When breakfast was over we adjourned thither, it being
the best adapted to the size of the company. Here was
sometime lost before we could be regulated according to
our mutual wishes. Mrs. Burlington, as we are
henceforth
to call Martha, and Mrs. Wilson, expressed as
much as though they would rather sit by my uncle, than
elsewhere.
I gave up to them, and after they were disposed of,
the rest were soon seated. I contrived however to get
Jinkins and Miss Watson together, and it had so much
the appearance of accident that nobody in the world
would have suspected it was design.
Mrs. Cary sat in the corner, as we term it; I took my
seat next to her, and pointed the next seat out to
Thomas
,
Wilson sat next to him, and Jinkins on the next to
Wilson's left, and next to Mary, between whom and
Martha sat the Commodore.
Whatever of confidence, whatever of approbation,
and those concomitants which give to life its true relish,
might be said to reign in complete fruition throughout
this happy assembly. Myself, perhaps, could form the
only exception, but had I not given in to the general joy,
I had deserved to be miserable forever. After a few
minutes
hesitation my cousin began as follows:
You will not expect me, on this occasion, to relate
those incidents which make so great a part of every one's
childhood and youth: and it may be as well to remark,
in the first place, that until within the last two years, my
life has been wholly exempt from the marvelous.
The first thing I recollect, was, that I loved no one
but my papa. (as I always called Mr. Dupon,) Betty,
(the house-keeper,) and a lap-dog, called Pug, and that
my papa bought me a little green hat, with which I was
infinitely pleased.
I remember likewise of making my escape very
often
from Betty and running after Mr. Dupon into the
street, when he went out. He would often pick me up
in his arms and take me with him, buying every thing
for me that he thought would please me.
At length I became old enough to go to school; here
was a bitter task indeed! I rarely submitted without a
crynothing could hire me, no reward could reconcile
me to this drudgery.
22
I made but little progress in learning, until I became
old enough to see the necessity of improvement. Mr.
Dupon however spared no pains to impress me with the
need of instruction, all his leisure hours were devoted to
this all important end.
As I was designed for the mercantile business, my
education
was limited to the English language and a
perfect
knowledge of book keeping; I did however make
some progress in the mathematics.
As my education advanced, Mr. Dupon laboured to
instil into my mind the principles of virtue, honour and
justice.
When I was fifteen years of age, he sent me
supercargo
to Kingston, Jamaica, merely to make me acquainted
with business. When I returned home he expressed
much satisfaction at my conduct.
His approbation was the most pleasing recompence he
could have bestowed upon this first essay of my boy hood,
no words could express the pleasure I felt on the
occasion
.
He sent me again, and again, my conduct still met
his warmest approbation.
He then ventured to trust me with an extensive and
valuable cargo, consigned to Boston, in which city he
was concerned with one of the most respectable houses
in the place. In this undertaking I was equally
fortunate
.
I had now become pretty well acquainted with trade,
and relieved Mr. Dupon considerably from that toil and
application to business to which he had necessarily been
subject, and under the pressure of which his health
evidently began to sink.
In my second voyage to Boston, it was that I had
the pleasure to render those services to her whom I
now have the happiness to call my relation.
This act of mine will be ever dear to me, (here he
was much agitated easting a look at Martha) he
resumed
as it is associated with a circumstance, the first
and last object of my existence.
The happy hours I spent at Mrs. Cary's, I pass
over, it will be enough to remark that I protracted
the time of my departure for England, far beyond the
dictates of prudence.
At length I received a letter from my father,
requesting
me to repair forthwith to Jamaica, dispose of my
cargo, re-load as quick as possible and return home, that
he was in bad health and needed my presence. This
occasioned
my sudden departure from Boston.
Mrs. Cary I fondly hope will forgive me, who was
but a stranger, for my presumption at my departure; in
the action to which I allude, I was influenced by the
purest motives, and the interest I took in her happiness.
I thought it would enable her to gratify that benevolent
diposition I had witnessed in her, particularly to Miss
Burlington. I now have come to an interesting part of
my story.
After my acquaintance with Mrs. Cary's family, I
continued to visit her regularly, which at length
subjected
me to the impertinent raillery of my
acquaintances
.
At first I paid no attention to what I
considered
beneath the notice of a gentleman, but it very soon
assumed a character of another and more exceptionable
nature. I heard insinuations false as they were painful
to me. I was in a strange place, amongst people of whose
principles and character I had little knowledge, and to
tell the naked truth, this injurious report prevailed
principally
amongst the females, which put it out of my
power
to combat it, or I certainly would.
I curst them in the bitterness of my heart, and on
all occasions defended the reputation of Mrs. Cary's
family. I was not, however, aware of the extent and
malignity of the report, at the time of my leaving
Boston
.
I, for some time previous to my departure, was less
frequent in my visits, which proceeded from a desire to
afford slander less grounds for suspicion; and it is with
much sorrow I learn (through Martha) the deep distress
into which they were plunged on my account, after my
departurebut you will excuse(his emotion again
disconcerting
him.)
Upon my arrival in Liverpool, I found Mr. Dupon
partially recovered from a dangerous fit of illness; he
was overjoyed to see me, and mildly reporved me for
staying so long, adding that had he died of his late
illness
great loss would have been sustainedhe meant the
concern.
I was truly afflicted at this distressing intelligence,
and have never forgiven myself for the risk I had
incurred
of losing the best of fathers, as he certainly had
always
been to me. The disorder in which I found the
firm, my father's ill health, and the unprotected
situation
of my acquaintances in America, combined to
render
me very unhappy.
After a long consultation, in private with Dupon,
respecting the means most proper to redeem the concern
from difficulty, I left him and set about this arduous task.
After putting the business in the best train which it
admitted
,
I hastened to my father, whose complaint seemed
to assume a more favourable appearance. Yet though
there was much to hope, there was much fear, and he
intimated something about making his will.
I expressed myself to him in terms of opposition to
this intimation, from no other motive than that I thought
it would tend to depress his spirits, adding that of course
I could be no loser, his only child; and finally I treated
the subject with perfect indifference.
Ah, said he, Ferdinand, you know not what
situation
you might fall into, were I to die intestate.
Dear father, said I, you speak mysteriously
what can you mean?
My child, said he, prepare yourself for
something
that will astonish and distress you.
You lost your mother in your infancyI supplied
her place to the utmost of my powerI nursed you on
my kneeI cherished you in my bosombut you are not
my son!
Had the earth opened to swallow me, had the final
dissolution of nature arrived, it would not have filled me
with more amazement. I was speechless some timea
variety of feelings rushed upon me: my mind was a
complete chaos.
Not your son? thought I, whose son am I, then?
who was my mother? who is this man who has reared
me so tenderly? what motive, what am I to him? I felt
partly annihilated.
Mr. Dupon was so much affected that it was with
much difficulty he proceeded. I thought it best to
inform
you of this, indeed I always intended to do so, and
perhaps it is as well now as any time.
Oh, sir! haste to tell me who I am!
That I know not, dear Ferdinandyour mother
escaped
from St. Domingo in the same ship with myself,
but she was never in her senses sufficiently to tell who
she was. The second day after we left the Island I went
down to see how she was doing; she was very ill. I
took the child from her, (which was yourself,) and she
died the next day: she had no domestics with her, nor any
one who could give any intelligence whatever. She was
without trunks, papers, or any thing which could lead to
a discovery.
I preserved her jewels, and a miniature, which was
round her neck, and which I presume must be your
father's
.
The richness of the jewels, and her attire,
bespeaks
you of no ignoble birth, but from them I could
make no discovery of your name, as nothing but the
initials
of your father and mother's name appeared on
them, and I called you by my own name.
Having lost a wife and two lovely children, in St.
Domingo, I felt for your distressed situation, and
concluded
that your father had fallen in the awful massacre
in which my wife and children had been cut off; and I
am still of that opinion. But if this should not have
been the case, the survivors were scattered over different
parts of the world, and the difficulties of obtaining
information
were so many, that I never exerted myself to get
information on the subject.
But if your father should be alive, the miniature and
jewels will serve as a clue, for I have little doubt but the
miniature is his, from your resemblance to it.
I asked him if he ever heard any enquiries
respecting
me.
He replied that he saw numerous advertisements, and
many of the signatures corresponded with the initials on
the miniature, which rather served to embarrass the
discovery
.
22*
And to tell you the truth, dear Ferdinand, and
it is a truth you can well vouch for, I was too much
attached
to you
Here my cousin became too much affected to proceed.
I proposed to drop the subject until after dinnerwhen
he resumed
I have little more to addthe scene that succeeded is
beyond description, I felt as though I had lost a father,
and he as though he had lost a son. I fell on his neck
he embraced me tenderly and proceeded
My motive for passing you as my own child may be
attributed to a desire of screeing you from the ill nature
of my brother's wife, who would have stopped at nothing
to effect your destruction, had she known the truth. It
therefore passed that you alone escaped the massacre in
which my wife and children were cut off. She being now
dead you have nothing to apprehend. I mean to divide
my estate equally between you and my niece, and as she
is young I wish you to act as her guardian.
The will was drawn agreeably to his desire, and in
the way I just mentioned. Finally he never recovered,
although he lived eleven months after this circumstance,
and as soon as I could finally arrange my business, I set
sail for the United States.
Being one day in a public room, previous to my
departure
,
I was engaged in looking over an old file of news
papers, endeavouring to obtain some information from
them on the subject of my family. While thus
employed
,
I overheard an old Tar observe, he is the very
image
of him, poor soul!As I was saying, he never held
up his head afterwardsabout the same size too: ah,
that was a dreadful piece of work!
Upon turning round I discovered that he and the
person he was addressing were both looking at me.
Was it I, that you had an allusion to just now sir?
I was just telling my comrade here, that you had put
me in mind of my old commodore when he was a young
man.
What was his name, sir?
His name was Thomas Burlington, and a braver
man never stepped between stem and stern.
Where did you know him, sir?
I knowed him every where; we have been over the
whole world together. I was just telling my comrade
that the poor soul lost his wife by the dn savage
negroes
in St. Domingo. May I ask your name?
I told him I did not know my real name, being
found by a gentleman when young, and have never since
discovered who I was. Without troubling you with his
tedious narrative, it is sufficient to say, that his relation
agreed with my own story so near, that I determined to
proceed to Havanna, where he informed me he had left
Commodore Burlington. When I arrived there I
learned
that he had just sailed for New-York. The rest you
are acquainted with.
My uncle wiping his eyes, saidthee hast seen
some squalls, my son, as well as thy father, but 'trust
thee is laid up now But after all, that was a noble
fellow
,
that Dupon, I can't blame thee to bewail his loss.
But seeing that his son was much affected, let's have
something to drink and go to dinner.
After dinner we all assembled again in the parlour,
and to gratify Sambo, he was allowed to relate to his
young master his share in his preservation. He exulted
very much in his usual way. The evening was spent
in the most agreeable manner, the conversation being
enlivened with with wit and sprightliness, until after
supper.
CHAPTER XXIV.
We
had scarcely seated ourselves around the fire,
when a stranger of tolerable appearance entered the
room. After bowing to the company, he advanced to
Mrs. Cary and thus addressed her:
Long life to you, Mrs. Cary, how do you do? Well,
I suppose I'm too late for the weddingwell, I declare
to you, that I tried to be here, but them divilish Fowlers
and one cd thing or another happened, that I couldn't
be here any sooner. But it's no odds, as I suppose the
girl is married, anyhow.
They are both married, Mr. Sullivan.
The dl they are!
Mary and Martha now presented themselves; he
wished them joy, and shook hands with them. But
Mary not being content with his salutation, held her
face near to his.
Why, an't you going to kiss me, Mr. Sullivan?
No, shame the one of you will I kiss.
Nor me neither? said Martha.
No, nor you
nather
.
Now I'm mortified, said Mary.
Divil a hair I care. Who do you think wants to
kiss you after them fellows been slavering your mouth?
I'd know who the mischief they are. Get me something
to eat, and something to drink too, for I'm both tired,
hungry and dry. Just bring it in here, and set it on
this little table, for I want to be after talking with Mrs.
Cary, d'ye hearnow don't be calling any body and
making a rout about it, just bring a bit of something
yourselfI'm right hungry, I never broke my fast since
morning, for as soon as I got home, I came right on.
The two ladies withdrew and after a few minutes
absence
returned, with cake, cold ham and a fowl; to this
was added wine, and all placed on a small table near the
fire, between him and Mrs. Cary. After things were
settled to his mind, he sat down with his side to the table
and his face towards the fire. Drawing out a red silk
handkerchief and spreading it on his knee, he told them
to go about their businessthey insisted upon waiting
upon him, but he bid them go along to your husbands,
and let them kiss you in my stead. Go sit down, I
want to talk with Mrs. Cary; stop, let me see what we
have here, taking up the decanter, pretty good,
(tasting it) this will do, you may go sit down, said
he, addressing Mrs. Cary, while he regaled himself as
follows:
I have been upon thorns to see you ever since I got
out of that cursed place.
I do'n know
what I could be
about when you called at the prison, sure you must a gone
like the wind; I was astonished when they told me.
I waited for you, said Mrs. Cary, some time, as
I knew it would gratify you; indeed, I would have
waited
longer, but was afraid the gentlemen would return.
Well, it's no odds, all well enough; I suppose there
wasn't much time lost, before I heard the news. That
cursed crature (Lord forgive me) comes to the prison
with one of her smiles upon her countenance
Well, what do you think, Mr. Sullivan?
What about? says I.
Don't you think two great gentlemen have been and
took Mrs. Cary and the girls off to the Mansion House
in three fine carriages, he, he, he. What do you think
of that? he, he, he. They helped them into the
carriage
just as if they'd been the greatest ladies in the
land, he, he, he.
Curse her giggle! Mrs. Cary, I was going to
observe
that I love a modest female as I do my life, 'don't
care who they are, nor where they come from. By all
that's sacred, I'd lay down my life for any female, rather
than see her in distress or imposed upon. I'm sure you
know that, but
to to
see such a brute as that, she is a
disgrace
to her sexand there she'd smile, and Mr.
Sullivan
,
and Mr. Sullivan and he, he, he. I hope the Lord
will forgive me, for God knows I never hated any body
so cordially Why, why didn't, said he, stuttering as
he grew warm in the cause, the dn crature show all
this kindness to you who stood in need of it? No, but
she could give a laugh and turn up the whites of her eyes
on me. Did you take notice when company would come
into her room, what a difference? I always could tell a
male from a female visitor, from the giggle; the dl a
bit would she laugh when a woman would come in. I'd
hear them talk jest, but whenever a gentleman would
come in, he, he, heblast her smiles I wanted none of
them: it makes me so mad, well, d'ye mind the time she
made her husband lock you up and abuse you, Lord if I
didn't want to kill her, then there's no smoke, and
wanted
to freeze you to death, and wouldn't let the girls bring
you any thing good to eat. Oh heavens! and this is a
free country! And her husband, poor pitiful soul, but
it's well enoughshe'll give him the child to mind and
away she'll go over townrace here and race there;
well, it don't signify, I won't say what I was going to
saycan you ever forgive her?
Oh, yes, Mr. Sullivan, don't think of her, don't vex
yourselfshe is unworthy your resentment.
My dear madam I know she is.Well, I believe I
will take your advice.Where are you Mary?
Here I am.
Where is Martha? I want to know what sort o'
looking
folks these are ye have got: I suppose it's some o'
these gentlemen sitting here?
Yes siryou would not suffer me to make you
acquainted
.
Well, go along now and bring them forward.
We all advanced up to him, and were severally
introduced
:
my uncle shook him cordially by the hand, thou
art a hearty soulglad to be acquainted with thee.
I was struck with the appearance of this
extraordinary
man from the moment he entered the house. His
easy
manners, and that perfect unconcern with which his
conduct was marked in the presence of so numerous a
party of strangers, bespoke a man of great independence
of mind. Perfectly at his ease and unembarrassed, he
received the salutations of the company.
His countenance was strongly marked with vivacity,
good nature, and benevolence. He was of middling
stature
,
inclining to robusthandsome, though in the
decline
of life. He was clad in a short coat, commonly
called a sailors jacket, with ferret strings. This was
carelessly thrown open, and partially displayed a fine,
and very neat ruffle shirt.
From the time he entered until we were called on to
receive
his address not a word was uttered, the
profoundest
silence reigned throughout, the ladies excepted. I
was afraid to breathe or stir, lest I might lose a single
word. Our admiration increased as the conversation
advanced
,
between him and Mrs. Cary; but it was
effectually
secured when we found him the warm friend of our
idol.
The more he gained upon us the more we felt our own
inferiority. After our introduction we retired to our
seats without offering to interrupt the conversation.
Mary, said this Irishman, get us something
stronger, this wine is too colddon't be a hesitating,
many a time I've waited upon you. I intend you shall
wait upon me now.
Mary lost no time in producing some brandy. As
she sat the decanter on the table and was removing the
remains of the repast, he looked her in the face with the
best natured smile, and asked, you havn't forgot when
old Patrick (meaning himself) used to bring you wood,
and make you a fire after working hard all day.
Many's
the time Molly would send the children to-bed with
a piece, and slip the milk for their suppers into my hand
and say here Patrick, take this over to widow Cary's,
the girls want it worse than we doay, do you mind
that, Mary?
I do sir, and trust that I ever shall remember it.
That's a good girl; you know I do not care a
curse about a bit of a supper, and all these things, but
it does me good to see a little gratitude left in the world yet
it's not the value of a benefit I care about, but the way
it is conferred.
Ah, and Mrs. Cary too, sold her finery to redeem
me out of prison. Well, it'll be all one a thousand years
hence. But, I'm mad at you that you didn't tell Mister
, what's his name, Mary's brother, what you
were saving your money for? why
but
you told him you
wanted a little sum for a friend, he'd a given it to you,
I'll warrant, and a keep'd your duds of clothes.
Mrs. Cary blushed exceedingly at this artless and
unexpected
disclosure, and chiding him mildly for telling
tales about her, said, Now I shall get a scolding from
Mr. Burlington.
Oh, blame the odds, what he says. Martha bring
me something to put under my head. I'll just lay down
here on the carpet, (throwing himself down) I'm afraid
you will be jealous of Mary if I don't make you wait on
me too. There, I just want to dry my feet by the fire,
I'm tired too.
I've walked to daylet me see,ten, eight and two
is ten, twenty miles this good day; and do you think
Fowler hadn't the impudence to deny the payment till I
showed him his own recaipte, (Martha placed a pillow
under his head) ah, that's my darling; Miss say little and
think the more after all Mary's ding-dong about her
sweet heart, I think you got the handsomest man at last.
How did it happen, Martha? I never heard a breath of
it till to night, you must be a snake in the grass.
Oh, sir, you know still water is deep?
Faith! I believe so. Well, now talk away as fast as
you please, I'm not agoing to sleep, I can hear all your
say-so's. Where is them baby clothes, Mary, that you
are agoing to send to Molly? ye needn't be sniggering
and laughing, I'm sure Molly tould me you were agoing
to send her somethingI hate to see this mock-modesty,
Mary, in a girl of sense too.
I told Mary she ought to be as good as her word to
Mrs. Sullivan. She whispered to him something that
could not be heard, when he proclaimed aloud
Your very bad all at onceyou'll have good luck if
you ain't making some yourself 'fore long.
My uncle could maintain silence no longer, he roared
out, he was the gallantest fellow he had seen since he
cast anchor.
I don't know what you're all laughing about.
Where do'st live? we'll go and see thee to-morrow,
Mary and Martha tooshe shall bring thy wife what
she promised, herself; and if it's a boy call it Thomas,
never stir if 'wouldn't rather go and see thee than the
King of Englandhe ain't half so clever.
Faith! and you may well say that, without anny of
it's being the truth at all at all.
But you havn't tould me, Martha, where you picked
up this blue-eyed boy. I suppose now you'll hardly
spake to a poor fellow like me.
God forbid, Mr. Sullivan, that I should ever forget
your kindness.
Och, now, none o' your palaver, just let us all thank
God for his mercies, and laugh and sing, and be merry
such a day as this don't come every day.
Mr. Sullivan, said Martha, you will not let any
body talk but yourself. I was going to tell you that I
had become acquainted with Mr. Burlington sometime
before I left Boston, that he was then known by another
name, and has proved to be a cousin of Mary's, and the
son of this gentleman, pointing to my uncle, who thought
he was lost at sea when a child. Nor did he know any
better until yesterday.
Then there was double joy as well as a double
wedding
Well
if that's the case I'll get up; it won't do to
be lying down here like a baist.
He got up and told Mary to fill up the glasses, he'd
have to pledge the strangers in a glass or two. Mary
filled the glasses, and we all advanced to the table, and
drank to the health of this noble Irishman.
And where will we find a match for you sir? said
he, addressing himself to me, if seem that you have a
helpmate to find, and this young man, pointing to
Jinkins
.
I told him I would trust to Providence, and as for
Mr. Jinkins, I thought he was very suitably
accommodated
,
if he could bring over Miss Watson.
Looking first at my uncle and then at Mrs. Cary, he
said, He was going to say something, but he believed
he would let it alone.
Oh, tell what thee's a mind to, I love to hear thee
talk o' all things, said my uncle.
28
Well then, I was just going to say that your honour,
and Mrs. Cary here, had better make a bargain for
better
for worse.
I told him I was just thinking of that myself. The
old man laughed and said
The lady would have a bad bargain o' it, to take
such a crazy old vessel as I be in tow; but if so be she
had a mind to come to, he had no objection to lowering
sail.
The young folks laughed immoderately, when Wilson,
wishing to change the subject, asked Jinkins to give us
Life let us Cherish, observing that I must get my
flute, for he longed to hear Jinkins sing.
Neither the ladies or my new cousin had heard him
yet. Jinkins acquitted himself with his usual taste and
sung several other songs, in which we joined.
Ferdinand
sung, Wife, Children, and Friends, with great
applause
.
It was now the Irishman's turn to sing, and when
requested
,
he began without further solicitation, Barney
let the Girls alone, which set the house in a roar. Being
solicited for another song, he gave us, Langolee,
putting
on all the brogue he could bring to bear, as my
uncle
has it.
By this time it grew late and Sullivan arose to depart,
when my uncle said
Shan't till thee take thy allowanceShiver my
limbs if thee bain't the heartiest tar amongst us.
Thou need'st not think of
tarrying
till we have had some
more
vocal singing
.
I love thee because thou was kind to thae women
folks.
He however begged off, and drank with the old man,
who, holding him by the hand, bid himTell his
wife we'd all be to see 'um to-morrow, putting his left
hand into his pocket in the meantimethe rest may be
guessed.
Wilson and I waited upon him to the street door, and
upon taking leave of him each of us put a bank note into
his hand, and begged he would oblige us so far as to
present
it to his wife, and tell her that we would call on her
in the morning if nothing happened.
The plague a hair I care for money, but it will plaise
Molly, and so I'll kape it.
We pressed his hand and he departed.
The company being disposed to retire, we separated
for the night.
CHAPTER XXV.
Next
morning I drew Mary aside and requested an
explanation of the conversation over night.
What did Sullivan mean by Mrs. Cary's selling her
clothes to take him out of prison?
As I understood it, Mary seemed averse to the expla
nation, but seeing I was serious she gave me the
following
brief, but appalling, elucidation. She said that
Sullivan was put in prison on Mrs. Cary's account, that
he had become her security for two hundred dollars,
which she owed for rent, that he had been a great friend
to them since they came to Philadelphia, and had it not
been for him they must have perished, or resorted to the
poor-house, that they had all been sick, and this man
happened to find them in that situation, and brought a
Doctor to attend them at his own expence.
Don't don't tell me any more Mary if you do not
wish to drive me mad, I cannot hear it. But why did
not you, if Mrs. Cary felt a delicacy in asking Wilson,
why did not you ask him for the money, and not suffer
Mrs. Cary to part with her clothes?
They all felt a delicacy.
Nonsense! mock delicacy that was truly. Why did
you not tell me before I left you?
You left us so soon brothernor have you heard the
worst; Martha, Betsey, and myself, parted with great
part of the things you bought, or what is the same thing,
and had it not been for the money you sent us from New
York, Sullivan would not have been out of prison yet.
Shocking! and what became of his family whilst he
was in prison?
They did ill enough until you came, and then Mrs.
Cary sent them victuals every day.
I was wrong, I ought to have left money with her, I
see I am a noviceand where had this man been
yesterday
?
He went to pay the balance of the rent to a man who
lives in the country, one Fowler.
And why did you let him walk? said I, losing all
patience. You are ungrateful Mary, and unworth
I was going to say, unworthy of my regard, when she
replied
That she and her friends did give him money to bear
his expences, but probably he reserved it for the use of
his family.
What did Mrs. Cary mean, in her reply to Sullivan
about fearing to wait?
She ran to the prison, said Mary, on the evening
of your arrival in the city, while you and Wilson were
absent to apprize Sullivan of the good news, with a
view of cheering his spirits, and reviving his hopes of
relief.
And the woman he spoke of?
She was, returned Mary, the constable's wife, who
had arrested Mrs. Cary for the debt, and being left in
her care whilst in custody, and while her husband was
absent on other business, she treated Mrs. Cary with
great cruelty and harshness.
But as it is over brother, and we are happy, don't
be poisoning our happiness or ruffling your temper by
investigating past misfortunes.
I will take your advice, dear Mary, and am
prouder
of you than ever. I saw last evening by the
reception
given to Sullivan, that he had been your friend.
But what became of the relation mentioned in your letter
from Boston, why did he not befriend Mrs. Cary?
Oh, don't enquire, brother, he was dead, and his
family
treated her with scorn and contempt; do let us
I have done.
After dinner we got the Commodore and the ladies
into
carriages, and proceeded to our new friend's, the
Irishman'sLing and Sambo walking together in the
rear, whilst Jinkins, Ferdinand, and myself, walked in
the van.
I wished to have left Jinkins at home to keep Miss
Watson company, but the old man would by no means
consent to go without him; so ardent was his
attachment
28*
to this young man, that his existence seemed
interwoven
with that of Jinkins.
No, Dick must go too.
Thus the cavalcade moved forward like a funeral
procession
.
We from design had stowed my uncle and
Mrs. Cary, in the same carriage, but I shall believe to
the day of my death that they never exchanged a word
during the ride. It was ludicrous enough to see the
party
ushered into the humble house of Mr. and Mrs.
Sullivan
.
After so long a time, we made shift to get my
uncle housed, and seated in an arm-chair, which had
been brushed up and placed before the fire for the
purpose
.
The old man completely filled the chair, muffled
up as he was in cloaks and great-coats, he resembled an
eastern Emperor, being fully as thick as he was long,
while he supported himself with his gold-headed cane,
in order to sit firm. After he was settled to our minds,
the ladies were next accommodated with seats; but the
size of the parlour was such that no room was left at the
fire for the gentlemen without crowding the ladieswe
therefore sat down at their backs, and a deficiency of
seats happening to occur, Jinkins after standing some
time, picked up an old three-legged chair (without a
back) and placing it firm against the wall sat himself
down, trusting to providence for consequences. But
Sambo and Ling are still to be disposed ofSambo
pushed
in and looking round to observe what prospect for
him, his master pointed to the corner on his left here
stow thyself to larboard, thee swab. Ling squeezed
in between his master's feet, and enjoyed the warmth of
the fire with more than common satisfaction, and sure
enough we were all finally settled.
Every thing in the house (and that was not much)
was neatthe hearth was cleanly swept, and the
mantlepiece
tricked out in tip-top style.
After the bustle our arrival occasioned was over,
Sullivan
charged his fire with a double portion of wood,
which soon obliged the Commodore and the ladies to
give ground, and afforded an opportunity for all to
share the warmth of the fire. In the meantime Jinkins'
seat gave way, and he not being sufficiently guarded
against its fallacy, came with his starboard side to the
floor: this raised a laugh at his expence.
Zounds, Dick, said my uncle, thee like to have
run afoul o' the rocks; why didn't thee make thy
anchor
sure, boy?
Sambo by this time began to be very much annoyed
by the heat, hemmed in on all sides as he was, I saw that
it would be impossible for him to occupy his tenement
much longer. He had been veering (as my uncle would
call it) from right to left, and from left to right, with
increasing
activity for some time. At length being unable
to endure it any longer, he forced a passage through the
crowd, with an exclamation of you reckon de debil
could stan' dat? and flew out of the house with the
rapidity
of lightning.
Mrs. Sullivan after recieving and returning the
salutation
of the company, withdrew as I suspected to the
kitchen for the purpose of preparing tea. She was in
appearance older than her husband, not handsome, low
of stature, dark skin, and black eyes, but her looks
bespoke
all that could be conceived of good nature and
benevolence
;
and if I had the liberty of giving my opinion,
I should say it would not be long before she ,
and I began to reflect that our visit perhaps was
ill-timed
.
My uncle Thomas viewed her at first sight with
a degree of surprise, resembling that of Sancho Panzy
when day light disclosed to him the pasteboard nose.
Mrs. Cary now enquired for the children, who came
pouring in from the kitchen, whence they had been
driven
upon our arrivalthere were six in all, three sons
and three daughters. When we love a man how natural
it is to love all that belongs to him; even before I saw
saw those children, I felt my heart warm at the sound of
their names. There's one apiece for us, thought I, and
took one of the rosy-cheeked rogues in my lap, and
Jinkins
pulled another to him, patted him on the cheek, and
gave him some change to buy him a gun. My uncle
took out his gold watch and snuff-box, alternately
presenting
them to the youngest (a beautiful boy of four
years old) to entice him to sit on his knee. The child,
however, stood off, surveying him with that sort of
curiosity
so common to childrenat length, being unable
to resist the temptation, he suffered himself to be lifted
on the old gentleman's knee, who called Sambo, to go
and procure apples and ginger-bread, declaring that
not one of the other children should have one. This
stipulation was no doubt an indispensable preliminary to
the treaty of amity about to be ratified between them.
Mrs. Cary had brought frocks for the little girls
Mary and Martha remembered the brides' favours:
every
thing was pretty, mighty pretty, mine is the
prettiest
,
it is beautifulnothing but noise, pulling, hawling,
and joyful acclamations was to be heard. In the midst
of the tumult in comes Sambo, give me one, give me
one, was repeated by the whole group, but the little
proprietor however, seized them with both hands, and
looking up in my uncle's face, exclaimed
They sha'nt have them, they are mine, an't they?
sha'nt have one, shall they? an't I your boy? won't you
hit them with your cane?
Yes, that I will, said the old man, let 'um go
and buy apples themselves if they want 'um.
To keep the peace, and restore harmony amongst
them, I sent the oldest boys to buy apples and cakes
for them all. In the meantime the champaign was
handed
round with great liberality, accompanied with the
laugh and the jest. Mrs. Sullivan occasionally
appeared
and disappeared; though it was evident she
partook
in the merriment, I saw by the colour of her face
that tea could not be far off, and I was glad for her sake,
as she was not in a situation to undergo such fatigue.
The children were dismissed by Sullivan to the
kitchen, where they might regale themselves without
molestation on their sweet-cakes and apples.
Sometime after, they disappeared, one of them (the
one I had caressed on their first appearance) came
running
in and addressing himself to me, in an audible
voice, said O my, if mammy hasn't got the most cups
in the kitchen, and she is making tea, and a whole heap
of things, and she's borrowed all Mrs. Cantler's
teaspoons
and plates and ever so many things; why there's
so many of you here you'll eat all mamma's victuals up.
The company burst into a loud peal of laughter.
Get you gone, said his father, and don't be after
talking saucy to the gentlemen.
Just at this moment the maid appeared with a
teaboard
loaded with cups and saucers, which she sat on a
small table, she then withdrew and in a short time
returned
followed by the lady of the house, with whom we
took tea in form. I felt no small degree of concern for
Jinkins, as there was no alternative for him but to fix
up the old chair once more. I was in pain lest he
might tumble over again and scald himself, and worse,
break the poor woman's cups.
Tea being over and every expression of kindness and
good will interchanged between the two families, we
returned
home safe and in fine spirits, laughing all the way
at the incidents of the evening.
CHAPTER XXVI.
After
attending the ladies home, I proposed a walk
to Jinkins. I was anxious to learn Horton's situation,
whether he lacked any thing to render him comfortable.
Calling at the Post Office on our way thither, I found a
letter from New-York: I broke the seal hastily and
looking at the signature found it was from Doctor
Nevitt
wishing
to read it at my leisure, we walked on to
Horton's. It was dark when we arrived; he was
sitting
at supper with his family, and received us with
every
demonstration of joy. Mrs. Horton, in whose
countenance
never aught but sweetness (the influence of virtue)
shone, received us like a blushing bride, while peace and
contentment sat on every brow.
The penitent Horton was overwhelmed at this
instance
of our generosity and attention, and invited us to
partake of his supper. We thanked him, observing we
had just rose from tea, and entered upon common topics
of conversation, avoiding every thing which might tend
to wound his feelings, or those of his family. Every
thing about the house looked neat and comfortable, and
the table was amply spread.
I asked him what business he intended to pursue, or
whether any?
He said if he had a capital he would set up a
grocery
.
I replied he should not want the necessary sum, and
that he had better perhaps go to New-York; he might
take an apartment in one of my buildings, and Mrs.
Horton could have her chamber and
kitchen
if she wished
one, and he should have it gratis the first year, after that
at a moderate rent. I would on my own account prefer
him to another.
He thanked me and looked at his wife, as if to consult
her, but she remained silent. I told him he had better
perhaps make his arrangements for removing there as
soon as possible; he might, however, consider upon it,
and let me know in the course of the weekthat I should
go to New-York myself in a few weeks, and should be
glad to know his determination, and after some minutes
we took our leave, as I was anxious to hear from the
Doctor.
We had proceeded perhaps half way to our lodgings,
when suddenly we heard a voice exclaim, this is the
villain! seize him, seize him! The noise now
increased
to a tumultuous buz of numbers and we could
distinguish
nothing.
It proceeded from one of the alleys which formed an
angle with the street we were in. I proposed going to
see what poor wretch it was, and what his crime:
perhaps
he might be innocent, perhaps not; he might be
poor, he might want money, he might want a friend, he
might want something.
My own sufferings had been so great and so acute,
that I felt for every child of misfortune. I felt the force
more than ever of that emphatic reply of Terence:I
am a man, I therefore have an interest in every thing that
concerns humanity.
We advanced but a few steps when we were met by
several men dragging a poor creature between them.
Whatever had been his crime, his looks bespoke poverty
and want; but we shall soon know thought I, what he
has done.
We will go, said I to Jinkins and see this poor
fellow
tried. for they were taking him before an officer of
the police.
When we arrived there, the magistrate asked where
were the witnesses? one of the men stepped out, and in a
few minutes brought in a middle aged woman; she was
sworn and gave the following testimony against the
prisoner
:
She had stepped out of her house to see a
neighbour
,
and sat some time talking with her friend, and
while she was there, one of her children ran to her
crying
,
and told her that a strange man had come into the
house, and was stealing the bread, and that she and the
man at whose house she was, ran as fast as they could,
and when they had got near the house this man, pointing
to the prisoner, ran out of the door, and that the man who
was with her persued himthat her children were
crying
when she came to them, and she went in to quiet
them.
And what did he take out of your house? said the
magistrate.
She did not know whether he took any thing or not
except some bread, which was in a cupboardthat the
children told her he came in and went to the cupboard,
and took the bread, but whether he had taken any thing
else or not she could not tell, as she had not had time to
examine.
The man gave in nearly the same testimony, except
the bread, which she only had from the children.
The magistrate desired the woman to withdraw, and
told her she would do well to see whether she had lost
any thing, that he should hold the prisoner to bail, and
she could make the requisite search in the meantime.
When she was gone he told the men to search the
prisoner
and see what was to be found upon him. This
they did in his presence, and found nothing but a
penknife
.
The poor hungry wretch had lost his bread, I
suspect, (if he took any) in the squabble.
I suppose two hundred dollars will do, said the
magistrate
,
whose lenity and mildness towards this
unfortunate
man interested me much in his favour.
Can you give security to that amount?
He replied that he did not knowhe was a stranger
in the place.
Gentlemen, said the magistrate, must this man
go to prison? will none of you venture to bail him? no
one spoke.
I must write your mittimus, then, said he.
I will be one, said Jinkins.
I will be another, said I. The poor creature, for
the first time, looked up, and such a meagre countenance
I never saw.
The magistrate wrote the bonds, and called upon us
severally for our names. The prisoner eyed me with
apparent attention, and seemed to change countenance
upon hearing my name.
Of this I took little notice, being in haste to have done.
When the business was finished we arose to depart, and
bowing to the company, I invited the prisoner, whose
name was Smith, to accompany us, telling him, with a
smile, that I was compelled to look after him. He
bowed and accepted the invitation, and I thought I saw
his eye fill as he spoke.
It must be a hard-hearted wretch, indeed, that
kindness
cannot penetrate; but this depends upon
circumstances
entirely. Had this man been wealthy, or even
independent, my attention to him would have passed
over as a thing by the bybut poor and friendless as he
was, it affected him to the quick.
As we walked towards our lodgings I asked him if
he had any friends or acquaintances in the city?
He answered that he had a few acquaintances, but
he did not know that he had a friend in the world; but
this he said was his own fault, for his conduct had been
such that he deserved none.
I asked him what part of the Union he was reared in?
Dear sir, said he, excuse me, for I am an outcast
from my country. I dare not be seen there.
I observed that I would not press the thing; I was
merely talking to pass off the time, and that I had no
desire
to pry into his affairs; but hoped he would amend
his life, from this time; that the sense he had of his
faults was a favourable symptom.
Just at this instont, I saw him take something from
the extended hand of Jinkins, which I concluded was his
purse.
We were now at our lodgings, I hastened to the
landlord
,
and desired supper to be set immediately for one
person, a friend of mine, and leaving the stranger in a
room where I requested his supper might be served, I
stepped to the bar-keeper for a bottle of wine, which I
set on a table by Smith, telling him to help himself and
that he should have something to eat, in a few minutes.
It is needless to repeat the expressions of gratitude
and thanks this poor creature bestowed on me in his
turn, for poor he was His clothes were all in tatters,
and his shirt was as black as a chimney-sweeper. He
24
shivered with cold, and ate as if he had eat nothing in
three days. No wonder he forced the bread from the
woman! Oh misery, misery, how appalling thou art!
This unhappy man, I thought, no doubt, impelled by
want has committed some crime for which he has been
obliged to quit his native soil, and roam abandoned
amongst unfeeling strangers.
When I viewed his dress and his meagre looks it
brought to mind my own situation, from which I had
but just escapedand feel for him I did at every pore of
my heart. Had I not done so I had deserved a tenfold
vengeance at the hand of Him who disposes events.
I drew his table near the fire and cautioned him against
eating too much; but seeing no abatement for several
minutes after this precaution, I began to be alarmed,
and told him I must insist upon his leaving off, and
desired
the waiter to carry away the things. I perceived
no alteration in his looks at this orderhe neither
frowned
nor smiled.
I told him he might drink as much wine as he pleased,
but I thought it dangerous to indulge him in eating any
more, and enquired how long it had been since he eat?
Guess my astonishment when he replied he had not eaten
a meal in four days! he had, in that time, begged a
little
girl for part of a piece of bread she was eating, and
at another time he took a bone of meat, by force, from a
dog.
Well, my friend, content yourself, you shall never
want another meal, at least while I have any thing
myself
;
in the meantime you will not take it amiss if I send
you a change of clothes until you can have some made.
Oh, sir, this is too much for such a wretch as I am.
You know not sir for whom you are doing all thisI am
a bad man, a very bad man.
There are none of us good, said I, and left him for
the present. I stepped to the landlord and desired him
to send a tub of water into the next room with a towel
and plenty of soap, and then proceeded to the parlour of
Mrs. Cary, where Jinkins had already related the cause
of our absence. Every one enquired who the stranger
wasI begged them to excuse meI did not know, and
left them abruptly.
Going to my chamber I selected a complete suit of
clothes, a change or two of linen, and proceeded with
them to the room in which I left Smith. I laid them on
a chair and told him the servant would bring him water
to wash, after which he would oblige me by putting on
the clothesthat I would stay with him longer, but
having
other engagements, I was compelled to leave him
that he would sleep there that night, and further it was
my wish that he would remain there, and then bid him
good night.
I'll be bound, for Charles he's been seein' to the
poor fellow, here these milksops sit as if 'were nailed to
the stools 'cause they're got a wife, would'nt give 'um for
a squadron o'ye, how do'st 'do Charles did'st give the
poor fellow something to put 'um comfortable?
I have sir.
Jinkins is tellin' as how they was going to harryfy
and tarryfy 'um and put 'um in limbo and all that, tho'f
I scolded Dick 'case he dident let me know, I would a
thought nothin' a walkin' that far to save a comrade
from a tucken up.What dose say Charles, dose want
any thing? Jinkins says give 'um some.Dick knew
that was right, faith if 'hadn't done it 'would a sent him
a drift.
I told him the stranger was well taken care of, and
had plenty to eat and drink.
The company had waited supper for us some time, I
sat down with them, and taking a cup of choclate,
excused
myself, and withwrew to my room to read the
Doctor's letter. It ran in the following words:
Dear Sir.Agreeably to my promise, I
communicate
the following particulars relative to Miss Simpson.
She continues to mend every day; I think her cure
will be perfected in the course of three or four weeks.
The girl you left here, still attends her with unremitting
attention.
I yesterday for the first time informed her that you
were brother to the young lady that formerly lived at her
father's, and that your name was Burlington. She was
much agitated, and I said no more to her for some time.
When she asked, what was become of Miss Mary?
I told her she was in Philadelphia, and was to be
married
in a few days, to a Mr. Wilson an old suitor, and
that you had recovered your property, with every other
circumstance that related to your present happy
independence
.
She was greatly astonishedsighing deeply, she said
had you known how unworthy she was of your
compassion
,
and the cruel treatment your sister received from
her, you would have left her to that fate she so justly
deserved
.
I thought I would let her rest upon her own
ideas awhile, and enquired how she came to fall into the
distressing situation in which you found her.
She answered, that she had been seduced by a wretch
from her father's house, that her father was a
respectable
man in Boston, he had one son and three daughters;
she was the eldest. She then went on to relate the story
of your sister, the plots that were laid to ensuare her,
and the falsehoods she propagated to injure hershe
took the whole of the blame on herself. She said she
reigned mistress in the family, and would have every
thing as she pleased, not even her father or mother dared
to contradict her.
On mentioning her parents, she burst into a flood of
tears, and it was several minutes before she was able to
proceedI was a very undutiful child, I broke my
father's
heartno wonder God has sent his judgments
upon
me.
I asked her what had become of the man who
seduced
her, what was his name, and place of residence, and
whether it was to him she owed the complaint, under
which she had so nearly fallen a sacrifice?
She said his name was Hunterthat he had been
partly reared in New-York, but was often in Boston
that he had been guilty of crimes, was thrown into
prison
,
and while there contrived to write to her, and
entreated
her to aid him in getting out: that through her
means he was let out with a false key, which she hired
a man to make at a great expence. She had agreed to
run off with him to North-Carolina, and get married:
(poor fool that I was)but at that time I really loved
him, was blind to his faults, and believed every thing
that he said. I met him at a place agreed upon, with
only one small trunk of clothes, and as many more as I
could tie in a handkerchief. I had bespoke a passage to
Norfolk, in Virginiafrom there we were to go by land
to Carolina. As the vessel was to sail by day-light in
the morning, and as the keeper of the prison would not
discover the cheat until the usual time of taking breakfast
to the prisoners, the prospect of our getting off was
favourable
.
I had stolen five hundred dollars from my
father
the night before we sailedthis with a little change
and a gold watch which Hunter had, was all our
dependence
,
and we left Boston under feigned names.
We had a quick passage to Norfolk; there we
tarried
a week, and I passed for his sister. At Norfolk he
spent his time with gamblers at the gaming table, where
he won all their money. From this place instead of
going
to North-Carolina, we took shipping for Charleston,
South-Carolina, which was against my will. I urged
him to go to North-Carolina, where we could have our
marriage celebrated with more facility, but he was
inflexible
.
I now, for the first time, began to suspect his
sincerity
;
but it was too late. I set off with him to
Charleston
,
where we passed for man and wife, and took
lodgings
in an obscure part of the town. Flushed with his
success at Norfolk, he became a gambler by profession,
and spent his time wholly with gamblers, and the most
abandoned characters; he would be out whole nights,
rioting in all manner of debaucheryhe would often
bring his companions to my room, where they would
drink and carouse till day-light: singing lewd songs,
demolishing glasses, bottles, chairs, and tables; cursing,
swearing, and very often fighting. It was in vain to
remonstrate against these unparalleled scenes.
Not to tire you, sir, we lived in this manner nine
months; during which time he had extorted my last
dollar
for stakessometimes he won, but oftener lost, and
being detected by the police officers, he decamped I
knew not where, leaving me without a single dollar,
and in daily expectation of being confined. When I
*24
found he was indeed gone, I congratulated myself, as he
eternally disturbed my quiet. I sent for the landlord
and candidly confessed the whole truth to him, begging
him to dispose of some jewels upon the best terms he
could, pay himself for the rent which was due, and
purchase
the requisites for my confinement: and told him if
that was not sufficient, I had some good clothes left,
which he would have the goodness to dispose of, in order
to make himself sure. The landlord was a humane,
goodhearted
man, or I do not know what would have become
of me. Matters being thus arranged, I waited the issue
with an aching heart.
In the meantime I wrote home to my oldest sister,
calling myself Mrs. Hunter. This was the first time I
had written home since I left Boston. In this letter I
concealed my misfortunes, but begged her to implore the
forgiveness of my parents, and write to me as quick
as possiblethat if my parents refused to forgive
me, I would never see them more. In short, sir, my
child died, and I had every attention paid to me during
my illness which I had a right to expect.
When I recovered my health, I took in sewing and
all sorts of needle-work, and not having heard from my
parents, I determined not to return to Boston until I
was sure of being forgiven. I saw no company except
my landlord and his wife, who treated me with great
kindness and respect. I set up a milliner's shop,
worked
day und night, and made money fast. At length I
received the long-looked-for letter from my sister. It
brought news that my father was dead! that he never
was well from the time I had cloped, that the family was
in the deepest distress, that my father's creditors rushed
upon the family without delay or mercy, and his
property
fell by a great deal short of paying his debts, that
my brother had abandoned himself to drunkeness and
debauchery
,
that she and her other sister had taken a small
room and followed mantua-making for the purpose of
maintaining themselves and their aged mother. That
my mother when pressed upon the subject of my
forgiveness
,
said she never would, though she would be glad
if I would come and see my sisters.
This melancholy news almost drove me distracted.
My father dead! I could never forgive myself, and was
for a long time inconsolable! Not to be tedious, I
continued
in Charleston where I got plenty of work,
intending
to make a little sum for the relief of my mother,
besides
as much as would clothe me decently, and pay my
passage to Boston; to this end, I doubled my diligence,
I sat up late and early, got a handsome custom. I sat
behind my counter all day, to attend my customers, and
worked every moment I had to spare. It was about six
months or nearly that from the time I received the letter
from my sister, when upon counting my money I found
it amounted to two hundred and sixty dollars; I owed
about as much as my stock would sell for, so that I could
count nothing upon that.
I had sat up late that night, the embers on the hearth
were dead, my candle was burnt to the snuff, when I
was roused from my reverie by a gentle tap at the door;
I ran and hid my money under the head of my bed, and
thinking none other than the landlady was at the door,
stepped to it to see what was the matter, when who
should it be but Hunter! His appearance was so sudden
and unexpected, that it deprived me both of speech and
motion. He took the advantage of my situation, and
caught me in his arms`My dear Clarissa,' said he,
`forgive me, take pity on me, and give me something to
eat, for I am starving.' His pathetic address, added to
his miserable situation, softened me into pity; my
resolution
gave way, and his tears which flowed plentifully,
obtained his pardon. I opened a drawer where I kept
wine, buiscuit, cheese, &c., lighted a candle and sat the
whole affair upon the table, bidding him go and eat; he
sat down and eat voraciously, thanking, and praying God
to bless me all the while. After eating sometime, `dear
Clarissa,' said he, `come and take a glass of wine with
me'I refused: `I will drink none then,' said he
mournfully
.
I went to the table and filled two glasses and we
drank, he pressed my hand to his lips; in short, he
spent the night with me and several weeks, during which
time we were married. This was done very privately,
no one being present but the landlord, who alone knew
that we had never been married before. All went on
very well; I attended to my business as usual, still
thinking I would go and see my mother, and return, as
my husband dare not show his face there. We had
agreed that he should remain in Charleston, I would
visit my mother, obtain some relief from Hunter's father,
if I could see him, and return. Hunter's father I knew
was wealthy, and he was his only child, and although he
had not heard from him since he had been imprisoned in
Boston, yet I hoped the time was not far distant when I
was to be independent and happy.
In the meantime I made arrangements for my
journey
,
and packing up a few clothes in a small trunk, I
deposited the money which I intended as a present for
my mother, in the bottom of the trunk, taking out barely
enough to bear my expences. Matters being thus
arranged
,
I went to bed, fully intending to set out next
morning by six o'clock, but in the night my treacherous
husband decamped, taking my trunk with him and all
my hopes.
My situation next morning you may easily
imagine
it
was beyond description. But I soon found that
this part of his conduct was but a trifle, when compared
with what a few days brought to light. I found myself
infected with a disease which your goodness has
relieved
.
I sold off my stock, which was little more than
sufficient to pay my debts, applied to a physician,
received
advice and medicine: and as I had understood
Hunter
to say that his father had large possessions in this
city, I set sail in the first vessel that sailed, intending
upon my arrival here to find out Hunter's father and
disclose
the whole matter to him.
When I arrived here, after much enquiry I was
informed
that such a man as I enquired for did live in the
city, but was scarcely ever at home; that he had been
absent for the last three months, no one knew whither.
It is about six weeks since I landed in New-York, where
I intended to remain until Hunter's father returned. In
the meantime from neglect or some cause unknown to
me, my complaint instead of growing better grew worse,
probably from the distress of mind and fatigue I
underwent
.
When Mr. Burlington came so fortunately, or
unfortunately rather (for it was my earnest wish to die)
I had just sold the last thing I had to purchase a little
wood and procure medical aid. And even this was not
mine, but I will tell him all, I will confess to him how
cruel I was to his angelic sister, I will go on my knees
to him, I will tell him that I did defraud his sister out
of muchYes, I will tell him that I did keep a
necklace
of her's through all my wants and distress, and fully
intended to redeem it if I ever got well, for the purpose
of returning it to the right owner, for I have never
prospered
since I had it: and if I live, I intend to refund
every
thing belonging to Miss Mary.
She then begged of me, since I was so good, she
said, to go and see the jeweller and charge him not to
dispose of the necklace; that it was not her own, but
belonged to another, and that she would redeem it when
she got well.
I desired her to make herself easy, that you were in
the shop when the little girl came in with it, and that
you took it out of the girl's hand and knew it to be your
sister's, and to that circumstance she owed her recovery:
for the moment you discovered her, you came for me,
that you paid me my fee, purchased the necessaries she
saw, and hired the nurse, paying her wages in advance;
and that you and your sister being now independently
rich, she would find it no hard matter to obtain your
forgiveness
.
She was amazed at hearing thisclasping her hands
together and raising her eyes to heaven, thank God, said
she, how glad I am to hear it; I hope I shall live to see
them both, see them happy, and acknowledge my crimes
to the innocent Mary, I shall never be happy until I do
that.
I told her that she had better compose herself for
the present, that she had exerted herself rather too much;
she might rely firmly upon my attention until she was
perfectly well, and that you would then furnish her with
money to go where she wished.
Thus, sir, I have detailed to you the story of this
unfortunate woman I shall be happy to hear from you
at all times, and take pleasure in your correspondence.
Respectfully yours.
CHAPTER XXVII.
The
story of this unfortunate young woman affected
me too much too sleep, I therefore called for pen, ink
and paper and answered the Doctor's letter, informing
him that I should be in New-York in the course of a
week or ten days, and desired him to tell Clarissa that
Hunter's father was then in New-York, but she need
give herself no trouble on his account: that I would be
there shortly, and do her business with him. Yes,
poor Clarissa, I will be your friend, true you have erred
greatly, said I internally, and who has not? thy tears
and prayers shall not be in vain: you have sinned, and
so have I: you have suffered much, so have I: God
forbid
that I should add to your sufferings by upbraiding
you, but if I can find your seducerrash thought. Yes,
if I could find him all hardened as he is, the thoughts of
his wrongs to thee should not be forgiven; I forgive from
my heart his conduct to my sister. Butno matter,
the vengeance of heaven will, if it has not already,
overtake
him; poor wretch, perhaps he is even now in want
of bread.
Jinkins who slept with me, now entered my room.
I am glad you are come, said I, I was just taking
the
blues
.
What's the matter now? said heany bad news
from New-York? you have read the letter, I presume?
I reminded him of the young woman whom I found ill
there, and read to him the letter.
Curse them Hunters! said he, they must be limbs
of the Dl himself.
I told him I should go to New-York in a week or two,
and would be glad of his company; that I wished to
settle
my business upon a more permanent plan, as Wilson
would go to Tennessee in the spring, and I should
accompany
him.
He said he did not care much, provided old square
toes was willing.
I undertook to obtain his consent, without which I
would not wish him to go: and asked him If he had
seen Smith?
He said he saw a man that he took to be him, but he
was so altered since he was dressed, that he never should
have known him; indeed, he had to ask if he was the
same man?
And what shall we do with him now, Jinkins?
said I thoughtfully, and hardly knowing what I said.
I don't know what you will do with him, now you
have dressed him up like a gentleman, without you can
get him into the army or navy, and he looks like a
coward
tooI dare say he is not powder-proof. It would
have been better if you had set him to cleaving wood, he
looks so like a scape-gallows, that he is fit for nothing
else.
Oh don't talk so, Dick, the poor fellow is in
distress
he
is poor.
He talks cheerful, said Jinkins: he seems to be
quite renovated since he had his supper.
I'll see in the morning what he can do, but no one
will employ him without a recommendation, and that I
suspect he cannot obtain. I suspect your plan will be
the best, that is to get him a birth on board of a ship, it
will be the best place for him.
Next morning after breakfast I walked into Smith's
room, and asked him how he felt?
He replied very well.
I was truly surprized to see the alteration which dress
made in his appearance. I entered into conversation
with him, and soon discovered he was not of the lower
order. I asked him,
What he intended to do when his trial was over? I
shall fee a lawyer for you, and expect you will be
acquitted
.
Before he had time to reply, some one knocked at the
door, and Horton entered the room. He bowed slightly
to me, and viewing Smith with uncommon attention for
a few seconds, exclaimed, Why, William is this you?
Smith answered yes, advanced and shook hands
with Horton, but evidently very much embarrassed.
And where have you been all this time? said
Horton
;
your father is much distressed on your account.
And where is my father? said Smith.
That I don't know, replied the other, but I
suppose
this gentleman has told you where he
was
not long
ago.
He has not, said hethe gentleman does not
know who I am.
Then I will make you acquainted. This is Mr.
Hunter.
I had indeed suspected it was Hunter's son, (but could
hardly bring myself to think so when I discovered that
he and Horton were known to each other; and what's to
be done now? thought Iwhat will those he has injured
say, if they find him out? Here was Burlington, alias
Dupon, here is my sister, will they forgive crimes such
as his? and here too is Mrs. Cary, it will not do, he
must remain unknown.
I informed Horton then of the circumstances which
occurred in the street, as we were returning home from
his house, and that he went by the name of Smith, and
that it would be best for him still to go by that name,
and charged him strictly not to discover his real name.
This I said in the presence of Hunter; I then left them
together, requesting Horton to tell him all he knew of
his father.
Getting up to leave the room, I told Hunter I wished
to have some conversation with him in the course of the
day, that he must abide where he was until something
was done for him, that he might depend upon my secrecy
as to his real name and character, of which I knew more
than he was aware: I then left Horton to explain, and
withdrew to the company.
Jinkins asked me what I was going to do with my
man?
I told him I believed I would take his advice, and
send him to increase the Navy.
That's right, my boy, said my uncle, I'll cut his
eye-teeth there.
In the course of half an hour Horton came to the door,
saying he desired to a speak a word to me. It was
merely
to tell me that he would close with my proposal to go
to New-York.
I informed him I should be there myself shortly, and
he might move as soon as he liked; I would give him
instructions
what to do, should he get ready before I set
out.
After sitting some time, I excused myself to the
company
,
and took Hanter to my room; ordering more fuel
on the fire, I desired Hunter to be seated.
It is not to upbraid you, sir, either for your own
crimes, or those which your father has committed towards
me and my family; I leave that matter between you and
your God. But we I find, are not the only persons you
have injured; you have something left yet, enough with
economy, to support you, which I suspect Horton has told
youbut in the first place, sir, I wish to know what
reparation
you intend to make to another person, whom
you shall soon hear of?
I then took the Doctor's letter out of my pocket, and
read it to him. When I had done, I looked at him for a
reply.
He hung his head, and said it was all true.
And what sort of a wretch must you be, to treat a
woman thuswho took you out of prison, left her
father's
house in the dead hour of the night, and no doubt
this was the cause of his death? What a sea of iniquity
have you waded through! But I spare your feelings; if
you have any, they must be bitter enoughsay, what
will you do with your wife?
I will reform, said he, and try to make her
happy
,
if she will consent to live with me.
But that I don't know, said I, she will have a
bad bargain, make the best of you; but she is poor, and
now dependent on meher family you see is likewise
poor, so that you have it in your power to do much.
If your wife refuses to live with you, which I think
probable you can nevertheless render her some
reparation
by contributing to the relief of herself and her
family
.
25
He replied that he was entirely ignorant of his
resources
that
his father had for some years back almost
abandoned him to want, on account of the dissolute life
he pursuedthat from what Horton had informed him
respecting the turn of his father's affairs, his prospect
was but small.
I gave him to understand the amount of what he might
expect.
He rejoined, that the balance of his life should be
spent in repairing the errors of the past, and whatever
he might receive from the wreck of his father's fortune,
should be liberally shared with his wife and her
relations
.
`This,' added he, is all I can say on that
subject
;
but allow me sir to express my gratitude to you
for your kindness, not only toward me last night, but in
extending it to the forgiveness of crimes in their nature
of the blackest die, but rendered still more so by your
noble generosity.
I told him the best recompense he could make was
to amend his life.
I apprized him of my intended visit to New-York,
where I should see his wife, and deliver any message or
letter, he might wish to send, and probably I might see
his father there also, and as you can not, I presume,
return
to New-York or Boston, you can give me
instructions
in regard to what you wish doneI shall attend
to it punctually. In the mean time you can remain in
this city until your trial, and until I return, and pass by
the name of Smith, as your real name may subject you to
danger.Here, even here, in this house, is the young man
who rescued my sister, and on whose account you were
imprisoned.
My sister is here also, married to a man, who might
not so easily forget an injury; and here also is Mrs.
Cary
whose daughter is lately married to the same Dupon,
whose real name is Burlington, a cousin of mine.
I could not undertake to defend you from the
vengeance
of all these, for which reason I think you had better
seek a lodging in some other part of the town. I will
furnish
you with the amount of what you may want until
I return.
All this you may do or not, just as it suits you, I
merely
give you my advice.
He accepted the offer, he said, and thanked me ten
thousand times for my kindness.
I left him for the present, and saught Jinkins to walk
with Hunter to some remote part of the town, where I
saw him comfortably lodged, paying his board in
advance
myself, lest he might be tempted by it to the
gaming
table. Learniug from Jinkins the amount, he gave
him the proceeding night (forty dollars,) I conceived it
quite enough to defray his ordinary expences. Finally,
I directed him to get his letters and instructions ready,
as I could not tell to a certainty when I should set out.
I recommended to him to keep no company, but rather
amuse himself with booksand that my favour and
protection
could only be secured by good behaviour on his
part.
As he shook hands with Jinkins and I, the tears for
the first time trickled down his cheeks.
Were I (as Goldsmith said upon another occasion) to
be angry at mankind for their vices, I might have
ample
cause in the present instance to indulge that pasion;
but would this be acting like a christian? Besides, who
am I that I should impugn this unfortunate fellow
creature
?
No! I chose rather to draw a veil over his crimes,
and leave him to his conscience.
It will be objected that this is nothing but a specious
pretence to superior judgment, and that the subject was
a favourable one to contrast viceand all sorts of crimes,
with their opposite virtues, and that such characters
should be held up to public view as examples.
Be it sothere are numbers no doubt, who would take
great pleasure in expatiating upon the conduct of this
unhappy
young man; to them, therefore, I leave the task,
reminding them at the same time, that if they wish their
nostrum to go down, they must sweeten it well; and let
them remember by the way, To err is human, to
pardon
is divine.
As we returned home, we picked up an old German
in the street, who was carrying a wallet on his shoulder,
which contained some excellent pipins.
As he was a great oddity, we brought him home with
us for the amusement of my uncle and the ladies.
He was about sixty or seventy years of age, a little
stoop shouldered, sandy hair, swarthy complexion, and
Jinkins said he was bandy-legged; as for that I can't say,
as his trowsers, or unmentionables (which you please)
were remarkably wide. His hat was a little less in
circumference
than a moderate umbrella, his coat or
roundabout
,
came down to the waistbands, which were as low as
I ever recollect to have seen. They were both of the
same piece, stout and warm, his shoes were also strong
and serviceable, having some two or three dozen,
flat-headed
nails droven into the heel. He walked with a staff
fully eighteen inches higher than his head.
We gave him his price for his apples, told him to bring
them along to our lodgings, and we would pay him well
for his trouble, and give him a glass of good wine
besides
.
Upon entering the parlour, he walked carefully round
the carpet, and made his obeisance to the company, by a
how to to laties and shentlemans.
I pointed to Mrs. Cary, telling him the apples were
for her, giving her the wink at the same time. He
layed
his hat and his cane on the floor by him, but before he
went farther, I gave him a glass of wine, saying he
must tell the lady all about his good apples, and the best
way to rear them, as they
were
the best I ever saw.
Laty I ish been cot ta peshest aupples auver you tit
see laty, ta ish shest ash sweet ash ta can pe une (and)
I ish peen cot more areaty, une I ish peen cot dam (them)
all ta year laty, une ta beach, une ta bear, une ta blum
un ta charries laty.
You must have a fine orchard sir, have you got the
winter pear.
Yough (yes) laty I ish peen cot ta vinder-bear ash
pig ash so laty (putting his fists together) put ta ish all
con areaty.
During this preamble, he never once thought of taking
out the apples but sat with the wallet across his knees.
Uncle Thomas viewing him with a mixture of surprise,
dislike and impatience, not common to him, and perhaps
his sympathy was excited in behalf of the ladies whose
patience he thought might well be exhausted, accosted
him with Harkee comrade with the wallet, haul in thy
outlandish lingo needn't make suck a fashs, cant unship
cargo, and say no more about 'um.
It was pretty evident that neither understood the other.
I fear ta shantlemons not fersta, (understand) said
Coonrod looking round at my uncle who sat a little to
the one side.
Thee may stay as long as thee likes friend, but thee
needn't raise such a hurricane about thae apples if so be
thee has got 'um, can't discharge freight and be done
we' it.
I explained that he must take out the apples, he
immediately
emptied them out, and the ladies flocked round
him in a trice, praised his apples and asked him
abundance
of questions about them, such as where he came
across them? how long he had them? and the best
method of preserving fruit-trees?
Coonrod however was not to be discouraged by such a
number of queries, asked in a breath.
I ish peen cot tish von, tish Swansyh (twenty) year
laty, I cot dam from Fretherick Shitherstriker
[12]
[12]
Sidirstricker, a German family in West, Va.
une he
pring dam from Sharmany.
I must have some of the trees I declare, said Mrs.
Cary.
Fel laty you ken kit 'um, une Felty Holshhopple he
ish peen cot dam too he'll kim you ta sem oder he leess
farder in ta gundry.
Wilson interrupted him in this part of the conversation,
by asking him if he understood surgery? The
German
however was not so easily to be taken by surprise.
You mean vot ish von procken pone, une but him to
geder akin oder make him crow upe areaty.
Yes sir that is what I mean to mend broken bones.
No I ish peen cot mine angle vat out order blace
more ash dwo dimes areaty, une it pen me, it pen me
tish vat vorst ting, can pee areaty.
An thee was put on a gib, for a monkey would pass
well enough an thee larboard hat, spliced for a sail,'
25*
said me uncle. Charles give him another glass of
wine, an thee can understand him, it's more than I can.
What nation do h' belong? if bean't got amongst a very
heathens, I believe sure there was none o' thae sart o'
people where I was born.
I replied he was a German, that they made the best
of citizensthey were sober, peaceable, and
industrious
.
Old Coonrod now bethought himself of home, picked
up his jacob-staff and hat, and bid us farewell.
The balance of the evening was spent at the expence
of the old German and his nation. For my own part, I
took no part in the conversation respecting the Belgic
race, but amused myself in explaining to my uncle,
Coonrod's
hard names.
Siderstricker, said he, Old Davy himself never
heard such a name.Well Dick that beats thee an thy
old stool at the Irishman's.
An opportunity offering, I drew Mary to her chamber,
and put into her hand the letter I received from Doctor
Nevitt, telling her the unhappy subject of it was no
other than her old acquaintance, Clarissa Simpson,
and how I received her nacklace.
The tender hearted Mary was deeply effected at the
poor girl's situation, and enquired if there was no
account
of the wrotch Hunter? I informed her that I had
heard of him, and would if in my power, make him do
her justice.I was going to New-York, where I
probably
should see all parties.
In the mean time, I desired her to sound Mrs. Cary
on the subject of marriage with my uncle. I told her I
was serious, he was an excellent match for her, and that
his situation required a help mate of her amiable
disposition
Indeed if any two were ever calculated for each other,
they were. Their natures if any thing were too generous.
I told Mary she must try and bring about a courtship
through the agency of Fredinand and Martha, while
Jinkins and myself were absentthat I promised myself
much amusement on the part of the old man at leastas
Mrs. Cary was so diffident, and her claims on us were
too great to be made the subject of mirth; but I should
like to hear my uncle adapt his sea phrases to the
subject
of wooing.
Mary replied, that she and Martha had joked her
mother about the old gentleman, but she feared it would
be difficult to bring her uncle to bear, as he says, but
we'll try him, I confess it would give me great pleasure
to see them man and wife.
Having at length a small respite from business, I
resolved
to share the society of my friends, for as yet it
had not been in my power to partake with them in that
pleasure without which life has no charms.
As I might not be long blessed with the opportunity,
I determined to consecrate a few days at least, to that
happiness to which I had long been a stranger.
Our time was filled up with various amusements;
some times we went to the play, sometimes we read an
amusing play or novel, sometimes we told stories,
played
blind man's buff, the lady's carpet, and a number of
other plays many of which were new to me, though
Mary
and Martha were perfect adepts in them.
Sambo too amused us with many comic jestures and
plays, common amongst the blacks of his original
country
.
The old commander in chief would often join in our
amusements, he always had to redeem his pawns by
giving
Mrs. Cary a kiss. Jinkins had to kiss Miss
Watson
,
and very often I was obliged to kiss Sambo
wheelbarrow
fashion.
Ling would sometimes join us, though I can't say he
was altogether well pleased, particularly with
blindman's
buff, the propriety of which he seemed to question,
as with pitiful looks, and tail tucked between his legs,
he would scamper out of the way, thinking us crazy no
doubt.
Horton's wife and daughters, and our friend Mr.
Sullivan were very often partakers in our amusements,
and no one was better calculated to promote mirth, or
beguile time than Sullivan; he was a perfect original,
the child of nature, artless and modest, yet all mirth and
humour.
It was one of those pleasant evenings in which I strove
to forget my past sufferings, that Mrs. Cary gratified the
company, and myself in particular with the incidents of
her life.
She had promised us this pleasure some time, but my
engagements had been such that it was delayed until I
should be perfectly at leisure.
She therefore one evening apprized us to be prepared
against the following. It was likewise agreed that
Jinkins should indulge us with a similar favour the
succeeding night.
I confess I had more than common curiosity on this
occasion, both being amongst the numbers of those for
whom I had the greatest regard.
On the evening appointed, Mrs. Cary commenced the
story of her life, which the reader will find in the
following
chapter.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
I was born and educated in England, and was an
only child.My father was a poor curate in the parish
of , in the county of Herfordshire. He was a man
of piety and learning, but having few friends, and those
proving treacherous and deceitful, he never was
advanced
.
He however kept a school, in which he taught the
common branches of learning, usually taught in country
schools; the profits of which, with the stipend of his
curacy
,
furnished him barely with the necessaries of life.
As his family was small, he might have laied up some
thing at the years end; but he was continually preyed
upon by the poor of his parish, and the generosity of his
nature (which he possessed even to weakness) led him,
contrary to the advice of his friends, to be not only the
supporter, but the dupe of many of his parishioners.
My mother died when I was only three years of
ageI remember nothing of her. My father upon her
death, resolved never to marry, and kept his word. He
kept a house-keeper and gardiner, which with myself
constituted his family, though he was seldom without
company, which his hospitality never failed to entertain.
This was the case from the time I can remember, and
Margaret, the house keeper, has often told me that it had
always been the case, though she said, if it had a been
her, she would a sent 'um away with a flea in their ear to
be eatin his honour out of house and home.
When I became old enough to learn, my father sent me
to a school mistress, who taught little children their
letters
,
and a b ab's, I remember very well the first
morning
I was taken there by Margaret. I had a little book
with a red cover, I did nothing however but admire my
book, play with the children, and cry for my papa. In
a few days however, I began to learn and became
reconciled
to the school.
I remained there about eighteen months, when my
father
removed me to his own school, where he taught me
all that he thought necessary on the score of literature.
I was now thirteen years of age, and my father
designing
to give me an opportunity of acquiring higher
accomplishments, sent me to a female boarding school
in the town of .
At this school I remained three years. I learned
needle-work, drawing, painting and music.
At the end of three years, my father came to bring
me home, not being able to keep me there any longer.
This was a sore trial to me, as I had contracted
friendships
with my young school mates. Though glad to see
my father, I wept bitterly upon taking leave of my
friends.
My father strove to amuse me, by pointing out the
beautiful country seats through which we passed; this,
and the prospect of seeing aunt Margaret and old
Daniel
,
the gardener, served in a great measure to restore
my spirits. Old Daniel, with his hat under his arm,
met us at the gate; he was quite transported to see me.
`Why I had grown a big woman, and quite handsome; I
declare, why you'll be a match for some of our grandees,
who knows but you'll be a great lady yet, and take old
Dan to wait on you?'
Margaret by this time had me in her arms, and such
wondersI was grown to be sure, how high? let me
see? wants but half a head to be as tall as I. They
nearly tore me to pieces between them.
I told Margaret I wanted something to eat.
And I have as fat a turkey as ever you tasted, said
she, at the fire: it's been done these two hours. And I
have good ale of my own brewing, and master said it
wouldn't keep: but I knowed as how it would keep, by
putting a
whir
o' hops, and I've got pickles, and I've
got jam, and jellies, and sweet meats.
Dear Margaret, said I, get any thing at allI have
eat nothing since yesterday morning, which was true.
We were scarcely seated at table, when the
parishioners
hearing of my arrival, came pouring in upon me
without ceremony. I was really provoked with them
and their vulgar manners, though I should have been
very glad to see them, had they not come in such crowds.
They, or at least a great many of them, staid till late:
eat and drank, and sending for a fiddle, tired as I was,
I was obliged to dance. The whole neighbourhood next
morning resounded with the praises of Miss Cary, for
Cary was the name of my father.
In the meantime I was visited by many of the gentry
of the country; some of them I presume came merely
out of curiositymany of them would, however, take
me home with them in their carriages. I was often
called
on to sing, dance and play, but I gave myself no airs
on that account, for I knew whom I wasa poor man's
daughter.
While I remained at the female school, I had forgotten
much of the more essential parts of education; my
father
,
as I was fond of reading, put history, travels, and
natural and moral philosophy into my hands; I also
reviewed
geography, English grammar, &c. My father
would suffer me sometimes to read a play, but would
never allow me to look into a novel; but, dear old man,
how often I cheated himI read every novel I met with
at the houses of those I visited. The old gentleman,
however, seldom consented to the importunities of those
who often called for the purpose of taking me home with
them, and without his consent I never visited.
About a year after I returned from school, I was
sitting with my father one nightthe candle had just
been lighted, and each of us with a book were preparing
to read. It was a very dark night, neither moon nor
stars were to be seen. Margaret was in the parlour,
where we were sittingafter lighting the candle, she
must sweep the hearth for the second time.
While she was figiting about, and my father sitting
with a book in his hand, looking over his spectacles at
her, to see when she would be done, we heard the
trampling
of horses, and in the same instant somebody halloed
at the gate.
Go, said my father, and see what they want. I
suspect it is somebody who have lost their way; I heard
hounds late this evening, and I'll be bound its some of
the sportsmen.
Margaret went to see what they wanted?
They had missed their way, and wanted somebody
to put them into the road to Woodgrove.
She didn't know the road.
They bid her open the gateand my father hearing
them ride up to the door, went to meet them.
They begged the favour of him to send some one
to put them in the roadit's so dn dark, said one of
them, that we can't see our way.
I believe we'll alight and warm awhile; its quite
chilly this evening, said one of them.
My father did not invite him with that cordiality
he was wont to express generally, being disgusted with
his abrupt manners.
He told them, however, they were welcome to
warm, and he would likewise send his servant to put
them in the road.
I arose and saluted them when they entered the room,
and making room for them to approach the fire, I
betook
myself to reading with perfect unconcern.
The one who spoke at the door, looked at me some
time, and asked my father if I was his daughter?
He replied that I was.
Dn fine girl, faith! Old gentleman, how did it
happen that you have such a handsome daughter? she is
an angel, by Gd.
I turned my eyes upon him with a look of contempt.
By his dress he appeared to be a nobleman, and on that
account he presumed, no doubt, to take the liberty he
did.
The other gentleman was an officer, from his uniform,
of an humble grade, and much more agreeable manners,
his countenance was prepossessing and modest, he
blushed
at the insolent language of his companion, and seeing
their presence was by no means acceptable, he
addressed
his companion with Come my lord, let us ride.
Dn it Warberton don't be in such haste, it's as
dark as it will be.Old gentleman I should like to hear
a little about your cirumstances and this young woman.
I can't believe she's your daughter.
I am surprised, sir, said my father, to hear a
gentleman of your appearance express yourself as you
do, adding with great warmth, that though he was
poor he ought not to be insulted in his own house.
Hoity toityyou know but little of politeness or even
common sense, sir, (said my father with spirit) not to know
that what you call praise, is a gross insult. The
servant
is ready, sir, to show you into the great road, as
Daniel appeared, with a lanthorn in his hand.
Well, said his lordship, I suppose we must go
I'm sorry I affronted you, sir, but you'll make friends,
won't you? offering his hand to my father, who took
the offered hand, saying He was no man's foe.
That's clever, my old dadI've come down to
tarry
awhile amongst you. My estate lies not far from
here, and you must come and see me, old buckI should
like to be better acquainted, and giving me a
significant
look, he bid me good night and started, his
companion
following his example.
I do not know that I ever was more hurt in my life,
except when I lost my husband. True, I have had more
serious cause of affliction, but I was better prepared to
meet it.
The whole matter was explained the following day;
the clerk of the parish called in, as he frequently did,
to tell us the news. Well, what was it?why lord D.
has come down to spend a few weeks at his estate, the
old lord, his father, is dead.
They say he came down in a wonderful fine carriage,
and a heap of servants, and there's the greatest doings at
Woodgrove ever was heard on. Dorothy, the old
house-keeper
,
slipped down to our house last night to tell us
all about it. But she says he's no more like his father
than she is like the queen.
She says her old lord always shook hands with her
and enquired how she had been and how old Busky was,
an old favourite dog, but as for her young lord, when
she met him at the door, and
drapped
a low curtesy, and
said you're welcome my lord, he just flew by her as
though she'd been a witch, with a how fares ye, how
fares ye, old woman.
I be afeared he'll be a tightsome lordLord, I hear
26
as how he sent for the Steward as soon as he come, and
desired him to be ready with his books and papers by
the next morning.
They say he's one of your ranting, haughty,
extravagant
sort of men, that don't care what they do
Why he was near running over old mother Barns
yesterday, if it hadn't a been that his horse took fright
at her as she screamed out for fear. After much more
such talk, the loquacious clerk departed.
My father appeared thoughtful all the morning, and
seeing him still inclined to silence after the clerk left us,
I first spoke
I don't like the character nor the appearance of our
new neighbour at all, said father.
Neither do I, said Margaret; but we must keep
this to ourselves.
I have no fears but for you my child. He has the looks
of a libertine, and how we are o behave to him I know
not, but to offend him would be certain ruin to us both,
he will certainly be here again, he has impudence enough
to bear him out.
I won't appear, said I, if he should come.
Ah, that would not do Martha, that would enrage
him, for you know that I could not tell him a falsehood,
and he would resent it as an insult were he to learn the
truth.
I think you had better go and spend a few weeks at
Mr. Camel's, you will be safe there, and you can write
to me every mail or two, so get ready as quick as you
can, and take the stage in the morning.
I was quite charmed to hear thisI was fond of
Mr. Camel's family; it was one of those I had visited
since my return from school. To Mr. Camel's I went,
the distance being only seven miles, I arrived there
before
dinner the next day.
You may guess my surprise upon entering the house
to find the same gentleman there who was with lord D.
at my father's the preceding night. I was presented to
him in spite of my objections to the contrary. He was
a nephew of Mr. Camel, and a lieutenant in the army.
He had just got leave of absence a few days to visit his
uncle, and being acquainted with lord D. he had
accompanied
him, with several other young men, from London
his name was Warberton
These particulars I had learned from Lucretia, the
eldest Miss Camel. I must confess I felt a partiality
for this young man at first sight, which perhaps only
arose from the contrast between him and his impertinent
companion.
I was both pleased and sorry to meet this young man
I was pleased, I could not tell why, and was sorry that
my purpose would be completely defeated, as through him
lord D. would discover my retreat. Shortly after my
arrival dinner was announced, and the Lieutenant and
myself were placed directly opposite to each other at
table.
I dare say I never behaved so awkwark in my life;
I shall remember it while I live. I let my fork fall first,
and then my knifeI was so confused at these accidents
that when I was asked what I would have, I would say
sir, when I ought to have said madam.
I never looked at Warberton during the time, and
the moment I could rise with decency I made my escape
took one of the little girls with me and withdrew to
one of the chambers, fully determined not to appear at
the table while Warberton remained in the house.
The two elder Miss Camels came into the chamber
shortly afterwards and would have had me return to the
parlour, but I refused, saying I was not very well, and
besides I did not like to be in company with strangers.
They insisted, but I positively refusedand they left
me.
Their mother came in some time afterwards and
expressed much uneasiness that I was unwell. She sat
with me some time and then left me to prepare tea,
saying
a cup of tea would relieve me.
Now, thought I, I shall be obliged to appear, or
affront
the family. When tea was ready the girls came
again, saying
You shall go, Martha, and take tea with the
handsome
Lieutenant, he is in raptures with you, he related
the adventure of going to your house, and how impudent
lord D. was at your father's. He said he was mad
enough to beat him for the language he used to you.
Come, come along, it's nothing but a love fit,
Martha
,
nothing else in the world.
Come, fix your ruffles and curls neat, said little
Ann, I want you to look pretty. I followed them to
the parlour, and took the remotest seat I could find.
I had not been long seated before Warburton came
and sat down by me, observing, this was a pleasure
quite unexpected, that he little thought of seeing me
again so soon, and asked if I was not much displeased
at their intrusion at my father's.
I replied that I was very much hurt at the
impertinence
of lord D. as you call him.
I saw that you were hurt, which made me urge him
to depart. Indeed I objected to going in, but lord D.
seeing you by the light of the candle, which was burning
near you, whispered Do you see that, Warberton? by
the Lord I'll go in, I don't care who lives here.
I told Warberton I hoped I should never see him
again. I had not uttered the last word before lord D.
was in the room! and almost at the same instant the
servant
entered with tea. I took a cup, but my terror was
such at the sight of this hated man, that Warberton had
to take the cup out of my hand. I told him I believed
I would retire.
Miss Cary, favour us with your presence, said he,
you will get over this presently.
In the meantime lord D. had saluted the rest of the
family, and stepping up to where we were, accosted
Warberton thus:
By Gd Warberton you're in fine businessI
fancy
you'll cut me out with the parson's daughter.
Warberton's face kindled at this, and without
noticing
the vulgar observation, asked him if he should
have the pleasure of making him acquainted with his
uncle's
family? and introduced him very coldly; after
which he took his seat again by my side, and asked lord
D. how he was so fortunate as to find the way; adding
that his presence was a pleasure quite unexpected.
Why, he just came onsometimes he was right,
and sometimes he was wrong.Cursed fools don't know
one road from another--I might as well have asked for
the man in the moon, as to ask for Mount-pleasant, (the
name of Mr. Camel's seat.) I missed it only a few
miles.
Mr. Camel, hearing this, asked if he had dined
he had not, and a cold cheek was prepared for him in the
dining-room. I was glad to hear this, as I intended
once more to make my escape to my room. I observed
to Warberton that I would retire, and hoped he would
excuse me.
He remarked (which was very true) that it would be
almost impossible to avoid lord D. while he remained in
the neighbourhood, and it was as well to come to an
understanding
with him one time as anotherthat perhaps
he flattered himself too much, but if he did not he would
keep his seat, and if his lordship offered any
disrespectful
language to me, he would affront him.
I objected to this, alleging that it would involve him
in a quarrel with lord D. perhaps, which would render
me unhappy. The word escaped me inadvertently, nor
did it escape the notice of Warberton. But before he had
time to reply I said, I would be very sorry on account of
Mr. Camel's family, to whom I was under many
obligations
.
Make yourself easy, madam, said he, his
lordship
is no ways dangerous, I know him too well, and
he knows me full as well.
Lord D. having dined, returned to the parlour,
and throwing a sarcastic glance at Warberton, entered
into conversation with the elder Miss Camel. In short
in the course of an hour, getting up from his chair, he
approached Warberton, and accosted him with--
Well, Warberton, I was going to invite you to ride
home with me, but I suspect your inclination leads you
to stay where you are, and by heavens if I was in your
shoes I would not see Woodgrove to-night.
You can do as you please, my lord, said the other.
Why, to tell the truth I would be glad of your
company
,
it's so cursed lonesome, that is, I don't wish to
intrude
upon your time, Ned, or upon your pleasures, but
26*
I hate to go without you. Clark and I and the Steward
last night, no one else, Robertson and D. rode out in
the evening, they had not returned when I left home.
Well, order the horses, said Warberton, I'll
go.
While lord D. was absent, Warberton said he was
sorry to leave his uncle's that evening; but he would go
to get his lordship off, that he was the most unpleasant
acquaintance he hadhe found it impossible to shake
him off to-day, and see, he has followed me; if he had
any delicacy he would not have come here without an
invitation.
Their horses came, and they left Mr. Camel's, and
again I was glad and sorry.
They were hardly out of sight, when the Miss
Camels both observed they were glad they were
gone.
Why he's the greatest fool I ever saw, said
Lucretia
;
but come into our chamber, Martha, I have
something
to tell you.
I followed them into the room.
You have come in good time, Martha; I was going
to send for you to assist meI am afraid I will not be
ready in time. You must know that I am to be married
Thursday-week, and I wish you to assist me in getting
readyand you must be bride's-maid too.
I felt rather in a delicate situation, and was afraid I
had intruded: and told them candidly that I came up
to avoid Lord D. I knew that it was expected Miss
Camel would be married to a gentleman whom I had
often seen there, but had no idea that it was so near.
Yes, indeed, and I am very glad you came to-day.
Cousin Ned is going to stay till it is all over with me,
said she, laughing, and so let us get to work. I am
glad they are gone, as they would only have hindered
us.
I wrote to my father in the first place, and then
assisted
the ladies. All three sat down to sew; the old
lady was very busy arranging matters for the occasion.
We kept the little girl (Ann) to run errands for us, and
the old man amused us with funny stories.
Every one was employed, from the oldest to the
youngest. The girls did rally me a little about Cousin
Ned: but we were too busily, and too seriously engaged
to spend our time in jesting.
Hang that ugly lord, said Sarah. (the second
daughter
)
how impudent he looksdon't you hate him,
Martha
?
I told her I certainly had very little love for him.
And he talked so impudent to Cousin, said Ann,
when he was sitting by Miss Martha; I could have
slapped his jaws. He thinks because he's a lord, he can
talk bighe's nothing but a fool for all his gold lace. I
always thought a lord was some grand thingwhy, he
hasn't half as much sense as Cousin. If that be a lord,
keep lords from me.
Next morning, after breakfast, we had resumed our
work but a short time, before Warberton was
announced
.
Now he will hinder us, said Lucretia; I wish he
had staid away until I had my robe trimmed.
We won't admit him, said Ilet the old
gentleman
keep him company.
I had hardly said this, when Warberton stood in
the chamber door.
May I come in, ladies?
No, you must not, indeed Cousin, said Sarah,
pushing him out. But it was all in vain.
Why ladies, said he, you have a world of work
here, after saluting, and seating himself. I can sew
very well, give me a needle, I'll assist you, taking up
some of the work.
Get you goneI wonder how you come to find us
out, said Sarah.
The old gentleman, who had been listening all the
while, now bolted in, laughing. Why it was all my
doings, girls; I sent himI wouldn't have missed the
fun for a crown.
In short, Wharberton remained there the whole
week, the most of his time in our company. None of us
enquired after lord D, but little Ann; she asked
how he was, and what he said?
Warberton answered that he was well, and very
much pleased with his new acquaintances.
It's more than we are of him, then, said Ann; I'll
bet my life pa invites him to sister's wedding, and that's
just what he came for.
When we completed our work, which we did in five
days. I was forced to go home. I had clothes suitable
for the occasion, but not dreaming of such a thing, I
brought nothing but a few ordinary dresses from home.
There was the carriage, said Mrs. Camel, Sarah
can go with you, and Ned will escort: he will go with
pleasure. I dare say. You can set out early in the
morning
I'll
have an early breakfast, and you can return by
dinner; you will have no time to lose, for I dare say
when you come to look, you will have many things to fix
too. This was Tuesday evening.
I did not approve the plan altogether, as I thought
it might not please my father, to see me so young as I
was (only seventeen) so familiar with a stranger;
however
,
I made no objection, and we set out accordingly.
When I arrived at home, I had to introduce War,
berton of course, to my father, and retiring to my
chamber
with Sarah, procured such things as I wanted, and
was ready to return to Mr. Camel's in less than an hour.
While I had been engaged in the chamber, my father
in a conversation he had with Warberton, discovered he
was the son of an old school-fellow of his youthful days,
and here was great joy at the discovery; but Sarah and
I broke in upon it, alleging there was no time to spare,
they would see each other againfor my father was to
ride his poney up at his leisure the same evening, as he
was to marry Miss Camel.
We returned in time for dinner, and every thing
was got ready for the occasion, and as little Ann had
foretold, lord D was invited, together with several
gentlemen who came with him from London, and some
from the neighbourhood, about twelve or thirteen in all,
and as many ladies, all strangers to me. Warberton
and myself were the attendants on the bride.After the
ceremony, dinner, &c. was over, we all stood up to
dance; lord D desired me for a partner, I was
engaged
of course to Warberton.
By Gd, he is a dn clever fellow.
He said this, though not intentionally, in
Warberton's
hearing.
Not quite so clever as your lordship, but I am clever
enough to support my privilege, said Warberton. No
reply was made, and the dance commenced, my lord
providing
himself with a partner from among the guests.
My feelings were much wounded in the course of the
evening, by the females of the party`who is she?' `who
is she?' some would ask. `O, she is nothing but old
parson Cary's daughter.'`Humph!' another would say,
`she gives herself a great many airs, to be-sure: I
wonder
at the Camels for inviting the poor thing, she will
only expose herself.'
This was heard both by Warberton and myselfI
was very near bursting into tears, made several
blunders
in the dance, and would have made a great many
more, had it not been for my partner, who saw my
confusion
,
and knowing the cause, engaged me in
conversation
.
I suppose I must tell the whole truth? said Mrs.
Cary, at this part of her story.
Yes, indeed madam, said Mary, I know you have
slipped over a great deal already, that I would much
rather have heard than that which you have told, for I
am sure that lieutenant must have said many handsome
things to you while you were in the carriage together,
and during the five days you spent at Mrs Camel's.
Oh, its so long ago that I have forgotten, Mary.
She resumed
While the ladies were indulging in their ill-natured
remarks, the gentlemen were engaged in those of a
different
sort`I'll swear she is an angel!'`is she that
old man's daughter? why, I have been at his church often,
I never saw any one but himself, I thought he was an old
bachelor?'`Oh, she was at school all her life, she was
never at home.'`Who is that partner of hers?
good-looking
fellow, they are in love with each other, I'll bet
my salvation'`And I'll go you halves,' said another;
`but they had better have been asleep, for he will soon
be ordered to the East Indies, so I understand from his
superiors: and then I suspect, the divine creature will
grieve herself to death.'
When we finished the set, I was glad you may be
sureI said I was not well, and would walk into the
dining-room for air; Warberton led me thither, and
persuaded
me to try a glass of wine. Whilst we remained
there, what I had expected took placethat was, that
he declared
He was your devoted admirer, said Mary, for
you will never get it out yourselfnow go on.
It was something like it, said Mrs. Cary, and
resumed
,
To be brief, I danced no more that night. I
returned
,
however, to the ball-room, and continued there about
an hour, with feelings none of the pleasantest. Lord
D seeing me disengaged, approached, enquiring
after
my health, and `would I honour him with my
company
the next set?' and abundance of stuff.
My replies were all short, cold, and decisive. He
turned off from me much displeased, and I continued to
look on for some time, when making an apology to Mrs.
Camel, I retired alone to my chamber, where I
remained
until the company broke up.
I should have been glad to have returned home the
next day, but the family would by no means consent.
The following day, however, I would go home: my
father
had returned the next after the wedding.
Mrs. Chambers, (Miss Camel that was.) said, we
will have an early dinner, and see you safe home.
After dinner, Mrs. Chambers, Sarah, and myself
got into the carriage, Mr. Chambers and Warberton on
horseback, and thus accompanied I reached home. The
ladies would not alight, fearing it would be late, and as
soon as Warberton assisted me out of the carriage, they
returned, and I determined not to leave home shortly.
I was very low-spirited all the evening.
The East Indies ran in your head, said Mary.
Mrs. Cary resumed
A great many things ran in my head, and that
amongst the rest. A little after dusk, just as I was
thinking of going to bed, who should knock at the door
but lord D, he made a great many apologies, he had
been a hunting and thought the parson was alone, called
to chat awhile, told my father he had never been to see
him yet. I arose and went to my chamber, without a
word of apology, and went to bed. He had no
attendant
whatever.
Next day about ten o'clock Warberton came. After
some conversation between him and my father, he told
me he was going to London, and could not depart
without
coming to take leave; he said a great deal more, for
he spent the day there.
Next morning, however, he set out for London. When
he was about to depart, I requested him, as he was going
by lord D's. to take him back with him to London, and
informed him of his intrusion the preceding evening.
He replied, that if it would give me pleasure, he
would be happy to comply with my request.
He inforded me he would return in the course of two
weeks, that his honour was pledged to return by a
certain
time to London, or he would not have left his uncles'
so soon.
The two weeks passed, and two weeks more, without
my seeing Warberton. Meanwhile, my father
suspecting
an attachment, I confessed the truth. He was
certainly
the tenderest of parents, or it would have gone much
harder with me than it did.
Instead of chiding as most parents would have done,
he endeavoured to sooth and comfort me.
Lord D. still remained at his seat, or galloping over
the country, rather, with his hounds and his hunting, to
the great annoyance of the poor.
He would often call at my father's, and try to draw me
into conversation, which I repelled with the utmost
disdain
.
One morning however, he called and asked me if
I had heard from Warberton since he went to London?
I answered I had not. He has gone to the East Indies,
said he His company was ordered there last week
poor Warberton, he is a good soul, but he will hardly
live to returnthe climate there makes great havoc of
our people.
After he uttered this speech, which nearly annihilated
me, he looked me in my face to see how I bore the news,
with a brutal triumph, and shortly left the house.
Although Warberton had never hinted any thing of
the sort to me, yet upon revolving every circumstance
in my mind. I concluded that it must he true, and
probably
he had not heard of his destination when he left our
neighbourhood; but that he should quit the country
without letting us know, without writing, was
unaccountable
!
You will all guess how I felt upon hearing
this intelligence.
My father was alarmed for my situation, and strove
by every argument in his power to reconcile me,
remarking
what he had always done, that this was a world of
sorrow, and begged of me to be patient, and resigned to
the will of my maker.
I think it was a week after hearing this news, my
father
and myself had been sitting up reading, the clock
had struck ninemy father had laid down his book and
glasses.
Old Margaret had a wine posset sitting by the fire
for him to drink upon lying down, as he complained of a
cold.
Lord D. (our daily visitor, the clerk informed us) set
out for London, perhaps the next day from that on which
he communicated the unpleasant news.
Old Margaret having arranged every thing for the
night, was in the act of pulling off my father's stockings,
and I had set off to my chamber, when a bold wrap at
the door alarmed us. The door was opened by
Margaret
,
and Warberton entered!
He apologized for intruding, and said that he
arrived
late at the next village, where he had left his
horses, and walked across the fields afoot, being
anxious
to know how we were.
My father observed, when you entered the house, I
could'nt tell whether it was you or your ghost, as we
heard you had sailed to the Indies.
He replied that he came very near it, but I suspect
you received a letter (addressing himself to me) which
explained my situation.
No I received no letter, said I. He was amazed.
No letter!
No.
Well that exceeds all the rest! he exclamed, and
seemed for some time lost in thought.
At length he resumed, as it is late, I will return to the
village, and call in the morning.
My father objected, telling him he would send Daniel
to see about his horsehe must be tired, and must tarry
all night.Go, said my father to Margaret, and
prepare
supper.
He had supped at the tavern, and expressed something
about giving trouble.
Make yourself happy, said my father, we are lonesome
the obligation will be on our side, and he consented to
stay.
Margaret was desired to prepare a bed, and he retired
to his chamber, and I to mine.
Next morning he gave us the following account:
When I went to London, I was surprised to find
the regiment to which I belonged, under marching
orders to the East Indies. The Colonel of my regiment,
had changed places with another Colonel, who with his
regiment were actually ordered to the East Indies
before
my visit to see my uncle Camel; and this new
arrangement
,
had just taken place the day before my
arrival
in the city.
I sought my Colonel, and remonstrated against
such proceeding, saying I would resign rather than
go.
He advised me to get a man to take my placethat
several of the officers had already done sohe would aid
me with his interest, and perhaps for a small sum, I
might prevail on some of the officers, then under him, to
take my place. Money, he said, he had not, but he would
do any thing else in his power.
I went to my new Colonel, and obtained a parole for
a week or ten days. I found great difficulty in
obtaining
this leave, it took up several days.
I had a maiden aunt in the cuntry, who was very fond
of me, and as she, I knew, could assist me though very
covetous; yet I expected, rather than see me go to the
27
East Indies, she would advance me a small sum, which
she did. She gave me five hundred pounds, and I
returned
.
My old Colonel and myself next thing obtained a
man, or at least his promise, to go in my stead, for
which I was to give him three hundred pounds. Then he
set sail. It was after this arrangement I wrote to you.
I waited on my new Colonel, and gave him to
understand
my determination not to march with the
regiment
,
and that I had provided a person to take my place.
He replied, that I ought not to be quite so sure; he
didn't think he could let me off.
In short, after much perplexity and trouble, I sold
my commission, and have bid adieu to the army.
Before I left London, however, I learned that lord
D. was at the bottom of the whole, and it has been
through his means, no doubt, that the letter has been
purloined; for he was base enough to bribe my servant
in cases of equal turpitude. Warberton finished his
story, and many others, which it is needless to dwell on:
and waving other particulars, we were married not long
afterwards, resolving to encounter every difficulty.
We, however, had prospects on both sides;
Warberton
expected to inherit the property of his old covetous
aunt already named, which he didand my father had
expectations of a similar sort from an uncle of his, who
lived in Boston, a very old man and a very great miser:
he was his grand-uncle, had never been married, and
would not have given a dollar from all accounts, to have
saved the lives of a whole parish.
We lived with my father, though Warberton rented
a small piece of ground, which he would often cultivate
himself, while I would sit under a shade hard by. In
the course of a year I was the mother of a beautiful
boy. Here she became extremely affected. When
he was about a year old, which was nearly two years
after our marriage, my husband's aunt died, and
left him, exclusive of some trifling legacies, the whole of
her estate: which though not more than half as much as
he had conjectured, amounted (furniture and all) to eleven
hundred peunds, but we owed nearly half of the sum.
However, in about six months the old miser in
Boston
died, and my father understood by letter, that he had
bequeathed him two valuable houses, a large quantity of
goods, and ten thousand dollars in cash. Here again
we were disappointed; we had expected three times as
muchbut he had thought proper to endow public
institutions
with it.
My father and my husband now concluded to remove
to the United States as quick as possible, and pursue the
mercantile business there without delay. It was settled
that my father should go, as the heir, and take
possession
of the property in America, and my husband and I
could follow as soon as we could make final
arrangements
for quitting England forever. This was in the
fall, and we determined to sail in the spring.
Accordingly, my father left England and arrived
safe in Boston. We set sail in March following, and
had a favourable voyage until we arrived at
Newfoundland
,
when a dreadful storm arose, in which the ship
and cargo was lost, and only four persons escaped.
Had we taken to the boat at the beginning of the
tempest, I am of the opinion we could all have been
saved
,
as we were not far from land; but the captain
thought there was no danger, when the ship in an instant
of time, was dashed to pieces. The boat, however, was
got into the water, and my husband ran to give the child
out of his hands to assist me into the boat, and I never
saw him since. The moment he left me, a sailor caught me
by the arm and cried out, `bear a hand here,' and
assisted
by another he lifted me into the boat, and jumped in
at the same instant with three others, when the boat was
swept from the ship by a wave mountain-high, before
another soul got in, and the last I heard of the ship was
that she was going down.
The second wave, however, dashed the boat against
a rock, shivered it to pieces, and we gave ourselves up
for lost. I caught hold of one of the sailors, as he says,
though I remember nothing of it, and begged of him
not to leave me: for they had seen a light as they
thought, while they were taking breath, and the next
wave swept them from the boat and threw them on the
shoreI held fast to the man, I first caught hold of, and
the generous creature never offered to disengage me;
four of us only escaped, one, if there was one, was
drowned. We were hospitably entertained by the
people
of the island, who lived in wretched hovels, and had
very few of the comforts of life.
About six o'clock in the morning, the wind ceased,
and these people ventured out to see what discovery they
could make. They were out all day; when they
returned
,
what I related was confirmed. They saw
nothing
but a few spars of the ship floating on the surface of
the water.
I spent two days on the Island, and during the time,
the kindness I received from the man who saved my life,
was never exceeded.
I was in every respect an object of pity, it being
but a short time after that calamity, before I had
Martha
.
We now set sail for Bostonmy kind friend whom
I wished to reward, attended me thither. In the
meantime
,
my father had received news, that the Phnix
[13]
[13]
The name of our ship.
was
wrecked, and every soul lost. You may guess his joy
at our meetinghe devoted all his attention to me.
Being very ill when I landed, three of the best
physicians
in the place attended me night and day.Martha
was born the sixth day after I landed.
I recovered very slow, it was six or seven weeks
before
I left my chamber.
My father wrote often to St. Johns' to enquire about
the fate of the Phenix. All the intelligence he obtained,
was that the whole was lost. Being bereaved of my
husband and son, I resumed the name of Cary.
My father never enjoyed his health after he came to
America. I shall always think, that the shock he
received
at the news of our having perished at sea, was
ultimately
the cause of his death.
He lamented deeply the death of my husband, and
still more his little Cyrus, which was my son.
The business of a merchant, required more
application
than he was able to bestow; and besides, he was
involved in a vexacious law suit, on account of some
claim against the estate he inherited. At length he
sold out his stock, and quit the business of merchant.
It was with infinite grief, I saw him gradually
sinking
to the grave, which he did in about six years after
he came to the United States.
Meanwhile, the law suit was still pending, nor was
it determined until about four years since, when it went
against my father's estate, though I have all the reason
in the world to believe, that had justice been done, and
the proper attention been paid to it, he would have
proved
successful.
I was now thrown poor, and destitute, on a pitiless
world. I had bestowed on Martha, the best education
the country affordedmy whole attention had been
devoted
to her.
We were now stripped almost of every thing. I had
to give up the house; what money I had, was spent in
defending the suit, and the property hardly paid the cost.
Martha and I, had our clothes and jewels, and about
fifty or sixty dollars in cash; we were however blessed
with health, and bore the misfortune better than might
be expected.
I rented a small house, and Betsey Watson, whom
I had almost reared in my family, Martha, and myself,
took in work, and maintained ourselves comfortably, and
in this humble situation it was Mary, that fortune and
my son, as I may now call him, brought you to my
home.
Mrs. Cary having finished her narrative, Mary, as
though she wished to dispel the melancholy impressions
it occasioned, observed, You forgot to tell us, madam,
what lord D. said, and how he behaved, when his
treacherous
plan was defeatedof all things I should like to
have seen him then.
His disappointment was a complete triumph.
Mrs. Cary replied, I never heard, but lord D. was
a notorious cowardWarberton had saved him from
being
caned, a few days only prior to their visit to
Woodgrove
,
by taking up the quarrel himself; and although
he was convinced to a certainty that lord D. and no
other
,
27*
was the principal in promoting the alteration in the
arrangement of the armyhe never resented it, at least
to my knowledge, as in the first place he conceived lord
D. beneath his notice, and in the second place it would
have displeased my father.
Thus ended Mrs. Cary's narrative of her eventful
life. It was evident from her modesty and extreme
sensibility, she suppressed those parts of it which would
have rendered it more entertaining. It was, however,
very moving, and frequently drew tears from
some
of us
we were silent several minutes, when it was
interrupted
by my uncle, who fetching a deep sigh, said
Let's have some winethese seas have been a sore
scourge to us allalbeit it seems as 'twere ordained.
'Didn't think any body so bereav'd as myself
I broke in upon him here, by telling Jinkins he must
entertain us, agreeably to promise, the next evening with
the particulars of his life.
Ah, said my uncle, Dick 'll have to get me to
help him out wi' his story.
CHAPTER XXIX.
The
following evening, after supper, we reminded
Jinkins of his promise. He replied as follows:
It was true enough what the Commodore observed,
that he knew nothing at all of the particulars of his life,
but what were equally or better known to him.
I told thee I'd have to lend a handthee shall
promise
a heap o' thingsNow I have got the weather-gage
such as that Algerin' story, thee always flies to, said
he, smiling.
Well, well, be it so, said Jinkins, tell the
company
what you know.
Why, first thing as I knows about 'um, 'was a little
urchin, 'board a shipI was settin' talkin' in the cabin
with some o' the menthat, I believe was on a voyage
to the East Indies, so we were talkin', and drinkin' our
wine, when hark! we hears a child cry'never was
more astonishedrung for the Steward, what do I hear,
comrade? be there a child below? sure there's no women
aboard.
There's no women aboard, said the boy.
But there be's a child.How comes that?
It is Jack Jinkins' child.
That's a clever thingit were to be dinged with
the noise o' children. Say he must come hither, and gi'
an account o' himselfsoon come, walkin' slow, afeard,
d'ye see, 'was leading a little child by the hand. The
tears was running down itscheeks. I took it in my
lap, and wiped its face wi' my handkerchiefit was
soothed, looked up in my face and said pa, and smiled so
coaxin', d'ye see, that 'forgot I was to a been mad with
Jack for bringin' it aboard.
But what be ye doin' wi' the child, and where be its
mother? thinkin' 'twas his own, and that he had slipped
her aboard unknown to me.
Why drowned; sure I told your honour the whole
crew were lost, but myself and the child. I hated to tell
ye about as how 'was takin' it to England, and thought
your honour would oppose it.
And how be ye goin' to take him to England, when
we're on our way to the Indies?
Then suppose, your honour, we never meets a ship
to thae parts.
But why do 'send it to England?
Because as how its relations live there, and they ha'
the best right to be bothered wi' it
And who do'st think would be troubled wi' thy
brats?
It's none of mine, sureI told you who its father
and mother was.
'Got so mad, 'told him if 'come athawrt him 'would
shiver his upper worksordered him out o' my sight,
'cause he couldn't come by the truth. So it passed on;
but as 'was saying, my heart warmed to the child, and
'twas a fine little rogue tooSambo nursed it and took
care on't, and it prattled and would climb on my knee;
it was glad to be where it could see the lightso I makes
a mighty pet on't, 'twould sleep in my bosom, 'twas a
mischievous little dog too, it was clean spoiled, never
stir, we had a monkey aboard, and atween it and the
monkey 'was always complaints o' pranks or one mishap
or another, 'think it couldn't be less than a score o'
china
cups and them sort o' things broke wi' it every day.
Thee may well laugh, said my uncle, seeing Jinkins
unable to resist it any longer.
Why did you let me be so bad then? why did you
not give me the cat?
Ah, thee knows 'wouldn't a hit thee, Dick for the
world. Well, it all passed on in this here sort o' way:
made several voyages, always took him along, 'would
a'cried himself to death to a'been left behind see, and
Sambo had a liking for it, but 'thought how't must have
some learning and like o' that, how was't to be come at.
Wouldn't agree to part wi' me, thee minds that, can't
ye? to Jinkins.
Yes sir, I mind thatI was a very bad boy when
you plead with me to stay in England, and gave me a
horse and a gold watch, to hire me to go to school.
Just so, 'wouldn't a'stayed for all the horses and
watches in Christendomand what do'st do, but takes
a man aboard to learn him to read and write, and he
took to it himself, after that 'had no trouble wi' him,
'got ashamed and got books and learned French, and all
them sort o' things'dare say he's as high learned as
the best o' 'um. But I tell'ee what, Dick's spunk,
'understands
the main tack, try him who will, never see'd
the likeif he didn't take up a quarrel when 'was but a
lad, that took place 'tween a great hulk o' a fellow ('twas
big enough to swallow him) and me: the fellow talk't
impudent to me, and zucks, if Dick didn't light upon
like a gull, and made him strike in a twinkling; and
another time, when 'was coming home wi' a rich cargo,
my fellows mutinied and 'was laying a plan, d'ye-see, to
murder me and some o' them that they knew would be
for me: he was but a bit o' a boy, but so it was, he
happened
to get wind o' it and come straight and told me.
Yes, Dick's spunk, though 'wouldn't find it out by him;
now thee may tell all that thee knows.
Before Jinkins had time to reply, the landlord
entered
,
ushering a man whom from his dress I took to be a
sailor, saying as he introduced him, here is a man who
wishes to see you, Captain Burlington.
Why, if it bean't Jack, as I live, said my uncle,
giving him a shake of the handjust talking about
thee, old swab.
The stranger then saluted Jinkins, to whom and my
uncle he appeared well known. He was then presented
to the company by the name of Jinkins, and almost the
first word my uncle addressed to him was,
Did'ee find him? was it the same?
Yes, your honour, for that matter, I found him.
Charles, give him something to wet his pipes, he's
as good a tar, he's the fellow that saved Jinkins, you'll
hear now.
After drinking a glass of rum, (he would not touch
wine) he continued.
Yes, I found him out.
And what dids't do with him?
I did nothing with himwhat could I do? I couldn't
prove that he stole the money, though I could swore to
itthat is, I could swear as how no one
else
could have
took itbut the justices, whatever they be, said that
was no evidence.
And so thee did nothing by thy long voyage?
No, nothing at all.
And where did thee leave him?
I left him just where I found him, in Halifax.
And art thee sure 'twas the same tar?
To be-sure I amisn't here the self-same
pocket-book
that the money was in? I made him give it up to
me, after drinking friends at a tavern, said Jinkins,
pulling out a pocket-book as he spoke.
I told him now I am sorry for that shipmate, to go
back for the young man's sake, he will expect me to
bring him some news, and here I am broke up.
Why, the money, I thought, says he, was your own?
Curse the money, says II don't care a rope's-end
about the money, it is the pocket-book and the papers that
was in it I want: and so he made me give him the word of
a sailor, and that you know is sacred, not to hurt or harm
him, and so he took me to his lodging, and gave me the
pocket-book, and here it isit's the very same, I knew
it the moment I saw it, though the scape-gallows has
greased and bedaubed it so, but I don't think you'll make
head or tail of the contents, (opening it) though he said
there's the same papers, handing the whole to young
Jinkins.
The pocket-book proved to be Warberton's! Here
was another of the indescribable scenes.
Notwithstanding all Dick's heroism, it was some time
before he could ask the elder JinkinsMy father, you
say, gave you this?
Yes.
Jinkins then looked at Mrs. Cary, as if to prepare her
for what was to follow.
What was the name of the ship?
The Phnix, Captain Broomfield, answered the
elder Jinkins.
Dick then advanced to Mrs. Cary, and thus
addressed
her:
These are your husband's papers, madam, and I
must be your son!
She uttered a shriek, and rushed into his arms.He
held her some time to his breast, while Martha petrified
with amazement, was waiting to embrace her brother.
Every one present was mute with astonishment.
I give you joy, said I, going up to Mrs. Cary, and
taking her hand. The rest followed my example.
After mutual congratulations, the elder Jinkins was
desired to explain. He in the first place, desired an
explanation
on his part, his astonishment being greater
than ours.
He asked Mrs. Cary if she was on board the Ph
nix when she was wrecked?
She replied in the affirmative.
How were you saved? said he.
She informed him as already related.
I don't see into it, said Jack, musing, and I saw
the boat, said he, but did not see you in it, but you
might, for it was all hurly-burley: but the boat was
overwhelmed in the sea.
Yes indeed, it was split to pieces in a short time
after
I entered it: but by a miracle, I and three others
were thrown on the shore. But, dear sir, do tell me
how you and my son were saved?
Why, when the ship split, when it made that great
crack just as they were getting out the boat, a
gentleman
I had often seen on deck came to me, with a child in
his arms, and says, `here, friend, save my child, and
take all that's in this,' handing a pocket-book, which is
this same that I brought here to-night. When he said
this, he said he `must go down for his wife,' and I never
saw him afterwards, for the ship went to pieces before
you could say Jack Robinson.
I took the pocket-book and stuffed it in my bosom,
not that I cared for the money, and holding the child
with one arm, I tied myself fast with a rope to one of
the spars, and wave after wave rolled over poor Dick
and I. The most of the crew went to the bottom at
once, and the rest were soon swept from the wreck. I
heard the cries of those in the boat, and all on a sudden
it ceased. I thought all was lost; the wind and the
waves whirled me in a trice, God knows where; some
times under water and sometimes out: but as he would
have it, I still kept hold of Dick until day-light, when a
New York trader took us in, it being calm. And what
became of your husband?
He was drowned.
Yes, I thought as much, and I couldn't have stood
it much longerwas high dropping off, when I was
discovered
.
Well, well, said he, thoughtfully, and so
you are my Dick's mother, if that don't beat the
mermaid
.
Go on and tell the lady the balance of the story,
said my uncle, we was just speakin' o' it before
thee come in.
Why there is no more about it, I went to Havana.
You engaged me to go with you to the East Indies, and
you had like to have give me a basting about taking the
child aboard; but I knew when you found out that I
had it aboard, your heart was so tender, you would
befriend
it, when you came to know it was a poor little
motherless babe.
Why t' d I don't thee haul thy wind, and tell about
the money, and the man that stole it.
Why your honour, the man stole the money, and
there was the last of it.
Humph, said my uncle, peevishly.
And did you lose the money, said Mrs. Cary,
after all your trouble?
No, indeed madamI went as I tell you to
Havana
,
I was acquainted with his honour here, and thought
he would want me about that time. I had been to
England
.As
he said he would'nt sail for two or three
months, and a'body hates idleness, and so I got good
wages, and went, and there I was engaged by the
captain
of the Phenix; very well, I wanted to return any
how, he gave me good wages too, but had high proved a
dear bargain to me, in the long run. So as I was
saying
,
I went to Havana, and one of the cursed crew of the
sailors, belonged to the ship that took me and little Dick
(as, I called him) in, stole my pocket-book, and all that
was in it, and cleared himself, and I never heard a breath
of him from that day to this, until I lauded here this fall,
with his honour the captain, here, when meeting with
an old mesmate, he told me as Clark (that was his name)
was in Halitax, and so to please his honour, and Dick
being old voyager, I have just been to see him.
"He was an ungenerous dog that's to a certainty.
After
giving him, and every one of them a crown a piece,
and that was more than I got myself; but it's all one,
I shall never miss it, his honour and Dick will never
forsake
old Jack."
"And how did it happen that you called him "
Jinkins
"?
said Mrs, Gary, " did you riot discover my
husband's
name on the papers ?"
"To tell God's truth, I never saw the papers. and I
could'nt read if I had. But as I was saying, I was in a
bad trim, when the trader took us in, and was as you
may say, all one as dead, that day and he next, and could
give no accoung of myself. And when I got the use of
my speech, and revived a little, I told all about the
disaster,
and being told the trader was bound to Havana,
the very place I wished to go. I made myself easy,
thinking
to get some body, when I landed, to look into the
matter, and send the child to its friends, if they could be
heard of. But the very day we landed, the thief stole the
pocket-book. So I spliced my own name to the child,
and called him Dick, after a brother of mine--and I
believe
he ,just did as well, don't you think so Dick?"
"I do sir, I shall always be proud of the name, and
still more of him who gave it to me."
This brought the tear in Jacks eye--he wiped it
hastily. and resumed,--
"But I am glad you have found your mother, child--
It's more than I ever expected, for you know I always
t
old you that the whole ship's crew was drowned."
My uncle finding he had done, went on, "this that
Jack has, just told, is what Dick was going to tell
himseIf,
as 'could remember it better, for 'never paid much
heed to it.--Has thee had thy supper? said my uncle
to Jack.
"No sir, I was in such a hurry to see you, that I
never waited for any thing."
"Well take another glass o' the rum, and go get thee,
just it, there, the same one 'it come in with'ee."
"May be he'll not like to supper such a sailor-looking'
fellow as I."
If he says a word o' haarm to thee I'll give him my
cane, seem as well as ever 'had om, in his life."
"Why Ling, do you know me ?"
Ling went to him, and wagged his tail." his tail.
When Jack left us, all sat silent. It was the first
time, since we had met, that none of us could find any
thing to say; each seemed to doubt his senses. Mrs.
Cary, and her son, eyed each other like; two bashful
lovers.
Martha looked at him also, though the tear of
sensibility
.
would in spite of her white handkerchief, hold
its destined place. Mary's mirth had forsaken her.
Wilson
.
after some time, said, "this was a year prolific in
wonders, and said he would never be surprised at any
tiring after this."
I asked Mrs. Cary. "if she had never discovered any
resemblance of her husband in her son?"
She replied, "I did sir, and a very striking one, and
had often been upon the point of asking him about his
parents; and to tell the tyruth, I began to hope this
evening
from the incidents of his childhood, and yet
circumstances
were so strong against me, that it appeared a mere
chimera; but though I kept it to myself, I always
thought he resembled his father. My husband was
rather
taller, but their features are very near the same."
My uncle with some thing like conscious pride,
observed
"that Dick was a strim a las as you'll find atween
stem and stern."
"What will you do now, uncle," said I, "you and
Mrs. Cary, you will be obliged to unite, as you are not
I suspect willing to resign Jinking, and Mrs. Cary
will not agree to give him up, I can't see what's to be
done, unless you two marry, as he is a joing property."
"You are a topping fellow for making matches," said
Jinkins."
"And here is Martha, and Fredinand too,in which
you are alike interested--your children, are her
children,
and her children are your's--why you are almost
man and wife, without the least trouble to yourselves."
I was afraid to look at Mrs. Cary, after risking so
much, but seeming as if my uncle was my exclusive
object,
I looked at him for a reply.
The old gentleman was by no means unpleased. He
replied, "Would'ent have' to marry the lady see,
without
she be's willing."
All my efforts, however, to rally the spirits of the
company failed. Wilson did make out to say. as lie
seemed
to awake from a long reverie, "I think we had better
be setting off for home Mary, for if we stay here much
longer, some mermaid from the deep may claim me for
her swain."
I just at that moment thought of Betsey, and turning
toward her, "well Miss Watson," I said, "what do
you think of this world ? are you not afraid the fairies
will carry you off in some of their packs, one of these
nights?"
"I appear to be in a fairy land, said sire, "but I say
my prayers every night; and my grand-mother always
told me, that the evil spirits would have no power over
me, if I said my prayers."
"But if it should chance to be such a fairy as Jinkins
or myself, Madam, for it happens that to close this
tragic,
comic, magazine of wonders, there must be two more
weddings. But waving the subject for the present,
Betsey, suppose you amuse us the balance of the evening,
with the events of your life. It will, I dare say, confer
a favour on us all, and myself in particular."
She replied that, "like Mr. Jinkins, she would be
obliged to refer to another, for she remembered nothing
of her parents--that her friend Mrs. Cary, who had
always
treated her as her own child, was at liberty to
indulge
my curiosity, and was much more capable--that
her life independently of the incidents in which Mrs.
Cary
was involved herself', with which you are already
acquainted
.
would yield very little amusement."
Mrs. Cary being thus appealed to, began as follows
"Miss Watson's mother was a widlow, and being a
near neighbour to me, when I first settled in America,
became one of my first aquaintances ; she came to see
me on the day I landed in Boston. I was at that time as
distressed a being as ever existed, being afflicted both in
body and mind, and Mrs. Watson being a woman of
great humanity and feeling, sympathized with me, and
endeavoured by the kindest attention, and the most
endearing
language to comfort me. She spent her time
chiefly in my room, and I seemed lost when slre would
leave me but fore a moment, to attend to tier household
affairs.
"She had lost her husband six months only before my
arrival, and in the same instant almost she became a
mother. She never had but one child, which is Betsey,
who was then only six months old, which makes her six
months older than Martha. The similarity of our
misfortunes
led to a friendship which will last to the end of
our lives. Mrs. Watson had been genteely reared, but
was in low circumstances; she had married against the
consent of her parents, and they gave her nothing.
"They were both dead, however, prior to my
acquaintance
with her, and she was to have received something at
their death: but her brother, as she informed me,
defrauded
her out of it. Finally, I persuaded her to break
up house-keeping and live with me: we were both lonely,
and never happy but when we were together--I was rich,
in comparison with her, who in the end became soleIy
dependent on me for support.
"At the end of three years, she was taken down on a
bed of sickness and lingered about four months and some
days, and died--leaving Betsey to me. With respect
to her child, she said she had no fears; she died happy,
in the full assurance, that I would be a mother to her. I
was much affected at her death, and have never seen a
person, that is a stranger, either before or since for
whom I had so strong an attachment. And as to
Betsey
.
I might, but I don't think I ever made any
difference
between her and Martha--I sent her to the same
school, nor was one taught more, than the other.
"When I was turned nut of house and home, I told
Betsey that I could no longer support her, it was true, as
she had hitherto lived: but if she would share my
adversity
.
as she had my prosperity, I would still be a
mother to her--but left it to her option to stay or go
elsewhere
she thought she could do better. Sihe said
nothing
would induce her to leave me; indeed, she was much
hurt that I mentioned the subject to her. But, poor
child--"
"Ah, that's enough, mother," said Martha, "we are
all happy now, so let us be thankful, instead of
murmuring
.
I observed to them, upon retiring, "that I should set
out for New-York probably in two days. and should be
glad if any of them felt disposed for a jaunt, to have the
pleasure of their company."
No one accepted the invitation, but Jinkins. He
looked at his mother first, and then at my uncle, with
one of those fascinating smiles, which he never wants,
and observed, that
"He would willingly accompany me, if lie could get
the consent of iris father and mother."
Mrs. Cary blushed, and replied "that as she never
had any controul over him, she would exercise none."
The Commodore said, "I hates for thee to be away,
'is such a cunning dog, keeps one in heart."
"I am sure you have friends enough here to amuse
you: you can play whist with Wilson for a partner, you
can treat Ferdinand and Mary, and when tired of that,
you can beguile my mother into matrimony, by relating
some of your by-past achievements Surprising you
should always want me hanging about you."
"Pshaw! pshaw! quit thee nonsense, Dick--but 'spose
'must go. But I'll not forget thy impudence a whit 'less
o' that, talking so to thy mother--'is a saucy fellow,
madam--he be indeed."
"Oh," said Mrs. Cary, "he is only jesting, sir, to
make us old folks laugh: he means no disrespect.''
Jinkins and I retired to our room shortly after this,
taking old,Jack with us to lull us to sleep with his sea.
adventures.
Next morning I waited on Hunter, to know his
commands
,
to New-York. He gave me a, letter to his wife,
and one to his father: and the following day,
accompanied
by Jinkins, Iset out to New-York.
CHAPTER XXX.
THE first person I visited in New-York, was Doctor
N--, and enquired for Mrs. Hunter.
"She was not perfectly well," he said, "but would
be in a few days."
As every minute seemed an age, which detained me
from Clarissa, I hastened to her house. After enquiring
how she was, I told lrer my name was Burlington, and
was glad to find her so well.
She attempted to speak, but utterance failed her: I
sat by her side, with her hand in mine, but remained
siIent
until tire first burst of feelings had subsided.
When she became a little composed, I told her "to be
comforted: I came to make her happy, and assist her, by
every means in my power."
Still she essayed to speak, but still she faultered. At
length she said,
"I was going to thank you, Mr. Burlington: I was
going to say how sorry I am for my conduct to your
sister
,
but I see it would not be areeable to vou."
"Dear madam, say nothing about it; Mary forgives
you, and so do I from my heart; Mary is happy and
independent
.
But excuse me, I have heard of your
husband
,
and have a letter from him to you--the repents
sincerely
his conduct towards you: meantime I suspect his
father is in this city, I have a letter for him, likewise,
from his son.''
Having said this, I left her and returned to the inn,
where I had left Jinkins, and taking him with me, we
walked to Mr. L's. to enquire for Hunter; he gave us
directions to his lodgings.
Handing Hunter the letter, I retired with Jinkins
until
he should have, read it. I then confided to Jinkins
that tire unfortunate man he and I befriended in the
street, was Hunter's son.
When we supposed Hunter had finished reading the
letter. we returned and asked him "What news?"
He replied, "the letter contained nothing but what he
suspected I knew ; he refers me to you."
I took the letter out of his hand; it ran thus:--
"
Dear Father
--
"This will be handed to you lay Mr. Burlington;
he found me in the streets, starving for bread, and
almost
destitute of clothes. He took the to his lodgings,
gave me money and clothes, and by his bounty I am now
supported. I have a wife that is suffering too, of
sickness
and want. If you ever intend to give me any thing,
I should think now is the time : I acknowledge my faults.
and crave your pardon. Your repentant son.
W. HUNTER."
Hunter asked "where his son's wife was?"
"She is in this city."
Having replied to his question, I ran over the
principal
incidents of their elopement, marriage, and her
subsequent
distress, concealing the worst.
Hunter was much mortified, and said very little.'
After
giving him directions to her house, I called on the
McCallesters, who informed me Horton had arrived : as
his establishment was a matter by no means to be lost
sight of, it was necessary to come to an understanding
with respect to his funds; for this purpose we called on
him without loss of time. Horton informed us he had
seven hundred dollars: Jinkins presented him with a
draft for four hundred dollars, a present from my uncle;
but I thought it best for Horton's interest to draw the
money, and see the articles laid in--and thinking the
whole little enough, Jinkins and I added two hundred
more, and saw him properly installed in his grocery
before
we left him.
Next day I called on Mrs. Hunter, who informed me
that Hunter gave her fifty guineas, and advised her (as
best for them both) to make it up with his son, and try
him once more; that he was led to believe he vrould
reform
.
She then handed me the letter from her husband--
it was as follows:
"My dear injured wife, if I don't call you by that
name can you forgive me ? but I know you cannot--
indeed
you ought not. I have for several flays been
attempting
to write to you, but found it impossible. I
have written half a quire anti threw it away, because I
could not express what I wished, and this is all I dare
say until I hear from you. Your friend and mine, Mr.
Burlington, is the bearer of this.
"Your penitent W. HUNTER."
"And what is your determination?"
"To tell the truth, Mr. Burlington, I do not know--
I wish to go and see my mother, in the first place. I
shall never be happy until I obtain her pardon: and my
next wish is to see your sister once more, I have but two
wishes in this world, and it is these.
"I am afraid to trust Hunter, he has deceived me once
already, by a show of compunction. But if he would
renounce his former way of life, and pursue some honest
means for a livelihood, I think I would be happier with
him than in any other situation--but I will be advised
by you."
I told her "I was really at a loss--Hunter might be
sincere, and I believed he was, but I could not undertake
to guarranty for his subsequent conduct.
I t
old her I
could not think of her visiting Boston in her weak state
--that she had better go to Philadelphia with Hunter
and Jinkins, and I would myself visit her mother and
sisters, obtain her pardon, and do all that was
necessary
.
She burst into tears--"And am I not to see my
mother
,
then?" said she.
"Yes, dear Clarissa, I pledge you my honour you
shall see her before I leave the country if I should take
you there myself."
I intended to add to the magazine of wonders, by
presenting old Mrs. Simpson and her daughters at
Philadelphia
,
(if they would go) as I could notthink of
leaving
them in their distressed situation, but this I kept to
myself--leaving her there for the present, I took
Jinkins
on my way and called on Hunter.
I informed him it was my wish that he should
accompany
his daughter-in-law to Philadelphia, as she was desirous
of seeing my sister, Jinkins would accompany
them and conduct him to his son, and that whatever he
intended to bestow on him, I thought it nothing more
than justice to settle a permanent support upon his wife.
Perceiving by the letter that he was ignorant of his
son's assumed name, I apprized him that he assumed
the name of
Smith
, and that his wife had better adopt it
also.
I could not refrain from laughing at Jinkins after we
left Hunter.
"Damme if I like to have any thing to do with such
a scape-gallows set, as they seem to be all round," said
Jinkins.
I replied "that is the very reason why, and the time
when you ought to befriedn them--I mean when they
are abandoned by the world."
"Blast their eyes, I would give them the last penny
I have, but I do not like to be caught travelling with
them."
"I am sorry it has so happened, but, dear Jinkins, to
tell you the truth, I am afraid to trust this poor woman
with Hunter, and although I joined your names for
which I beg your pardon.) to save appearances, yet I
would as soon trust her with the d----I as Hunter; and
in fact I would trust her to very few, except yourself.--
And as for Hunter, he can go as he likes : and another
thing, no one knows as much of the parties as you do--
you will have the pleasure (the honour if you will) of
seeing the meeting between them.
"I will write to Mary by you, I wish her to receive the
letter before she sees Mrs. Hunter,this you will attend to."
We walked on to a mercantile house, where I
purchased
ten thousand dollars worth of goods for myself, and
the same amount for Wilson. and consigned them to the
care of T. & Co. of New-Orleans. there to rernxirr till
spring, when I proposed to be in Tennessee, and have
them transported thence, as had been mutually agreed
upon between Wilson and I, before I left Philadelphia.
We had nothing to do now, but to take leave of
Horton
,
my Irish friends, arid Doctor N----. When
I returned, I took a sheet of paper, and wrote to Mary
as follows:--
"Dear Mary--This will be Banded to you by Mr.
Jinkins. Clarissa, your old acquaintance, is going with
him to Philadelphia-she assumes the name of Smith.
It is needless for me to tell you, what I know you will
do, that is receive her kindly, and treat her well till I
return; her husband will meet her there before long.
I am going to Boston, and shall return as soon as
possible
.
Adieu dear Mary."
Next morning I saw Jinkins, and Mrs. Hunter,
safely
seated in a hack, and set off' before I left New-York.
Old Hunter took a passage also, and so did I, he to
Philadelphia
,
and I to Boston.
It was some time after my arrival in Boston, before I
found Mrs. Simpson. In their adversity, nobody knew
them.
I was forced to hunt up Mrs. Jones, and was at no
little
trouble to find her. After finding Mrs. Jones, she
and I set out together, to Mrs. Simpson's.
After the usual salutation, Mrs. Jones observed, "here
is a gentleman who wishes to see you, Mrs. Simpson."
My name she told her, was Burlington.--I had a
message
to her from her daughter.
"My poor Clarissa! and how is she? and where is
she?" asked the old lady eagerly.
"At Philadelphia," said I, "with my sister, by this
time, and in tolerable health."
"Can you be Mary Burlington's brother?"
"I am Madam."
"Why haven't you heard," said Mrs. Jones, "that
Miss Mary is married to one of the first gentlemen in the
country ?"
"How you talk," replied Mrs Simpson, taking off
her glasses, and surveying the in astonishment.
"You seem surprised, madam, don't you think my
sister was good enough for any man?"
"Yes," she said, "Mary was a good girl, but she
got affronted and left our house."
"And how is Miss Mary?" said Matilda, (as I took
it) I should like to see her."
"You can see her then; Mary would be equally pleased
to see you, and if you can put yourself under my
protection, l will see you safe there."
"Oh, sir, she cannot--she was treated too ill here
ever to forgive us."
"She does forgive you, madam--you are mistaken in
my sister."
I then turned to Mrs. Jones, and asked "if she
recollected
Dupon?" and informed her what he was to me,
and that he was married to Martha on the same day
with my sister, and that his father was amongst the
wealthiest men in the country.
I wished to mortify this oId madam Simpson, whom I
discovered was a mean wretch, but for the sake of her
daughters I resolved to accomplish my scheme.
I also apprized Mrs. Jones of Mrs. Cary's good
fortune
in the miraculous preservation of her son: and
added
a shining description of our thrice happy assembly
that we all sat in one parlour. eat at one table, and our
whole time filled up with the most agreeable amusements.
"I am sure Miss Simpson, you must wish to see theim."
Mrs. Jones expressed the most heart-felt satisfaction,
and said "I always thought them girls would meet with
good fortune at last, for they never had a spark of pride
almut them ;and well does Mrs. Cary deserve her good
fortune, for there never was a better woman, though she
was persecuted in this town by a set of vipers, that ought
never to prosper."
Besides Matilda, there was present another daughter
of Mrs. Simpson's, Eliza.
I told them "I was serious, and that they must get
ready, for I would not go without them ; and as you may
not wish to go without your mother, we will take her
too."
"Oh, sir, you are very kind--but we cannot go--I
am not fit to appear amongst such great people," said
Matilda.
"And why are you not fit?"
"I am not able, sir; we have been very unfortunate
since you saw us: we have been reduced almost to
beggary
.
"That shall be an excuse," I answered, handing her
my purse--"take that, and rig yourselves up.. get
plenty of warm clothes, for I assure you, you will want
them."
"You can't be in earnest," said Mrs. Simpson.
I told her--"I never was more in earnest in my life."
The situation of this friendless family recalled to my
mind my mother's last injunction; poverty marked the
house throughout. Her son, the only one she had, was
dead.
Putting on air of gaiety, I told tire girls I should sup
with them that evening, and have us something good for
supper. Matilda get its some good wine, I am a great
epicure, and let us have a better fire. I shall return
after
seeing Mrs. Jones home.
Poor things! their wan looks and sunken cheeks,
intimated
too plain that good suppers and them had long
been strangers.
Mrs. Jones expressing a wish to go, I waited on her
home.
"I wonder, Mr. Burlington, how you can be so kind
to them Simpsons, when they used your sister so ill?
they had better have taken her life."
"Ah, madam, but we must forgive each other. Does
not the scripture tell us so? and only remember that
they are poor."
When we arrived at her house tea was ready, and I
took an humble cup with the humble Mrs. Jones.
While we were taking tea, a well dressed young man,
with an epaulette upon his shoulder, entered the house,
and asked if "he could get boarding there?"
Mrs. Jones told him "he could not--she was not
prepared
to take boarders."
He then asked "if she could lodge him that night?"
"No; there were taverns and boarding-houses enough
in the city--why do you not go to them?"
The stranger smiled, and asked her "if she did not
recollect him?"
Upon which, Mrs. Jones looking earnestly at him,
exclaimed "if it is not my William!" at which they
flew into each others' arms.
29
It proved to be her son, who had just returned from a
three years' cruise in the Mediteranean, and being
much burnt with the sun was the reason she did not
know him at first.
I had intended to invite Mrs. Jones to go with me
likewise, to see her friends: but the return of her
gallant
son, (her only child) had filled her heart to
overflowing
,
and it could hold no more.
When I returned to Mrs. Simpsons, the girls had just
returned from shopping, which gave me hopes of my
successa glowing fire, good wine, and a good supper
quite irradiated the countenance of Mrs. Simpson, while
she repaid me in yankee styleI guess you'll be too
good, and all that.
And had you no friend, Matilda, in your distress?
No, indeed siryours is the first friendly voice we
have heard.
While we were at supper, I proposed to Mrs. Simpson
to leave Boston and settle in Philadelphia: that she, I
thought, would do better there, and I see no
inducement
to remain here; your son-in-law will, with his
father
probably settle there, and if you resolve to go, I
will undertake to see you safe there, and see that you are
comfortably situated afterwards; that I could not think
of going away and leaving them unprotected and
friendless
.
You may think upon it, however, and let me know.
Meantime I desired the girls to get ready with all
dispatch
,
for I should insist upon their accompanying me
thither, whether they concluded to remove there or not.
After sapper we sat up late, drank wine, and chatted
about Mary, and about Martha, and about every thing;
and to tell the truth, I believe old mother Simpson and
me took a little too much.
Next day I called on a few of my old acquaintances,
merely to see how the same people would behave under
different circumstances`Won't you stay and dine?'
`Can't you come and spend the evening?' I would as
soon have dined with Beelzebub.
Hunter, before we parted in New York, gave me a
power of attorney to sell the property he owned in
Boston
,
and bring him the money. I therefore called on
Mr. S. his agent, to apprize him of my business. As I
pursued my way to his house, not without some
melancholy
reflections on former times, my attention was
arrested
by the cruelty of a dray-man to his horse. He
was beating the poor animal, and forcing him to proceed
with a load too much for his strength. I stopped, and
mildly reproved the man for his crueltyhe desisted for
the purpose of attending to what I said: I was standing
rather on one side of the horse, when the innocent
creature
turned his head to look at me, and seemed to implore
my pity: the big tear was standing in his eyeit pierced
me to the heart. The horse was familiar to meI must
know that horse, and should have known him amongst
ten thousandit was my father's old Pompey! He was
sold at the sale, with the rest of his property, and must
have been at least fourteen years old.
What will you take for him? said I to his
brother-brute
.
Thirty dollars, he answered.
I pulled out the money and paid itNow, sir, take
off the harness.
O, I must take the load to the wharf, first.
I would see you in perdition before he should pull it
another inchso take him outhe is my horse.
He took him out, while I stept to a shop for a bridle,
and patting the poor old fellow, told him he should fare
on the best, and never work more.
I seturned to the tavern, and the first thing I did, was
to see that Pompy had plenty to eat, and drink, and a
tripple bed of straw. Poor old friend, I could have
hugged him to my heart, nay I did do it.
After disposing of Pompey, I called on Mrs. Simpson,
(hearing would not be at home till evening) I found
the girls very busy, preparing for their journey, and the
old lady perfectly reconciled to remove to Philadelphia.
I told them I should sail the ensuing day, and desired
them without fail to be ready.
Having completed Hunter's business, and the ladies
their dresses, we on the day appointed, set sail for
Philadelphia
,
taking old Pompey along. Poor old horse, I
was afraid the vessel would jolt him too hard, but I
made him a soft bed, and advised him to lie down. And
now like a true knight errant, I appear, I dare say in
the eyes of many. By different people, however, the
thing will be viewed differently. Some will perhaps,
have evil things in their heads; but let me tell them,
they are evil people who think evil. I would pay as
little
attention to their opinion, as I would to the opinion
of an ass.
CHAPTER XXXI.
Nothing
worthy of notice occured during our
voyage
.
When we arrived at Philadelphia, I took the
ladies
to an inn, hard by the dwelling of my friends, with
an assurance that I would visit them in the course of an
hour.
I next disposed of Pompey in a comfortable stable, and
then waited on my friends, whom I found well. Clarissa
rose and met me with a smile, (for she was there) and
asked, what news from Boston?
All well, I replied, your mother and sisters were
well when I left there.
No letter? said Clarissa.
No, I replied, they would have wrote, but they
knew I could give more general satisfaction. Not
willing
to make minute enquiries before so many, Clarissa
said no more, particularly as I was engaged in replying
to the several enquiries of my friends.
In the course of the conversation, I failed not to
acquaint
Mary, of my good fortune in meeting with
Pompey
,
and that he was now in Philadelphia.
After chatting some time, and enquiring of Clarissa
and Jinkins, how they got on, I proposed a walk, to the
latter, saying my excuse to the company. As we
proceeded
to the Inn, where I left the ladies, I informed
Jinkins
of my plan agreeably to surprise, not only Clarissa,
but the whole party.
What three more women? said Jinkins.
Even so, and had like to have had one more.
What in God's name are you going to do with a
seraglio of women?
Leave them with you dear Dick, for I am going
away in the spring you know.
Dd if you do then.One is more than I want;
29*
but I suppose I shall have to be noosed to one, rather
sheepishly. for the sake of peace.
I am pleased to hear that, for I suspect you mean
Miss Watson.I always wished that to take place,
said I. And why do you all pitch upon me to marry
her?
Because I wish the poor orphan under protection,
and happy.
Why don't you take her under your protection?
marry her yourself.
But she loves you Dick, and I know, although you
talk in this manner, you have a strong partiality for her;
and be assured that if you do not marry her, I will,
though I would not express as much to mortal, other
than yourself. But understand me distinctly, when I
make this declaration.It is because I believe Miss
Watson
would make any man happyand that she deserves
to be so herself; but above all, because she is poor and
destitute.
By this, we were at the house, where I left the ladies;
and without loss of time, we set out with them to Mrs.
Cary's.
When we entered the parlour, I discovered marks of
surprise in every countenance.
I told you that you should see your Mother,
Clarissa
,
said I, approaching her with the old ladies' arm
locked in mine, this is your mother. It is needless
to add the restwhen the transports of the mother, and
the daughter, had given place, Matilda, and Eliza, were
permited to approach and embrace their sister.
Meanwhile
,
surprise and pleasure, were alike predominant
in every beholder; not one of them had had the least
shadow of suspicion, and never were more completely
taken by surprise.
I left to Mary the balance of the ceremony, and
steped
to the landlord, to have chambers prepared forth with,
and return to the company, telling Mrs. Simpson.
Suitable
rooms were preparing for her, to which she might
retire when she thought proper. In the course of an
hour the Simpsons were shewn to their rooms,
accompanied
by Clarissa.
And now, said Wilson, you ought to close the
drama, by having old Harry is it?
Pompey you mean.'
Well Pompey be it, brought from the stable, and
make me acquainted with him, for I confess I would
rather see him, than the Simpsons.
So would I.
So would I.
Was uttered by every one; and I actually had to send
for Pompey. My uncle had been apprised of the arrival
of his brother's horse, and was no less anxious to see
him.
When it was announced that Pompey was at the door,
every one flew to meet him, except the commodore, and
as he could only move at a moderate walk, I waited for
him. When we joined the party, the ladies were
caressing
the poor old fellow, talking to him and patting him
with their hands. Mary must needs run for salt, and
Pompey licked it out of her hand. I dare say, if he
would have excepted it, the ladies would have sent a
feather bed to his stall, so devoted were they to his ease
and comfort.
After their curiosity was gratified, I sent Pompey to
his lodgings, and taking Jinkins with me, proceeded in
quest of the Hunters.
The old man, Jinkins informed me, had arrived in
Ppiladelphia, and agreeably to the instructions he gave
him, discovered the residence of his son, but farther he
could not tell.
On our way thither, Jinkins informed me, that the
match was actually concluded upon, between him and
Miss Watsonand that great efforts were making to
bring about one between my uncle and his mother.
Ferdinand
,
was the principal spokesman with the old man,
though he threw in a word occasionally.
I asked if the commodore had ever made any
personal
overtures to his mother?
No, her rapelling modestly, he believed, would
never be brought to submit to a personal interview of
that nature, I have myself, however, said little to her on
the subject.
But what does my uncle say?
That, said Jinkins, I was just going to tell
you.
One night after my return, the ladies had retired to
their chambers, your uncle, Ferdinand, and myself, were
sitting by the fire, Ferdinand says, come father, let us
know your decision now, Dick is present, you would
give no satisfaction till he arrived, now you can have his
opinion.
Oh thee's a worrysome dogWhat do'st think Dick,
they wants me to enter upon matrimony, and like o' that,
with thee mother, and don't know whether she'll ha' me
or not.
Why don't you ask her? said I.
Ask thee granny, think I'm goin' a courtin' to a
woman that blushes when one looks at her? tell'ee what
it'ill never do, for such old folks as we be, to be huggin'
and bussin'.
No necessity for hugging and bussing, (said I,)
until
after you are married.
What will'ee have on't? how is one to woo? always
seed 'um huggin' their sweet-hearts, but if so be that
thy mother is willing to take such an old
weather-beaten
fellow as I be, an' I hear no more fash about it, why
I'm never the man that'll flinch, d'ye see, to take
command
o' a steady vessel, and 'suppose it'll give comfort
to the youngsters.
Why, you are not so old, sir, you have just entered
your fifty-first year, and my mother, she says, is in her
fortieththat is not so old, I'm sure, I havn't a doubt
but you'll have several children.
Ah, get along with thee, Dickthought thee would
not lend a handand thee's 'worst o' the crew.
He agreed, however, before we quitted him, that my
mother was most like his Eliza of any woman he had
seen.
All we want now, said Jinkins, is my mother's
consent. I told her the other day that we had saved her
the trouble of courting, having obtained the
Commodore's
consent, and that a little brother or sister would
yield me the most joy of all things.
She burst into a laugh and almost broke my head, and
bid me begone. I have learned since that she told the
girls, who are always teazing her, that she would give
them an answer when you returned, that you were her
first and only friend, and if you advised her seriously to
it, she would comply.
We now arrived at Smith's, as he is to be called, we
found him and his father both sitting together, they
appeared
glad to see us, the young one particularly. I
delivered
the money to the father, twenty thousand dollars.
He was pleased, beyond measure, at the sale, saying it
was more than he had expected.
After delivering the money, and a letter which his
agent sent, I proposed his going with me, immediately,
to purchase a house for his daughter-in-law, to which
he assented cheerfully.
But before we set out I asked the son if he and his
wife had become reconciled. He answered that she
waited for me, and would tell him nothing till I came.
I told him I would see her that evening, and we
proceeded
.
Upon looking over the papers at a reading room, we
picked out one in Elm-street, and waited on the
proprietor
,
who walked with us to the premises and concluded
the contract. To save trouble and keep on safe ground
I had the property conveyed to six trustees for her benefit
during her life.
It was a very handsome two-story brick building, two
rooms below stairs, and four above, a cellar and kitchen,
the whole was purchased for fourteen thousand dollars,
possession given on signing and sealing. I put the key
into my pocket, signifying to Hunter that the house must
be furnished, and he or I must do it.
He said he would do it, to be sure.I replied I was
glad to hear it, as I had to provide for Mrs. Simpson,
and her two daughters, whom I found in distress in
Boston
,
and had brought them on to this city at my own
expense
.
Having said this, Jinkins and I returned. On
our return Jinkins said he would not be much
surprised
if young Hunter should rob his father, and clear out
with the cash.
The old fox will be too cunning for him.
Waving the subject of the Hunters, I observed to
Dick that so soon as we disposed of the Simpsons, we
must bring my uncle to woo your mother in earnest; I
wouldn't miss it hardly for the match. We must leave
them alone someday, and some of us must lie in ambush.
At this we arrived at our lodgingsI knocked at the
door of Mrs. Simpson, and told Clarissa her house was
readygave her the key, saying it would be furnished
the next day.
Upon entering our parlour I sent for the landlord, and
desired him to have some good music at seven o'clock,
and a few other good things for supper; and turning to
Wilson and Ferdinand, I informed them that I had a
matter though small, yet serious, to submit to them.
Here are three poor females in distress, and must be
assisted
.
I found them in want of the necessaries of life,
clothed them, and brought them on at my own cost; now,
as good christians, I wish to see what
you
will do, ladies
and alland remember, that they have neither house,
nor home, nor friends: their brother, all the protector
they had, is no more. You that are able, throw in
accordingly
.
Looking at Ferdinand, and calculating upon what his
father would give him, he was worth more than the whole
of us put together.
You cannot mean them dn Simpsons? said Wilson.
Yes, sir, I replied warmly, I mean them; where
is your charity? you surely would not bear malice
against females: here are two innocent girls, whom I
dare say had no hand in the affair, you resentand even
if they had, I know you too well, Wilson, to believe you
would harbour resentment against friendless orphans.
There stop, you have said enough, said Wilson,
you would have made an excellent preacher.
I then placed a table in the centre of the room, and
setting a candle and a few cards thereon; after writing
the sum I was willing to give and turning the card over
to couceal the amount, I retired to my seat. The others
followed my example, walking separately to the table,
each one wrote on a card and turned it over.
When all had got through, Wilson walked to the
table
and read as follows:
Thomas Burlington,
$500
Henry Wilson,
300
Martha Cary,
30
Ferdinand Burlington,
900
Richard Jinkins,
250
Mary Wilson,
50
Martha Burlington,
100
Charles Burlington,
300
Betsey Watson,
20
$2,450
Well, said my uncle, 'think we all did pretty
well, han't we?
Yes sir, but it was nothing more than was to be
expected
after a sermon. said Jinkins.
Just at that moment the musicians arrived.
I desired Mary to go and bring Matilda and Eliza,
and she might use her pleasure as to the other two.
She, however, returned with them all, which completely
filled our parlour. I now saw, what I ought to have
done sooner, viz. that we must adjourn to a larger room,
and issued orders to that amount. I was, however, no
little amused at the perplexity of the Commodore, when
he saw so many persons enter the parlour, which were
to him unexpected; and although the room was small,
his heart was bighe cast his eyes round, up and down
the room, then on the company, and hitching his chair
closer to the wall, seemed by his looks to say `here is
room.'
The company was now filing off under the guidance of
Ferdinand. I remained behind with my uncle, intending
to bring up the rear. After they had sufficient time to
be regulated, I drew my uncle's arm under mine, and
followed
.
Leading him near the fire I left him, and took
up my fluteFerdinand performed on the clarionette
Jinkins and Wilson sung. The ladies appeared (and
probably were) highly delighted, while my uncle seemed
to forget his age.
An hour and a half had flown (while it appeared not
more than half that time) when refreshment was
introduced
.
The collation was delicious, ample, and in
endless
varietysyllibubs foamed high, jellies trembled,
champaign and claret formed rivers, coffee and tea an
ocean, whilst cheese, ham, cake of all sorts, and fruit of
every kind completed the repast. The whole was
seasoned
with glee, and merry jests, nor must it be
forgotten
that Jack Jinkins made one of our guests; the man,
whose gallant conduct had endeared him to us all. He
was neatly dressed, and demeaned himself with that ease
of manner, which bespoke a just sense of the tribute he
deserved.
When our repast was over, Mary declared she would
have a danceit was too much to let all those good
things go off so.Choose partners, ladies and
gentlemen
.
Betsey Watson ran to my uncle and pulled him out.
Oh, child, I knows nothing at all about thae sort o'
dances.
No excuse, said she, you can just walk the figure
we only want you to make out the set.
The old man suffered her to pull him on to the floor
He'd seen the time he could foot it with the best of
'um.
The music began, and so did weI mean to go
wrong. Could not make the figure for our souls, and
I was seriously engaged in restoring order, before I
discovered
that Wilson was putting the others out, to raise
a laugh. My uncle, though he lifted his feet now and
then, could by no means get into the way on't. In short,
all fell into confusion, every one was seized with
laughter
.
Let us begin again, said I.
No, no: answered Wilson, we'll get right
directly
cross
hands here madam
Now we ha' it, said my uncle, right and left.
I had to leave them, being unable to keep the floor
from laughing.
Well, now, I've made thee all laugh, I'll go sit
down'twas just what thee's wanted.
We commenced again, and went through one or two
rules.
The music was now dismissed, and plays succeeded,
nor did we break up until the clock struck twelve. I
then conducted the Simpsons to their rooms, and we
separated for the night.
30
CHAPTER XXXII.
Next
morning Wilson showed me a letter from his
parents, pressing his return, and we fixed on the first of
March for our journey to Tennessee. This was the
middle of February. After breakfast I took the key
from Clarissa, and went to superintend the furnishing
her house, having previously informed Mrs. Simpson
that her friends had made up a little sum for her, and if
she could suit herself in the purchase of a comfortable
house, (not exceeding the amount) she sould have the
money
any time, stating the amount.
It was late in the day before the house was ready to
receive the Simpsons, and leaving the Hunters there, I
waited on Clarissa with a carriage, to convey her
thither
.
Her mother and sisters rode with her in the
carriage
,
while Jinkins and I attended them on foot. Here
something which I cannot describe took place between
the Hunters and Simpsonsit was neither joy nor
sorrow
,
nor love, nor hatred, confidence, or suspicion, but
it was a mixture of all these.
I introduced Hunter to Mrs. Simpson and her
daughters
,
telling him, at the same time, I presumed they
were old acquaintances.
He muttered something, and saluted very coolly.
And you, sir, I suspect, need no introduction,
addressing
the son,he bowed; we bid them good by, and
left them to come to an explanation in any way they
might think proper.
They are well matched, said Jinkins, I don't
like that old Mrs. Simpon, she has too much pepper and
vinegar in her looks for me.
Jinkins was not far wrong, although she had been
brought low, yet there was still to be seen the remains
of pride and haughtiness in her countenance. But her
daughters were modest, good-natured, and handsome.
On our way home, Jinkins informed me that he and
Betsey were actually engaged, though it was a profound
secret to the whole world.
Ferdinand and Wilson, he said, had resorted to
various
stratagems to detect him, but without success. I
approved
of his independence, and observed, It would be
well to have both marriages take place at the same time,
that is if your mother consents, and I shall certainly
advise her to do so; not that I think matrimony
necessary
to her happiness.As a friend, in any other case, I
would advise her against it. But joined, as the family
is, by the ties of blood and friendship, I think it a very
advisable and a very desirable union.
In the course of the day, I had a private interview
with Mrs. Cary, the particulars of which is a sacred
trust, which I am not at liberty to divulge. The amount
however was, that the much wished for union between
her and my uncle, was to take place the following
evening
,
and that as the old gentleman and her, had never
conversed on the subject, she consented to receive him in
her chamber the present evening.
These matters being settled, I imparted my success
to my uncle, telling him, we would keep it secret from
the boys, as they will only be teasing you.
Thee did right, for thee's a saucy set make the best
o' 'um. He said he was
afeard
o' none o' 'um, but
Dick, he was the worst o' 'um allI wish 'twar over.
Do not be uneasy sir, about Dick, he will find enough
to do; he is to be spliced himself, as you call it, on the
same evening
DI he is, what to Betsey?
Well! never thought such a thing o' Dick! if he
bean't the cunnin'est dog, never seed 'um look at her,
hardly.
The first opportunity I had, I informed Jinkins of my
success, and that the marriage was to take place the
ensuing
evening, and as I suspect you have no objection, it
is as well to have them both at the same time,
particularly
as I would soon leave the country. I recommended
to him at the same time, to keep the matter still a secret,
and that I had promised my uncle to be silent.
Jinkins approved of the plan, and thanked me for my
advice. I was well pleased, being afraid that he would
object, I mean to his (so sudden) nuptials. He had
always
appeared wary, and had we not proceeded with the
greatest delicacy, we had never brought the matter to
perfection.
I walked into Martha's chamber, and sending for
Mary
,
I told her, that as she was fertile in inventions,
she and Martha must contrive between them, some means
by which they could detect the particulars of an
interview
,
which I informed them, was to take place between
the commodore, and Mrs. Cary, that afternoon. They
were highly pleased at the proposal, and after a pause
Mary proposed going instantly to Mrs. Cary's chamber,
and hold her in conversation, whilst Martha should
cautiously
raise the sash, which communicated between her
own chamber and that of Mrs. Cary's, this she said
could easily be done, as a curtain which hung before it
in the chamber of the latter would prevent discovery.
I now returned to the parlour, where I found my
uncle
.
Ferdinand, and Wilson, were reading the
newspapers
,
and making a sign to the old man; he arose, and
followed me to Mrs. Cary's chamber. My uncle,
madam
,
wishes to pay his respects to you. She blushed,
and asked him to be seated. I left them together.
I had not been so cautious in this intrigue, as not to be
perceived by Wilson, who was communicating it to
Ferdinand
.
As I joined them, who should interrupt us but
old Mrs. Simpson. So old lady (I thought) you are for
the money, I can see it in your looks. She enquired for
the ladies. I told her they were particularly engaged.
I would have rather seen the old . I had like to
have called her an ugly name; but I was determined she
should not interrupt them.
Meantime, Wilson, and Ferdinand, (suspecting she
had some private business) through their extreme
politeness
,
must withdraw; and where should they go, but
(like Mrs. Simpson) to the very place where they were
least wanted, to the respective chambers of their wives.
And curse your old soul, (I thought) now I shall be broke
up.
Wilson soon returned in great confusion, for
intruding
upon Betsey and Jinkins. Ferdinand, likewise
returned
with a smile, that indicated very plain, what was
going on.
I would speak with you, said Mrs. Simpson to me.
I led her into the dining-room, where she informed me,
she had purchased a small house, in the edge of the
town, for fifteen hundred dollars, and if I would be so
kind as to let her have the money?
Certainly madam, and I will walk with you and
see that the sale is properly executed. Getting my hat,
I set out with old mother Simpson. Upon viewing the
house, I found it not a bad bargain, and proceeding with
her to the proprietor, concluded the sale, and gave her
the balance of her money. Thus having rid myself of
Mrs. Simpson, I returned to my friends. I found all
the gentlemen belonging to our party, nor shall I
repeat
the drollery with which the old man warded off the
attack of the whole squadron, as he termed it; but
proceeded
to hunt Martha and Mary.
Jinkins suspecting my business, came toward me, and
without speaking, led me to his bride's chamber; saying,
as we walked thither, that he had just attended the ladies
there. I said, we will go and hear the fun, if they will
admit us. Accordingly we knocked at the door, and
and asked leave to come in.
Mary observed, You came to hear the news; but
you will be greatly disappointed.
How so, did they not converse then? I asked.
Very little.
Let us hear it. She complied as follows:
Pretty snug birth. And after a pause.Well
madam
,
Mrs. Cary, I ha' come to see.Thae youngsters
will ha' it so, 'at we are to be spliced, an I han't been
attacked
by the whole squadron nation a bit, peace can
get for 'um de ye see, and if so be, as thee and I ha' seen
boisterous times on't, and it 'ill give a comfort to thae
young folks, we'll be' to get married any how. Charles
was sayin' that thee had some mind to it, and suppose
we'll be to please 'um, and be done we' it.
He ceased speaking some time, when Mrs. Cary
replied
,
30*
I am proud of the honour you intend me,
captain
Burlington, and as you say, the young people have
been soliciting me very earnestly to the match.I had
intended to live and die a widow; but since it has turned
out as it has, that our children are so mingled together,
and seems to be their desire to please them, it appears
we will have to comply with their wishes.
That's just what 'was thinkin' on myself d'ye see;
but tell'ee what thee'll ha' the worst o' the bargain. And
to tell'ee the truth, I was pretty much o' thy way o'
thinkin', never to marry, and ha' been a long time a
widower
.
But 'twill be a blubberin' on't we' thae youngsters
if don't.They tells as how Jinkins be goin' to yoke in
we Betsey too, and she'll feather her nest when she gets
'um.Yes, yes, if 'don't do a part by Dick, let whose
will go to leeward, never stir if 'don't like Dick almost
as well as Ferdinand, I called 'um Thomas, but 'has a
likin' for the man 'at, raised him, and said would keep
the name for 'is sake. But as I was sayin' Dick 'ill
fare as well as the best o' 'um; but suppose I be to go
back now, and tell thae youngsters it be all settled, and
we'll ha' no more about it. Wont'ee come to tea, I
didn't
see thee at dinner, thee bean't sick art thee?
I am not sir, said Mrs. Cary. I shall be at
supper captain.
Well I'll go and see what thae young ones be about,
said my uncle, and left her without ceremony.
As soon as he returned, Martha and I ran in upon
Mrs. Cary, and told her we heard the whole courtship.
She bid us begonewe were saucey girls, and that she
would turn over a new leaf with us, when she got an old
man of her own.So now you have all, and clear out
you and Jinkins both, we don't want you here.
On the appointed evening, my uncle and Mrs. Cary,
Mr. Jinkins and Miss Watson were severally united. I
gave away Betsey, and Sullivan, the admired friend of
Mrs. Cary, performed this last office to her widowhood.
Nothing else distinguished this thrice happy event, but
a plain supper, no dancing, no musiconly the two
Miss Simpsons and Sullivan were presentMrs.
Sullivan
we would have been proud to have had, but she was
confined, having but a few days previous given birth to
a son, which in honour of my uncle, was named Thomas.
Nothing worth the reader's attention occurred during
the remainder of the time we spent in Philadelphia.
Mrs. Simpson was happily situated, in her own little
dwelling, she and her daughters pursuing the millinary
businessClarissa and her husband lived together and
appeared happythe old man living with them and
pursued
the mercantile business, for which he possessed no
ordinary talents.
At length the parting day arrivedthe scene was, as
might be expected. Our carriage was at the doorwe
were all equipped for stepping into it, when my uncle,
the tears running down his cheeks, walked silently to
Mary, and laid a heavy purse of gold in her lap: he
tried to speak, but was not ableMary attempted to
thank him, but found it impossible to utter a word
Wilson
said dear uncle, you are too gen: generous he
meant to say, but overcome by his feelings, he was
unable
to finish the sentence. The restbut our language is
too poor to do justice to scenes like this, and I pass it over.
I confess that my attachment for those worthy
individuals
with whom I was compelled to part, was so great and
so equally divided, that my regret was only equalled by
it. This was the first day of March, eighteen hundred
and eleven, when Wilson, his wife, and myself set out
for Tennessee.
CHAPTER XXXIII.
My
uncle being attacked with a disease, supposed to
be produced by the climate of the West Indies, had been
advised to try that of the United States. But he found
the change too much on the opposite extremeI
therefore
,
the evening that preceded our departure, advised
him to try that of New-Orleans. To this he gave me no
positive answer, saying that he had a wife and children
now, and supposed he be to be guided by them; but
thee'll write to us now and then, and I'll let thee know.
Nothing worthy of remark happened on our journey
to Tennessee, where we arrived in fourteen days, at the
dwelling of old Captain Wilson, whom and his wife we
found well. Great joy distinguished this happy
meeting
,
but like the sorrow of parting with our friends, it
defied description.
After spending a day with Captain Wilson, I rode to
Nashville for the purpose of engaging a boat to transport
Wilson's goods and mine to Tennesseeand fortunately
met with a gentleman just setting out for New-Orleans,
who wished to engage a back freight. Having furnished
him with the necessary instructions, I was about to
mount my horse, when, whom should I meet but Captain
T.! It may be supposed this event was mutually
pleasing
giving
my horse therefore to the landlord, we
adjourned
to a room, and over a bottle of wine related to
each other the principal incidents which happened to each
since our separation.
In answer to my enquiries about his last escape from
the Spaniards, he replied,
That he took it by land to Vera Cruzthat he never
stopped till the next night, when fearing his horse might
give out, and considering himself out of danger, having
as he supposed travelled about one hundred miles, he
stopped and rested that night at a small hamlet, and
reached Vera Cruz next morning in safety.I can't
think how you and Wilson came to suffer yourselves to be
taken? why, if you had fired on them they would have
flown at the flash of the gun.
In fact, I told him, I and Wilson had laid down
and were asleep, when they surrounded and had us
prisoners
before we were wide awake.
He resumedhe had no fear whatever when he
gained
the open plain. He then expressed the most cordial
satisfaction at my good fortune. You may place that
to my account, said he, if it had not been for my
wild-goose
chase, you would not have met with Hunter.'
I told him what was true, that my sufferings greatly
over-balanced all, and ten times as much as I gained by
Hunter; and yet still it seems like Providence.
When we finished our bottle, he procured a horse and
rode home with me to Captain Wilson's, saying he
must see Henry.
After the expressions of meeting between him and
Wilson
were over, I made him acquainted with my sister,
telling Mary that that was Captain T. of whom she
had heard so much.
Yes, madam, I am the Capt. T. who was the cause
of much distress to you.
Captain Wilson was now in the heighth of his glory;
somebody to laugh, and drink with him, and listen to his
long stories. He was just in the middle of a campaign
when Capt. T. and I arrived, when luckily for Mary,
(whom he was entertaining) we relieved her; but he will,
no doubt, indemnify her at some future day.
As Wilson was now to begin the world, it was
proposed
by his parents that he should reside with them. But
this I objected to, and advised him to build a house for
himself, as the old man intended to leave him the
plantation
on which he lived at his decease, he could build on a
part of it; two families in one house I told him would
never agree, no matter how near and dear they might
be. A store-house must likewise be erected, and that
very soon, ready for business, by the time the goods
arrived
,
this would keep us pretty busy.
Henry was the old lady's darling, she disliked this
arrangement
muchbut the old man said it was by far
the best planHenry could have the big field, and raise
him as much corn as would supply him, and build him a
house on one corner of it, and he could go and see his
daughter-in-law once a day, and rock the cradle for her
occasionallyall this was well. The great road
leading
from Nashville to New-Orleans, passed through the
Captain's plantation, the neighbourhood was populous,
and here we concluded to build a store-house.
These things being settled, that same evening, after
supper, I drew out my pocket-book, telling Wilson that
it was full time to give him the balance of Mary's
portion
ten
thousand dollars you have already received, or
will receive, when your goods arrive, and here is forty,
which makes fifty thousand dollars in the whole. Will
that do? said I.
Yes, it will more than do, said the generous Wilson.
You are robbing yourself, Charles, said Mary
my brother we cannot take so much from you.
But I silenced them saying, that in justice they ought
to have had more, and perhaps (if you make good use of
this) I may add more hereafter.
A great deal was said on this occasion, and not the
least by old Mr. Wilson and his wife, which it is
needless
to repeat. The old lady, after expressing much
seeming satisfaction, got up and went to her chamber,
and in a few minutes returned, and laid the bag of
guineas
which her son had given her in Mary's lap, saying
as she did so, that they had given Henry nothing yet,
but I have done my part: now, old man, do you do yours.
Well, you're very cunning, said her husband, to
make a merit of giving Henry what is his own.
Dear madam, said Mary, it would be a sin to
give us more: I cannot take all this, indeedhere, you
must oblige me by sharing it with me at least.
Keep it, child, said the old lady, what use have
I for it?
Mary, however, forced a few guineas upon her.
The next morning Wilson and I set about business in
earnestSome twelve or fourteen workmen, including
carpenters, were set to worknothing but the sound of
teams, axes, saws and hammers were to be heard, and in
the course of a few weeks, a store and dwelling-house
was completed, and at the end of six weeks our goods
arrived
from New-Orleans, all safe and in good order.
Here then was employment for us allWilson and I
making sales, while Mary was busied in furnishing her
house. She would forsooth come into the store, and
pick the best of every thing, accompanied by her
mother-in-law
,
who was all admiration at the fine things. The
old gentleman regularly spent every day at the store,
where he found ample opportunity of indulging his
inclination
for company and conversation.
At the end of two months from the time of our arrival
in Tennssee, we had the unspeakable pleasure of saluting
one of our friends whom we left in Philadelphiaand
you won't guess who it was. It was not my uncleit
was not Ferdinand, nor Jinkins, nor Jack Jinkins, nor
Sambo, nor Ling. Who then could it be? Neither more
nor less than old
Pompey!
I had enjoined it upon my friends, to send him by the
first waggons that came to our part of the country; the
waggoner tied him to the hinder part of the waggon, and
he travelled at his leisurea handsome reward was
bestowed
on the waggoner for his pains.
We had in the meantime, however, received letters
from our friends, who still remained in Philadelphia.
They were all well, and had determined to remain in
Philadelphia till fall, when it was unanimously concluded
to remove to New-Orleans, and establish a mercantile
house of trade, to communicate both with New-York and
Liverpool.
The letter which brought us the news that our friends
had come to a resolution to settle in New-Orleans,
likewise
informed us that the whole party would make the
journey by land as far as Tennessee, and take water at
Nashville, and that we might expect to see them, if no
accident occurred, some time in October. This letter was
dated July 7thIt is not easy to say whether the old
Captain's family or that of his son's (of whom I was one)
was most pleased at hearing this news.
I pass over the intervening time between this and the
safe arrival of our friends in Tennessee, it being
distinguished
by nothing of consequence, with the exception of
the hurry and bustle of the senior and junior Mrs.
Wilsons
in making preparation for the guests.
At length on the twentieth of October, having heard
that the party were at McMinville, I took horse to meet
them, accompanied by Wilson.
About twenty-two miles from our residence behold we
espied two carriages moving towards us very slow, and
two gentlemen on horseback, whom we soon recognized
to be Ferdinand and Jinkins. Long before we got
within
shaking hands, every head that could get out of the
carriage, was out, and amongst the rest the knotty pate
of Sambo.
He was in the foremost carriage, which besides him,
contained my uncle and aunt.
The other carriage was occupied by Martha, Mrs.
Jinkins, and Jack. All was exclamation, joy, and
universal
tumult, not a word of which could be
distinguished
for several minutes.
At length, as I rode by the side of my uncle's
carriage
,
the old man addressed me with
How far may it be now to the lands end, o' a place
thee didn't mind to stop this side o' itsure, if I
havn't travelled a thousand leagues over mountains and
hills, and plagued wi' a sort o' boats they called 'um, in
crossing thae rivers.
Oh, I'd a been across the Atlantic wi' not half the
din, but 'suppose 'can't be far now.
No sir, we will get there to-night, if you push on a
little faster; but you must put on more sail, sir, the road
is good now.
Thof I ha' nothing to do with sails or rigging, albeit
thee may tell the fellow at the helm what thee likes,
(meaning the driver,) tell'ee what, it be the first and
last voyage I takes by land, and I han't been jolted wi'
the tossin' o' the vessel, or what 'ere it be called, over
hill and dale, it be a wonder, sometimes on her starboard
and sometimes on her larboard, wi' runnin' down steep
places, and puttin' about ship, I ha' been sick on't, d'ye
see.
None of the party complained but my zncle, all
seemed
in high spirits. About dusk we arrived at the
plantation
of Captain Wilson, and as his was the largest and
most convenient house to entertain our travellers, we
took Mary up as we passed by, and proceeded to the
Captain's.
Here they were met by the Captain himself, who after
a kind and welcome greeting, invited them to walk into
the house, where they were severally presented to Mrs.
Wilson and the Captain.
Nothing could exceed the joy, no words could describe
the raptures of Mary, Martha, and Betsey, and my
auntthey seemed as though they would devour each
other embracing and caressing.
The ladies, however, retired to another room, leaving
the gentlemen at liberty to enjoy themselves without
restraint
.
I had much curiosity to observe how my uncle
and Captain Wilson would marshal the affair, of
manifesting
to each other that exalted opinion, and good
liking
,
which existed between them long ere they met.
After
my uncle, therefore, had done with be-theeing every
mountain, hill, river, and tavern, which thwarted him
on his way to Tennessee, the Captain got leave to put in
a word, and was soon engaged in one of his
long
stories,
when supper was announced.
Captain Wilson and the Commodore, resembled each
other as near as possible, in their dispositions and
principles
they
were alike generous and warm-heated, each
was diffident, and appeared perfectly (as most good men
are) insensible of his own merit.
The Captain had been a great soldier, and the other
a great sailor; nor was the Commodore guilty of telling
such tedious stories as the Captainsuch as they were,
however:they were infinitely pleased with each other,
although it was evident that by far the greatest number
of my uncle's sea-phrases, were unintelligible to his
friend.
After spending a month in Tennessee, we were
doomed
once more to part, our friends pursuing their journey
to New-Orleans, and Wilson and I pursuing our
mercantile
business in Tennesse, after promising to visit
them in the course of the next year.
C1
This pleasure was prevented, however, by the
breaking
out of the Creekwar, and every man who had any
respect
for the character of a soldier, and there were few
that had not, in our state, repaired to the field, under
the gallant General Jackson.
Wilson and I, with our commander, Captain T,
were among the first volunteers that marched, much
against the will of the ladies, but with the warmest
approbation
of the old Captain.
We continued in the army until after the victory of
New-Orleans, one or other of us visiting Tennessee
occasionally
to see the family, having left Mary at
Captain
Wilson's, who in the course of time gave birth to a
daughter, and that too while Wilson and I were both
absent
.
As every incident of notice, both of the Creek war,
and the different battles of New-Orleans, are now before
the public, I shall pass over them in silence, and confine
myself to those which more immediately concern
myself
.
When we were ordered to New-Orleans, for the
purpose
of defending that city, it may be supposed we lost
no time in paying our respects to our friends, whom we
found in great consternation at the approach of the
enemy
,
particularly the ladies, as they had understood that
the city was to be given up to be plundered by the
British
soldiers.
As we marched down the street our ears were
assailed
by loud shrieking, and bitter lamentationsthe
women
running to and fro, wringing their hands, and
bewailing
their situations in shricks and cries.
General Jackson enquired into the cause of their
distress
,
and being told it was occasioned by their fears of
the British, he desired those who informed him, to assure
the ladies that the British should never enter
New-Orleans
.
No sooner was this made known, than they rent
the air with Vive la Jackson! and waving their
handkerchiefs
,
greeted him as their deliverer.
It will be recollected that a day of public
thanksgiving
was appointed to celebrate the victory; and through
crowds of joyful citizens we followed our General to the
Cathedral Church, which was splendidly adorned for the
occasion. Whilst every eye was bent upon the heroic
General, and every ear listening to the prayers that were
offered up for his happiness, some one pulled me gently
by the sleeveI turned round, and who should I see but
my old friend, Dennis, of Mexico, who in the same
instant
pointed to Leanora! My brain grew giddy, and
my heart fainted within me. To what a pinnacle of
happiness had I now attained! participating in the glory
of a victory which was to render our name immortal, and
at the same time in the presence of all I held dear on
earthI was intoxicated with delight.
Leanora was standing, the better to observe the
ceremony
,
and though I could not catch a glance of her eye,
I kept mine fixed upon her; nor did I withdraw them,
until the service was ended; when, throwing myself in
the way she must pass, I caught her by the hand, but
was unable to command a word. She was likewise
silest
nor
did she faint or shriek, or give way to any of
the weakness' of her sex. We walked some distance,
before I was able to say, This pleasure, madam,
repays
me for all I have suffered in your country.
I asked permission to attend her home; and enquired
to what miracle I owed this happiness? She only replied
by a shower of tears, and we walked on in silence.
When we arrived at her dwelling, she invited me to walk
in, and we had scarcely seated ourselves, when Dennis
entered the parlour.
May the powers bless us, said he, offering his
hand, but we are here, bag and baggage; and didn't I
know you the first glimpse I had of your face? You know
I did, and glad enough I was, I hope your honour is
well?
Dear Dennis I am well, and would rather see you
and your lady than to be monarch of the world; but I
will talk with you some other timeyes, a whole year,
Dennis, and he took himself off. Leanora gave me to
understand, briefly, That her father was accused, by
Government, of conniving at my escape, and had to fly
for his life, to this city. I told her I would hear her
story some other time, when we were both more
composed
.
Her father now made his appearance, accompanied
by father Antonio.
He saluted stiffly, as most Spaniards do, without
seeming to recollect me. Offering my hand, I informed
him who I was. He seemed little pleased at the renewal
of our acquaintance; asked, coolly, after my health, and
with a haughty air withdrew into another room, whither
Antonio followed him. Poor old man! his dress, as well
as that of Leanora, too plainly bespoke his situation,
and his head was almost white, and the wo-worn furrows
had taken possession of his cheek.
The difficulties you have suffered on my account,
thought I, may well have prejudiced you against me;
but for his daughter's sake I wished it had happened
otherwise
,
as I saw she was hurt.
I will go and bring Wilson to see you, Leanora; he
is in town.
Having said this I left her. When I arrived at
Ferdinand's
,
the company was thunder-struck at my
discovery
,
and my uncle, pulling a chair beside him, bid me sit
dawn and tell him all about it. I excused myself, of
course, borrowed a small sum from Ferdinand, and
taking
Wilson's arm returned to Leanora's. We found
her and her father sitting in the same parlour where I
left her, engaged in conversation. Leanora expressed
much pleasure at seeing Wilson, and her father greeted
him with much more cordiality than he did me. Without
loss of time I told the old man I wished to speak with
him privately. He arose and walked into the room I
had seen him withdraw to upon his entrance into the
house. I followed him in, and laying the money on a
table that stood near me, addressed him as follows:
Accept this trifle, sir, as a small remuneration for
the loss you have sustained on my account. It is with
much sorrow I learn that you were plunged into great
distress on my departure from Mexico. I have an ample
fortune, and you will confer an eternal obligation on me
by sharing it with me.
But this haughty Spaniard touched it not, nor did he
deign to thank me; and turning his back upon me with
ineffable contempt, took the precedence in walking out
of the room. This was a bad omen; however, I was by
no means discouraged, and followed him out, leaving the
cash on the table, and father Antonio to watch it. I took
a seat by Leanora, and entered into conversation with
her, on matters of a different nature, whilst Wilson was
entertaining the old gentleman, God knows (for I don't)
about what. In a few minutes Wilson succeeded in
persuading
the Don (may heaven reward him for the deed)
to walk with him and see his friends, and they left us
without speaking a word.
I was now alone with Leanora; my time was short,
and the only equivalent was to use it to the best
advantage
.
Waving every other consideration, therefore, I
adverted to that nearest my heart. Briefly, Leanora
agreed to be mine, in spite of frowns or fortune. The
conduct of her father to me she said was nothing but
the effect of spleen, and mortification, which arose from
his inability to leave her independent; and undertook to
obtain his consent to our union, of which she seemed to
have little doubt, when he came to be acquainted with
the advantages of the alliance. After things were settled
upon this footing, I desired Leanora to call Dennis.
When he came, I sent him into the room for the money.
Dennis, in the meantime, had prepared a repast, of
which Leanora and I partook; nor have we often since
that day enjoyed the comforts of the social board
without
being blessed with the company of each other.
In the course of two hours Leanora's father returned;
but not quite in so sullen a mood. The reception he
met with, at the house of my friends, had evidently
lowered
his Spanish pride. He condescended to smile, as
he entered the parlour, and said to his daughter, de
lady beg you to honour them.
Yes, I rejoined, they will be proud of your
acquaintance
,
and taking my hat I took leave of them,
saying to Leanora, I would bring the ladies to see her
in the course of half an hour, and I hoped to have the
pleasure of her and her father's company that evening
at the house of my friends.
Before I proceed further, it is necessary to give a brief
account of my friends in New-Orleans, where, as already
31*
remarked, they resided. Ferdinand and his father lived
in the same house; Jinkins and his foster-father lived in
a separate one, not far distant from thence: but on this
evening they were all assembled at Ferdinand's. Mary,
taking the advantage of General Carrol's escort to
New-Orleans
,
to visit her friends, as well as her husband, had,
with her young daughter, lately arrived. Nor must I
omit to mention that both Ferdinand and Jinkins had
been blessed each of them with a son, but this is nothing
compared to what I am now obliged to add. Reader,
raise your expectations to the highest pitch: you are
about to be astonished, as I certainly was myself. My
uncle had the unspeakable pleasure of being blessed with
a son, three months before the birth of his grand-sons!
Wilson and myself had been so much engaged since our
arrival in the city, that our friends had but little of our
company, and being now at leisure, it was agreed and
intended to celebrate the birth of their children by a
great merry-making, as my uncle called it, and the
banquet was to take place the next day; when the mighty
scheme was entirely forgot in the joyful discovery of
Leanora
.
It would be mockery, as well as loss of time, to
repeat the expressions of joy on this occasion. The
ladies
chided me severely for keeping them so long from
the sight of Leanora. Mary and Martha were sitting,
with their bonnets in their hands, and could hardly be
restrained by Wilson from setting off to see her, without
more ceremony.
Meanwhile, a sumptuous supper was ordered, and the
tedious half hour had expired, when Martha, Mary,
Betsey, and my aunt, attended by all the gentlemen,
except
my uncle, sallied forth to the house of my intended
father-in-law, for hitherto I had never heard his name;
I apprized them on the way, that they would be much
disappointed upon seeing the object of their curiosity;
that they must not expect to see a beauty. Leanora was
well formed, had a very expressive countenance, good
features, a brilliant black eye, and brown complexion,
but the roses had left her cheek; in fact, she was much
altered from what she was: the effect of distress, no
doubt, and that too on my account. But it was her
magnanimous soul, and her generous heart, that
principally
captivated me.
Poor Leanora had like to have been pressed to death,
by the eager embraces of her new acquaintances, whilst
her father viewed the scene in silent astonishment.
Without paying the least attention to him, they were
flying off with Leanora, when I hinted the oversight to
Mary. She flew back in an insant, and taking hold of
his arm, led him along, whilst I wiped the tear of
sensibility
,
from the wan cheek of Leanora. Seeing Dennis
look mournfully after us, I asked Leanora to let him
come too; and the delighted Dennis, accompanied us,
and was permitted to be seated amongst us, at the
general
rendezvous. Meanwhile, Mary never let go the
old Don's arm, until she landed him safe in the house.
And now I am once more nonplused in my narrative,
being unable to do justice to the happiness which
distinguished
this evening's entertainment.
I must, however, relate a few of the incidents which
distinguished the flight of Don Emanuel, which I learn
is the name of Leanora's father, and formed a part of
the evening's amusement.
The keeper when he found the door of the prison open,
and the prisoner gone, hastened to the Vice-Roy, and
charged Don Emanuel, with effecting the prisoner's
escape
;
making oath to the allegation, and orders were
immediately issued for his apprehension. It had been
previously rumored, that he connived at the escape of
capt. T, and that he had often of late transcended
his instructions in several instances.
Meantime, a friend who was present when the order
was issued, fled to the Don, and apprized him of his
danger
,
and hastily addressing me, said, Leanora, (for
it was her that related the circumstances) secure all the
money in the house, as quick as possible, my daughter,
Unco will . He then, pale as a corpse, disappeared.
Although I trembled at such a degree, that I could
scarcely
stand, with the assistance of Dennis, and father
Autonio
,
I had just secured one small box of money, when the
house was filled with offices in quest of my father.
After
making strict search for him, in every part of the
house, a part of their number returned to report their ill
success, whilst the others remained in possession of the
house. In a short time, an officer came and took
possession
of every thing in the house, as forfeited to
government
,
concluding that my father had absconded, which
was proof of his guilt. I was permitted to stay in the
house, but sat up the whole night. Toward day,
Dennis
went to the garden, and took what money he had
secreted
there, and carried it to the dwelling of Unco;
there he saw my father, and disclosed to him the whole
matter. My father had intended to proceed on to
Vera-Cruz
,
that night, had Unco heen at home; but you know
where he was, said she with a smile to me.
Briefly my father told Dennis, that he would try
to escape to New-Orleans, as he would not be safe in any
other country, and that he and father Antonio must
accompany
me thither afterwards, as he could better effect
his escape alone. I believe he continued there,
concealed
by Unco's wife, forty days, before he set off
accompanied
by Unco to Vera-Cruz, and then he lay concealed at
the house of Unco's uncle, three weeks, before he could
obtain a passage to New-Orleans; and I just arrived at
Vera-Cruz the next day, after he set sail. I took a
passage
for Havana, and from there to New-Orleans, where
with my faithful friends, Antonio and Dennis, only to
attend
meI arrived safe.
And every word of that is the
trut
, said Dennis,
but my lady did'nt tell you after all, how I fixed 'um.
No Dennis, said I, you must tell us that
yourself
,
I love to hear the sound of your voice once more.
Well, I'll tell you how it was; the cursed divils,
God forgive me, they wasn't satisfied with getting all my
master had in the world, and his money into the bargain,
but they says to me `Old man, your master had more
more money than here is; don't you know where he kapes
his money?' God knows my master, poor sowl, never
hoarded up money in his born daysI don't know any
thing about my master's money;' and so it passed on
every time they'd see me, they would be sure to ax me to
tell them where my master hid his money? and at last,
thinks I, I'll match you, and so just the very day before
my lady and I was to start off, that night what does I
do but tells them that (making out as if it was a great
secret
)
that if they would just give me fifty guineas, I
would tell them; but they must never betray me, and
they must put the money down first, and that I would
agree to give it back if in case they didn't find what I
told them wasn't the truthand so they gives me the
money, and I tells them right in the
sout
corner of my
master's garden, if they would dig there, if they didn't
find it, I'd agree to be buried there myself. The sorrow
a bit they know'd we were were coming away, and I'll
warrant my poor master's garden paid for the roast;
and I got that much out of them, clear gain.
Dennis continued to entertain us during the balance of
the evening, to the great amusement of the company.
Meantime my father Don seemed to relax by degrees;
but I paid little attention to any thing but one object:
once in the while I would observe how he relished my
attention
to his daughter. So far as I could perceive he
showed no sign of disapprobation. We sat up late, and
Don Emanuel arose to take leave, saying to his
daughter
,
it was time to go, when the ladies, all with one
accord, declared they could not part with her.
Indeed, sir, said Martha, she cannot go, and
you, sir, must stay, likewise.
But there was father Antonio, some one would be
obliged
to gowhen Dennis said, Devil a fear of him
sure won't I be there. Finally it was settled that Jack
Jinkins and Dennis should go: and Mary, seating
herself
by the side of the Don, and taking hold of his hand,
said He must reconcile himself to stay; to which
he assented.
I must gratify the reader with a partial disclosure,
(but it wil be partial, of a few matters which occurred
between myself and Leanora that evening, while the
company was otherwise engaged. I proposed to her to
fix upon some day, and not a very distant one, for our
union. She said a week, I wished it the next day, and
so we split the differenceand the third day from that
was finally agreed upon. She had previously given me
to understand that she had been questioned by her father
respecting my views, that she had briefly imparted to
him what he might expect.
On the evening appointed, Leanora and I were united,
to the great joy of our friends, and still greater of
ourselves
.
Thus having brought the narrative of the
principal
incidents of my life (so far) to a happy conclusion,
I have but little more to add.
And here I must remark, what never fell within my
knowledge until after my marriage, and that is, that the
individual least noticed in the narrative, is perhaps the
most interesting and efficient character connected with
it, I mean father Antonio.
To his instructions Leanora was indebted for those
principles which influenced her conduct, and disposed her
to acts of charity and benevolence. He had attended
her from infancy, and devoted all his time and talents
to her instruction. Antonio was a confessor to
Leanora's
grand-mother, in Portugal; and after her death, he
accompanied her daughter to Mexico. This last, when
on her death bed, conjured him never to forsake her
daughter; but if she lived, to educate her in the
principles
of virtue and religion, and if possible, convey her
from Mexico, which she detested.
In short, she could not have consigned her daughter to
the care of a more deserving man. He possessed all the
elegance and refinement of a gentleman, and all the
piety
of a saint; and was, in every respect, the most
amiable
of his species; and through him his pupil became
what she was, the mirror of every virtue.
In a word, father Antonio was no other than Sir
William
?
When Leanora's mother, to whom he was much
attached, was carried off by her mother to Portugal,
Antonio followed her thither; but before he could
discover
the place of her residence, she was married to Don
Emanuel. Disappointed in his hopes, he became
disgusted
with the world, and took holy orders. Thus
having devoted his life to the church, he assumed the
name of Antonio, and under the disguise of a Spanish
priest, became a confessor in the same family of her,
who had once been the object of his ardent affection.
After the decease of the mother, he accompanied the
daughter to Mexico, in the same capacity. Nor did
she ever mistrust his person until he revealed it himself
on her death bed.
Horton continued to live happily with his wife, and
was increasing rapidly in wealth and reputation. The
M'Callester's had left New-York, Dr. N, with
whom I corresponded informed me; but whither they
were gone, he knew not.
The Simpsons still remain in Philadelphia. Clarissa,
who corresponds with Mary, states that Eliza and
Matilda
are happily married to respectable mechanics, and
the old lady resides with Eliza. Clarissa's husband
continues to behave well; but his father will not suffer
him to have any hand in money matters. Her own
health, however, continues delicate, and a trip to the
mineral springs of Virginia was prescribed by her
physicians
.
Sullivan, also, remains in Philadelphia, it being
better
suited to his calling, which is that of a
ship-carpenter
.
Jinkins had joined Ferdinand and the commodore, in
mercantile business, and, out of respect for Jack, he
refused
to resume his father's name.
Old Jack continues to live with Jinkins, who treats
him with all the filial affection of a son.
After the flurry of war, and my subsequent marriage
was over, I had leisure to observe how uncle Thomas
kept his reckoning with the young squadron. There
were four. Uncle, said I one evenining, how do
you manage to steer clear of all those little ones? Do
they not annoy you?
An I han't been dinned wi' um till I be a most
crazy
.
It be nothing but squalls, from mornin' till night.
But your little Charles, (the name he gave his son,)
is such a sweet little boy, you never get angry with him?
Oh, I likes the little rogue well enough, when it be
in good humor. Old Sambo is in his glory, dandling
his young master on his knee, and leading him about.
After spending three weeks with my friends, at
New-Orleans
,
I took leave of them, and set out for
Tennessee
,
where I at present reside. Besides my wife, I was
accompanied by her father, Antonio, and Dennis.
Wilson
and Mary choosing to spend the winter in
New-Orleans
.
On our journey, our carriage broke down, in the night,
within a few miles of Captain Wilson's. We were
driving
pretty fast, in order to reach the captain's that night,
when one of the tires suddenly dropped from the wheel.
The accident happened near a new log cabin, on the
road-side; and, though the prospect was not very
flattering
,
it was much better than spending the night in the
woods. Taking Leanora's arm, I approached the house,
and, relating our misfortune, asked accommodation for
the night.
Lord save us! said Matty, if it isn't his honour.
You are ten thousand times welcome. I'm sure, had it
been my father out of the grave, I would not have been
glader
till
see him. And do ye think, we were just
talking
about ye, the very minute ye spoke at the door. I
told her to get us something to eata cup of coffee or
tea, if she had any, and prepare a place for Leanora to
lie down, and the rest of us could sit up till morning.
And troth have I both tea and coffee, and good
loafsugar
;
and do ye know, I have three as good
featherbeds
as ever ye slept on. Didn't I buy them wi' the
money that your honur's uncle
gift
me? And troth, it
was a lucky day that.
William had no opportunity to say a word, till Matty
went to prepare supper; when he informed me that
he had arrived in Tennessee, about four months
before
,
and met with a kind reception from captain Wilson,
with whom I had left directions to provide for him, if he
should arrive in my absence; as I thought he might
probably
follow the advice which I gave him in New-York.
In a short time, supper was ready. After doing
particular
honour to Matty's good things, we were all
comfortably
lodged, some on the floor and some on bedsteads,
all in one room; while the family climbed up a ladder,
into the loft, as these log cabins are called.
Next morning I sent to captain Wilson's, which was
only three miles distant, for a carriage, and proceeded to
his house.
Mrs. Wilson had been dead about six months. The
old man, however, was alive and well, and often
ensnares
me into one of his long stories.
Nor must I forget two other individuals, equally
entitled
to notice: I mean Unco and his uncle. Cold must
be the heart, and lost to the best feelings of our nature
would be the man, who would not do homage to virtues
like theirs. To account for their attachment to the
family
of Leanora, it need only be mentioned, that they
both owed their lives to the humanity of Leanora's
mother.
Shortly after her arrival in Mexico, these Indians
were on some trivial account condemned to death; but
through her intercession were pardoned, and ever
after
became strongly attached to her family.
Old Pompey is still alive, (I mean when these memoirs
were written in 1816) as fat as a seal, and as frolicsome
as a colt, though his eye-sight is not so good as formerly.
But the glory and amusement of my family, is
Dennis
,
who is quite
lifted up
. I always said so, I could
see how it would end, he would often say, I always
told my lady, you were not sent there for nothing.
The last I heard of my friends in New-Orleans, they
were well, except that uncle Thomas, and his favorite
Ling, were sometimes afflicted with the gout.Salem
,
July 23, 1681.
Dear Friend
You complain, in your last, of the
violent
proceedings of your town on the old subject; but it
is trifling, compared to the zeal of our minister.
Though my health is little improved, since I wrote you
last, yet I went to hear Mr. Williams, last Sabbath. I
was shocked at the discourse; but, dear Thomas, it
would cost me my life, if this were known. He raged,
he stamped, he foamed at the mouth, and all this for a
mere phantoma shadow. Strange, that our teachers
should set such examples of wrath. I am sure, Christ
enjoins it upon us, to be meek and lowly. But I will try
to give you a plain account of some of the sermon. He
said that the cross of St. George, in the English
colours
,
was a downright popish relict; that it was
Idolatry
,
and popish whoredom, to retain this ensign of
hellish
superstition. But his language would be too
tiresome
to you, and withal, not edifying. So much did his
discourse affect the congregation, that they held a
meeting
,
that same evening, and passed a decree, that it
should be publicly cut out of the colours, and should
never
be seen amongst God's people. I am very
doubtful
that this is not the right waymoreover, our
minister
and another one, by the name of Roberts, had some
very uncivil talk that same evening. This cannot be
the right waywe have lost it, somehow. We are, in
truth, without teachers; for I would put no more faith
in this madman, Williams, than I would in Satan. It
puts me in mind of a saying of Luther's friend,
Mclancthon
,
of Wittemberg. He said that he longed to
be dissolved, and that for two reasonsfirst, that he
might enjoy the much desired presence of Christ, and
the heavenly churchsecondly, that he might be freed
from the cruel and implacable discords of divines.
But I shall not, I trust, be long in this turbulent world.
I am heart-sick of it. What a monster is man! Better
had we remained in England:I could laugh, there;
here I dare not smile. Adieu, dear friend, &c. &c.Dear Charles
So soon as thee receives this letter,
thee will proceed home without delay.I am ruined!
All my effects were seized yesterday, to satisfy Clark
& Co. of Liverpool, vs. Burlington & Co. I do not
understand
this; I am bewildered; something is wrong
in this business. I did not know that I owed that
house aught, except part of the last importation;
but I know nothing, nor can I do any thing. Haste thee
home with all speed. I am very much indisposedthy
mother is distracted; we need thy presence and
assistance
.
The family send their greeting to thy young
friend.
Your distressed Father,
C.
Burlington
.Very Dear Friend
Your situation is one that admits
of little reliefnothing but time can heal the wounds of
the heart. But permit me to mingle my tears with
yourspermit me to say that I feel for your sufferings,
and that on a double account; but this is too tender a
subject, and yet I cannot forbear. Dear Charles,
forgive
me, for in your breast alone I would repose the
secret
of my heart; but I dare not name itcannot you
guess, oh, dearest Charles? Write to me, quickly, and
let me know. But I am ravingI sat down to console
you, whilst I need consolation myself. I shall see you,
at the end of the term, at all hazardsin the mean time,
2*
let me know whether I may dare to hopeyou
understand
me. Say to your sister, that her sorrows are
mine. You say she weeps incessantly.Oh, God! tell
her it wounds me to the heartnever again write to me
thus. Dear Charles, you have pierced my soul. Say
something to relieve me.Accept the trifle I send you,
until you can make it convenient to return it. Do not let
this mark of my eternal regard for you, wound your
delicacyyou know my heartyou know if I were in
your situation, and you in mine, that I would be proud
to give you this proof of our friendship. Know, from
henceforth, that what is mine is yours. Your very
distressed
friend,
HENRY WILSON.Sir
Agreeable to your request I waited on Mr.
Hunter and demanded a settlement: he said he was
ready
,
and forthwith we proceeded to the place where his
books were kept. Upon examining the accounts between
him and your father I am sorry to inform you that he
brings your father in debt. Upon presenting the account
you sent me, he denied the whole; and made use of
language
that is useless to repeat to you. I do think
myself
that your account is just; but you can get nothing
of Hunter. The property you spoke of was sold a few
days since for the benefit of Clark & Co.: therefore
Hunter is insolvent. It is thought, pretty generally,
that the goods were purchased by his friends and with
his own money. You ask of Hunters reputationhe
has hitherto been esteemed an honest man and a fair
dealer; but since your affair, he has fallen very much in
the esteem of the public. It is hinted here that he laid
this plan of treachery when last in Liverpool; the agent
for that house says he failed for the sum for which the
seizure was made. I am very sorry for your situation,
and have no comfort for you but the very poor ones of
patience and resignation. Should you have any farther
commands in this city I will attend to them with
pleasure
.Yours,
respectfully, &c.Dear Henry
.You will receive this by Captain T.,
who has undertaken to visit you and learn your true
situation
.
Your captivity has afflicted us with the deepest
sorrow; your mother is unconsolable and refuses to be
comforted. Our Government is negociating your
ransom
,
which is attended with much difficulty; but I
expect
it will soon be brought about: if them Spanish dogs
don't cut your throat or something worse, you will
receive
one thousand dollars. If that will set you at
liberty
I shall think it well laid out. I am in too much
trouble to say more.
Your Affectionate Father,
T. WILSON.You will recollect, said she, that my father
promised
to see the Vice Roy and ask his permission for your
friend to deliver the letter; he promised you he would
go that evening and accordingly he went, but was unable
to get an audiance that evening. After his return he
came into my parlour, as he always does when he
concludes
the business of the day. Whilst he was talking
in a careless manner, and growing sleepy he yawned and
observed,
I am afraid we are to be troubled with another
prisoner
.
I enquired who, where and how?
He then related the circumstance of your friend's visit,
and said from what he could understand, he would not
be allowed to depart the country.
This was the first I had heard of his arrival. I said
very little then, but determined within myself to effect
his escape if possible, if he was not already in custody.
Accordingly when my father retired, I sent for Dennis
to know where the young man was, but Dennis could
give me no information; he had seen him, or at least a
man that he took to be him, walking with his master
late in the evening, but that was all he knew of the
matter
.
I was seriously alarmed, expecting it was over
with him perhaps by that time. I sent Dennis, out,
however, to see if he could make any discovery, but to
no purpose. Yesterday about ten o'clock he came to our
house, and Dennis who was standing centry on the
outside
of the gate, knew him immediately and brought him
privately to me, when I apprized him of his danger.
He said if he was once on his horse they might catch
him if they could.
But I advised him not to leave the city till dark; but
how to conceal him was the question, as every house
would be searched, and finally sending my woman abroad
on some pretence, I desired Dennis to conduct him to my
chamber where he locked the door and gave me the key.
Had he not taken shelter the moment he did, he must
have fallen into the hands of his enemies, as they came
to the house a few minutes afterwards in company with
my father, who had just returned from the Vice Roy.
My father after making enquiry of the servants
whether
they had seen the stranger (which of course they had
not) desired the guard to wait at the gate and apprehend
him as he came in, as he was expected shortly, to hear
the result of his petition respecting the letter. They
watched there the whole day, and another party way-laid
the prison expecting he would attempt to see you.
Dennis
and I had a difficult part to act, and though the odds
were against us we determined to effect his escape if
possible. The first thing to be done was to ascertain
from the stranger where his horse (upon which he
seemed
to stake his safety) was to be found. This by his
direction
was done in the course of the day by Dennis.
The stranger continued in my chamber till dark and then
withdrew privately to his horse, which Dennis had
prepared
for him. On taking leave of me he handed me
the papers and begged me to convey them to you, adding
that if he could get but half an hour the start of his
enemies
he defied them, as his horse was the fleetest of his
kind.
My father was much concerned at his disappearance,
and took an active part in the pursuit which was
immediately
set on foot. Lights were procured and diligent
search was made throughout the city to discover the way
he had taken. The whole city was alarmed and patrols
dispatched after him in all directions, these have
returned
without making any discovery, and I hope he is out of
danger.
Incomprehensible lady, said Wilson, how much
do we owe you: can we ever requite kindness like yours?
We united in expressions of gratitude and admiration,
but generosity like hers sets language at defiance.
When we forget you, madam, said I, may heaven
forget us.
She said he took the road to Vera Cruz, at which
place he informed her a vessel waited for him, the same
which brought him from the United States.
After her departure we looked at the manuscript, and
eagerly perused the following narrative:
We, your unfortunate companions, were seriously
afflicted at your sudden disappearance on the day of our
separation in . At one time we thought you were
lost in the forest, and again that you had abandoned us
with design, and some there were amongst us that
suggested
the truth as we afterwards discovered. The
circumstance
gave us infinite pain, and myself not the least:
when morning appeared, you came not. We came to an
immediate resolution to go in search of you in a body,
thinking it imprudent to separate. Accordingly we
traversed
the forest that day without making any discovery,
till about sundown, when we came upon the trace of
horses
.
We took the back track and proceeded but a short
distance before we discovered the place where you were
apprehended. This was confirmed by a pistol found
at the place, and pieces of cord fresh cut with a knife;
the pistol we knew belonged to the horsemen whoever
they were, being different from any in our possession.
The trampled appearance of the ground, all taken
together
left little doubt of your captivity.
We turned about with all haste, and taking the trace
of the horses pursued it till dark, when we could no
longer discern the trace, we stopped for the night,
resolving
to renew the pursuit in the morning at all hazards,
breaking our fast for the first time that day upon the
fruit that spontaneously grew near our encampment and
quenching our thirst from a small rivulet of bad tasted
water at the same place. We set forward by the dawn
of day and continued to pursue the trace of the horses
till noon, when it brought us to a small villageat this
place we learned your fate from the inhabitants, who
were principally Indians. No language could depict our
sorrow at this intelligence, the truth of which we had
too much reason to believe.
We now held a counsel, in which it was unanimously
agreed to abide by the opinion of the majoritythe
result
was that we should procure what provisions the
village
afforded either by force or fair means, return home
with all possible despatch, and exert every means in our
power to procure your ransom. We found no difficulty
in procuring as much provision as each man was able to
carry, consisting of Indian corn and yams; we laid
down the money which the inhabitants did not refuse,
and set out for home. The Indians at the village
informed
us (in the course of our short interview) that a
large body of Spaniards were in the woods in search of
us. This intelligence was sufficient of itself to quicken
our march.
We travelled that day, the succeeding night, the next
day and half the ensuing night without sleep, expecting
momentarily to be overtaken by the Spaniards. Being
unable to support the want of sleep any longer, we lay
down about midnight. I had but stretched myself on
the ground when I heard the trampling of horses, and
(as I thought) men talking; as the noise was only heard
by myself, I ascribed it to a disturbed mind, but a few
moments proved it to be no phantom, the trampling and
voices being distinctly heard by the whole party.
Convinced
that it was reality, I desired every man to make
readythe sound was not immediately in our rearit
appeared to be on our rightthe night was dark, the
sky being overcast with clouds, and lest our fire might
betray us, we sprung to our feet and moved obliquely a
few hundred yards lest they might stumble immediately
upon us. We moved with the utmost silence and fell on
their rear: the noise soon died away and laying down
we slept sound till morning.
We had intended to rest that day and parch corn for
our journey, but the occurrence of the night induced us
to change our resolution, and we pursued our journey
sufficing our hunger with fruit which we plucked as we
walked alongwe charged our guns afresh and
determined
to oppose force by force and fight to the last man,
should we be attacked.
It was not long before our courage was put to the trial;
before ten o'clock we were overtaken by about two
hundred
Spaniards on horseback, armed principally with
swords and pistols. It is evident from the sequel that
these fellows knew nothing of our mode of fighting, or
they never would have approached us in the manner they
did. They were mounted on mules, and rode up to us at
a round trot, calling out as they approached (in their
language, to surrender, but we made them no answer
except
by a volley discharged from our rifles when they
were within shot. I called to my men to take good aim
and every one kill his man: no sooner said than done.
and down fell most of the Spaniards,
[4]
[4]
The Sober Irishman, a horse well known
the rest fled
without
firing a shot and even without looking behind them.
We charged our rifles and pursued our journey.
In the course of the day we came upon a few
scattering
huts inhabited by Indians; here we halted and
parched
our corn enough to last us to New-Orleans, to which
place we bent our course. We were not so confident of
our valour as to neglect setting guard whenever we
stopped
,
to prevent surprise. At this place we procured
some Buffalo flesh and other refreshments, afraid to use
our ammunition for the purpose of providing food. We
felt grateful to these Indians who treated us with great
kindness and hospitality, and had it not been that the
Spaniards might return with a superior force, we should
have remained here some time to recruit our strength
and spirits, but the idea of subjecting ourselves to the
necessity of another engagement, influenced us to
continue
our journey.
These Indians had informed us that there was a great
river just before us, (the same that terrified us on our
journey to) and gave us information that by going up
the river we would come to other Indians who would
furnish
us with canoes and aid us in crossing it; they also
gave us general directions, which in the end proved very
convenient. These were the mildest and most friendly
Indians I ever met with, and had it not been for fear of
the Spaniards they would have conducted us on our way.
In the course of a few hours we arrived at the river,
and pursuing their directions we reached the Indians,
crossed the river and continued our course for
New-Orleans
without further interruption from the
Spaniards
.
But to recount to you the hardships we endured
from hunger, thirst, fatigue and sickness, would surpass
the ordinary power of language. We travelled for days
through endless prairies, parched with the sun, and
without a drop of water; at another time we would be
immersed in swamps up to our middles and almost every
man sick. We could have killed enough to satisfy the
cravings of hunger, but our whole cry was water, being
parched up with fevers. Had you seen us seated on the
banks of a prodigious river, while one of us was feebly
wielding the axe, for the purpose of constructing a raft,
with scarcely strength enough to raise the weight of it.
Had you seen us scattered over those boundless forests,
some supported by others, as they feebly walked on in
search of water, all eloquent with grief at our
disappointment
,
you would have congratulated yourselves
upon your not unhappier fate. It is wonderful how we
surmounted such a complication of calamities. Perhaps
human fortitude never sustained greater. Seven of our
number found relief in death. Poor Murray, Herbert,
and  fell victims to the scene of misery I have
described
.
We scraped a little earth over them, each
envying their happier lot
As soon as we arrived in Tennessee, I hastened to
apprize
Captain Wilson of your situation, advising him to
apply to our government immediately to obtain your
ransom
;
nor did I leave him till I saw a messenger
dispatched
to Washington for the purpose. But the old
gentlemen, to say nothing of Mrs. Wilson, would not
rest until I consented to visit Mexico to ascertain
your real situation. No one would undertake the
dangerous
task but myselfHoward did once agree to come,
by whom I intended to have sent this, but when it came
to the test his courage failed him. I expect to remain
here until you are liberated.
T.Your friend is still here, he has been with me often.
He is disguised in the habit of an Indian, and has two
fleet horses ready, and now the nights being dark, you
may expect him. Heaven grant you may get safe to
your country, where you will sometimes deign to think
of
LEANORA.May
15
th
, 1808.
Dearest Charles
I received your kind letter of November last, in
which you congratulated me on my happy asylumalas,
my dear brother! this proves how little you know of the
worldmuch better, had it pleased Divine Providence,
that I had followed my parents to the grave! Much
better
for me, had I been destitute of those advantages, to
which alone, perhaps, I owe my present distress. But
I will try and compose myself, if it be possible, for the
purpose of acquainting you with the principal incidents
which have happened to me of late.
For six months after you left me, the Simpsons
behaved
toward me with all the attention I had a right to
expect; the substance of which I communicated to you,
in a letter, to which your last was an answer; but since
then they have proved themselves traitors of the
blackest
die.
I should have apprised you sooner of their conduct,
and that of their accomplice, Hunter, the son of the
wretch who broke the hearts of my parents; but
knowing
your temper I did not wish to involve you in a
quarrel
that might cost you your life, (my last and only stay)
but could not undo the past. No, to that God to whom
vengeance belongs let us leave them.
Notwithstanding the overstrained politeness of the
Simpsons, I could discern from the first a great degree
of pride and contempt towards me, particularly when
any of the young gentlemen of the neighbourhood would
call to spend a leisure hour of an evening. It
sometimes
happened that these young men would prefer my
company and conversation to that of the Simpsons (God
knows I would gladly have dispensed with the honour.)
On those occasions, I could perceive their sly significant
looks, the contemptuous nods and whispers.When the
gentlemen would retire I was called the belleno
beaux for themwe stand no chance where Mary is!
All this I could have borne, but the hateful addresses of
young Simpson were insupportable. Being tutored to
this by his sisters. I could get no peace for him;
he would intrude into my chamber, and take such
liberties
that I had resolved to quit the house. For several
days I had kept myself locked up in my room, to avoid
this detested coxcomb, scarcely taking the necessary
sustenance, and whenever I left the chamber for this
purpose, I was sure to meet with insults from the sisters,
and impertinence from the brother.
Oh, miss is very coy sometimes, if it were such
a one, or such a one, she would be more
condescending
.
Though I bore this usage in silence, yet my heart
was full of grief, and my eyes with tears.
One evening while I was deliberating where I should
go, or what I should do, I heard the family sitting down
to supper without taking the least notice of me! I had
not been insulted so often as to be callous to this fresh
indignity
.
After the clattering of knives and forks had ceased,
I walked down stairs for a candle and a glass of water.
In passing through the supper-room, from which the
company had not withdrawn. I discovered several
gentlemen
of my acquaintance, who saluted me as I passed
on to the closet, which contained the candles.
I returned their salute with a silent bow, without
seating
myself or being invited to do so; and as I returned I
discovered the son of our old enemy, (Hunter) amongst
the number of guests, with his eyes bent on me. I
averted
my face from the group as quick as possible, and
withdrew
to my chamber with a trembling step and
beating
heart.
I heard the girls gigling a forced laugh behind me,
poor souls! how truly low they appeared in my eyes at
that instant.I need not tell you how I spent the night;
my dear Charles will enter too readily into my feelings:
13
I resolved, however, that it should be the last day I would
spend in the house.
The next morning before breakfast I stepped across
the street to a Mr. F's, with whom I had a slight
acquaintance, and begged him to aid me in procuring
another lodging, or house to board at, until my brother
would either come or send for me, saying that I could not
be happy at Mr. Simpson's.
He appeared surprised, and asked me what was the
matter. I replied, that my reasons I wished to
conceal
,
at least until the arrival of my brother; that I had
few friends in the place, and wished to say as little about
the family as possible; that it was a question he could
not expect me to answer, and that if he felt disposed to
aid me, it were well; if not, I would intrude no longer
upon him. I was much hurt that he met my confidence
with such cold indifference.
He said he would
see about it
, but at present he could
not think of any place that would suit me. He and his
family were sitting at breakfast; they invited me to sit
down with them, but I could not, although I had eaten
nothing since the preceding morning. After breakfast
he took his hat and walked out; I imagined he was gone
to engage a place for me, and resolved to await his
return
.
He returned in about a half an hour, but I discovered
from his countenance that he had done nothing for me
Not wishing to protract my visit any longer, I asked
him if he had succeeded.
He replied that he had not tried, as he had had a
great deal of business of his
own
to attend. I did not
wait to hear the end of the sentence, but left the house,
surmising what I afterwards found to be true, that he
had been to Simpson's, and they had prejudiced him
against me.
The Miss Simpsons had been in the habit of borrowing
money of me, until they had nearly deprived me of all
that you gave me at partingat length I was
constrained
to deny them; indeed, I had but very little left. I
know you will blame me for this part of my conduct, but
my dear brother you little know the sacrifices a poor
friendless female is compelled to make, to secure
tolerable
treatment from a brutish world. I now resolved to
demand my money, as well as my necklace and rings,
which I had lent the girls to show out at balls and other
public places. Accordingly, when I returned to their
house, I walked to the young ladies' parlour, and there
I beheld again the hated Hunter in close conversation
with them. Telling Clarissa, the oldest, that I wished
to speak with her, she got up and came towards me. On
getting beyond the hearing of those in the parlour, I was
going to speak, when I heard the old lady say,
I wonder where her ladyship has been gossiping
last evening and this morning; she has not been either
to tea or breakfast.
Advancing a step or two in that direction whence the
voice proceeded, I replied,
If you mean me, madam, I was in my chamber last
night. I did not come to tea because I was not sent for;
I have been abroad this morning, but I don't consider
myself accountable to you for my conduct.
I then turned to Miss Simpson and told her I was in
want of money, and would be glad if she could return
the trifle I had loaned her.
Oh dear, is that what you wanted?Indeed, you
might have saved yourself the trouble, for I haven't got
any money; indeed, I never thought of such a trifle
since.
She was walking off, when I addressed her again:
You say very true, madam, when you call the money
I lent you a trifle; but I am in want even of that trifle.
Finding that she continued to proceed without paying
further attention to me, I followed her up.
Well, madam, let me have my necklace and rings
which I lent you some time since.
I know nothing about your old rings or your
necklace
;
ask Matilda about them. I haven't time to be
standing here all dayI've something else to do. At
the same time she had two of the rings on her fingers.
The old lady now appearedMa, don't you think
she has the assurance to claim these rings that you
know pa bought for me at the auction two years ago.
Why, really these are fine doings; indeed, miss,
you'll take the command of the house next. I wish Mr.
Simpson were at home, to know what's to be done, I'm
sorry he ever took you into the house.
Yes, I wish pa was herehe'd turn her out of doors.
You may seek another home, rejoined the mother:
fine doings indeedI'll have no such doings about my
house.
Madam, said I, I lent your daughters money
and jewels; I am in want of them, and I now demand
them; and as for leaving your house, I intended to do so
very shortly.
Get out of my house; begone this instant, you
impudent
wretch, nor dare to repeat your lies.
Yes, indeed mama, she is the biggest liar in the
world.
I turned away from them and walking up stairs,
locked
up my things in my trunk, walked down stairs again,
and without saying a word to the family, left the house.
I remember gaining the street, and a giddiness in my
head, but no more! When I recovered my senses, I
found myself in a strange house, and two ladies (God I
hope will reward them) were standing by me, one with
hartshorn in her hand, the other with a glass of wine.
To their kind enquiries I gave satisfactory answers,
concealing nothing but the name of the people who had
treated me so cruelly. On telling them how long it had
been since I had eaten any thing, toast and tea were
prepared
for me in a few minutes.
After eating I felt quite restored. Mrs. Cary (that
was the lady's name) said she happened to be standing
in the door and seeing a gentleman running apparently as
fast as he could, she stepped out to see what was the
matter. On observing me extended on the pavement,
she likewise ran, telling Martha (her daughter) to bring
the hartshorn. This gentleman and herself brought me
into her house, where I soon recovered.
This widow lady (for a widow she is) has offered me
an asylum in her house. She is indigent, but humanity
itself; she has one child only, a daughter, but she is a
treasure; she is an angel in human shape.
In the evening as we were sitting down to tea, a
gentle
rap was heard at the door: it was opened by
Martha
,
and a gentleman entered the parlour.
I beg pardon, ladies, for intruding: but I came to
see how this young lady is.
Was it to you, sir, said I, that I am so much
indebted
?
He made no answer, except by a modest bow.
I thanked him as I ought, and told him I had a brother
who would be proud to acknowledge the obligation,
should he ever be so happy as to see him.
The gentleman said he hoped I would command him
in any thing; that his name was Dupon, and that he
hoped I would honour him with my confidence. He took
a cup of tea, and after chatting with us an hour or two,
departed.
Next morning I sent for my trunks, and endeavoured
to be happy. The third evening after this, as Martha
and myself were sitting at work, a little boy came in
and handing me a paper disappeared. It ran in these
words: A stranger at No.  has a message from Miss
Burlington's brother. He is confined, otherwise he
would have done himself the pleasure of waiting upon
her.
I flew to the place, enquired for the stranger, who was
`up in a chamber.' Show me the way, said I.
Upon
entering the room, I found no one. I turned to come
out, when a man rushed in, and the door locked on the
outside! It was Hunter! I shrieked as loud as I was
able. At that instant a voice exclaimed on the outside,
Villain, desist, and open the door this instant.
The key is on the outside, said I.
There is no key here.
Then break the door down.
If he does, I'll blow him to hl, said the ruffian
Hunter.
The door flew open and I made my escape.
Run up stairs, for God's sake, or murder will be
done, said I to two gentlemen whom I saw on gaining
the street.
My re-appearance, so sudden, and with looks so pale,
13*
alarmed Mrs. Cary and her sympathizing daughter. I
told them what had happened, and resolved never to go
out alone again. It is unnecessary for me to make any
comments on my situation; you must think what I feel;
you must pity me; you must succour me; fly to me as
quick as possible, my dear Charles.
When I became sufficiently composed we sat down to
supper, and my dear brother, who should enter but my
kind deliverer Dupon.
Do not be alarmed, ladies, I came to see how Miss
Burlington was, and reproach her for not waiting to
thank me this evening.
He had several drops of blood on his bosom, which he
endeavoured to conceal, and his face was much bruised.
That I thanked him you are sure, but what are thanks
when put in competition with his life and my safety?
Heaven has certainly appointed him my guardian angel.
He informed us that he apprehended some mischief from
a partial discovery of the plot in the morning, while
sitting
in a reading room. As he was reading a newspaper
he overheard two men (who sat near him) conversing
earnestly in a low voice; a few words only of the subject
caught his ear, viz: No.  in street at sunset
Burlington
and I'll be revenged.
He knew the house to be ours from referring to a
memorandum
he made in his pocket book upon the day on
which he carried me to it out of the street, and hearing
my name pronounced, he mistrusted some evil. I
hovered
near your dwelling, said he, the whole of the
afternoon
,
taking care to be armed. I saw a boy go into
the house at the time mentioned, and shortly after saw
you come out of it and walk very fast up the street. I
followed you at a short distance, keeping my eye upon
youI was close at your heels when you entered the
house. I entered it almost at the same instant, and heard
the direction given to you to walk up stairs. I was so
close behind you that I heard the door shut and the key
turn, and gained the door the moment you shrieked out
for help. I met an elderly female near the door, and
had I known at the moment it was her who carried off
the key, I would have sacrificed her upon the spot. I
began to shiver the door with all my strength, when the
old woman soon ran to me with the key, and you made
your escape. I was so much enraged with the ruffian
that I should have shot him dead on the spot, had the
old woman not caught my arm; the moment he
discovered
this, he flew at me and attempted to wrest the
pistol
out of my hand, but finding the attempt fruitless, he
struck me on the face, whilst I was engaged in shaking
off the old woman. The moment he struck me. I kicked
him down, and as he attempted to rise I kicked him again
on the nose, and the blood gushing out I got a few drops
on my vest. Just as I gave him the second kick, two
gentlemen ran into the room and separated us. Hunter
(that is his name) is committed, and I am held to bailI
expect to be acquitted if I could prevail on myself to
have the testimony of Miss
Before he finished the sentence I interrupted him,
saying
that nothing would give me more pleasure than to
attend his trial.
I shall not conclude this, until the trial is over, which
is to-morrow at ten o'clock. From the description he
gave us of the other man, it must have been young
Simpson.
The trial is overDupon is acquitted and Hunter
committed
for further investigation. The old woman, who
it appears, kept a house of suspicious character, has
likewise
been taken up. I shall expect you soon. Your
very distressed sister.
M. BURLINGTON.Dear Charles
What has become of you? Have you forgot your
Mary? Are you alive? Oh, for heaven's sake send me
but one line, but one wordI ask no more. But it is in
vainyou cannot be livingwhat has become of
Wilson
?
has he too forgot me? Alas then, I have no friend!
ye cannot both be dead!but I will cease to complain
Oh that God would take me to himself! There was but
twobut no matterand yet I cannot think that if
living
,
you would forget me. My last letter you never
answered
I
heeded that not, as I expected to see yourself.
I looked not for a letter, but I looked in vain for either.
This is the last I shall trouble you with; I shall ask no
more for help, where no help is to be found.
In my last I disclosed enough to move a brother's
affection
;
to move a brother's pity; to awaken a brother's
honour. But my once, and ever dear Charles, that
disclosure
was only the beginning of sorrows. Though I
despair of aid from you, yet it will relieve my oppressed
heart, to pour out its feelings, whether you regard them
or not.
Taking up my calamitous story where I left off in my
last letter to you, I continued to reside with Mrs. Cary
better than three months; during which time the family
was often visited by Dupon, and sometimes by other
young gentlemen of his, and Mrs. Cary's acquaintance.
Dupon in his various visits it appeared, had declared
himself an admirer of Miss Martha. But I pass over
things of no consequence, to those which ought to
concern
a brother deeply for a suffering sister. Briefly
then, the Simpsons I suspect (for I have given myself to
trouble to trace it up) reported that Mrs. Cary kept a
house of equivocal characterthat is in a better way,
and not upon so general or notorious a plan as such
houses
are kept. Dupon lay under suspicions with Mrs.
Cary. This report was long in circulation before its
innocent
subjects had the least knowledge of it. Whether
Dupon had any intimation of it or not must remain a
matter of conjecture, as he left the countrycertain it
is, that he for some time before his departure, was less
frequent in his visits, and appeared thoughtful, and more
distant than upon our first acquaintance. He left this
place suddenly for the West Indies, where it seems he
had some important business to transact. Whether this
change in his behaviour, towards the family of Mrs.
Cary, was the effect of distrust, or proceeded from a
desire
to avoid giving grounds for suspicion is equally
doubtful.
Before his departure he gave Mrs. Cary a draft for
five hundred dollars. This act of benevolence proved
a source of overwhelming distress to us all. Her
drawing
the money was proof, strong as holy writ, of her
guilt; it confirmed the report, and poor Mrs. Cary, as
innocent as an angel, was now stigmatized the worst of
characters. But I will try to use some connection.A
few mornings after she drew the money, as we were
sitting
down to breakfast, Mr.  who owned the
house she lived in, came inhe refused to be seated; but
in a very peremptory manner bid her quit his house,
adding
that he had rented it to another person; that he
desired
no such person as she was to live in a house of his
or so near to that in which his family residedto be
plain with you, madam, I shall suffer no such people to
live near me!
This address was like a clap of thunder; the cup
dropped from Mrs. Cary's hand
What is that you say sir? such persons live near
youas he turned his back upon her with a
contemptuous
good morning ladies.
It having struck me instantly that I was the cause of
this unmerited reproach, I sprang after him, caught
him by the breast of his coat, and implored him in a flood
of tears to tell me what Mrs. Cary was accused ofmy
dear sir, tell me, I live with her, it concerns me.
He interrupted me with begone you viperyou
would seduce me too, pushing me roughly from him.
I got into the house, I know not how.
What did he say? enquired Martha, as I entered
the door.
Give me my bonnet, Martha, said her mother
with great composure, though as pale as death.
Dear madam, said I, do take some refreshment
before you walk, you have eat nothing yet, pouring out
a cup of tea for her as I spoke.
No Mary my child, none to-day, I cannot
I entreated her, but she gently pushed the cup from
her. While Martha was putting on her bonnet and
shawl, I approached her with a glass of wine, spilling
great part of it, with my trembling handsDrink
this, then, said I, or you will faint in the street.
That would never do, said she, taking the wine
Dupon is not here to aidme.
She then stepped into the street and was absent,
perhaps
,
an hour. While she was gone Martha and
myself
indulged in mutual condolence, suggesting a
thousand
conjecturesmy suspicion, however, fastened on
the Simpsons.
When Mrs. Cary returned she threw herself into a
chair, and burst into a flood of tears! Martha sat down
by her, drying her own eyes and endeavouring to
comfort
her mother. I walked the floor in a state of
distraction
,
calling on the Almighty to defend the innocent
hapless widow. I bewailed my hard fate in being the
cause of such bitter distress; I remonstrated with him,
that he did not rather let it all fall on me; I called aloud
upon youOh, my brother, how cheerfully I would
have met death at that moment!
When Mrs. Cary's grief had somewhat subsided, I
threw myself on a chair before her, and taking her
hands in mineI am the unfortunate wretch, madam,
that has brought this distress upon you, my dear
mother
,
for you are more than mother to mecan you ever
forgive me? do you not repent your kindness towards
me?
Forgive you, child? you are guilty of no fault; but
my children we must leave this place. No, Mary, if it
were to do again, I would act the same part which I
have
She was interrupted by a knocking at the door; I
opened it and a woman entered whom I had often seen at
Simpsons, and had marked her as an ignorant, vain,
steel-hearted gossip, always retailing scandal. She
had called twice or three times at Mrs. Cary's since I
had made it my home.
Hey day, says she, what's the matter?
None of us making her an answer, she stayed but a
short time. She was, no doubt, sent by the Simpsons,
who wished to enjoy our distress.
Mrs. Cary then went on to relate, that in the first
place she went to see a Mr.  whom she had always
considered in the light of a friendhe was not at home,
he had set out the preceding day for Philadelphia. Not
wishing to mention her distress to his wife, she left the
house, and on her return called to see a Mrs. Jones, a
poor but humble friend, who had received many marks
of Mrs. Cary's bounty, and always appeared what she
really was, grateful and sincere. To her Mrs. Cary
related the shocking incident of the morning, and
begged
Mrs. Jones if she knew any thing respecting it,
that she would conceal nothing from her.
Mrs. Jones then related to her what I have already
observed abovethat Mrs. Cary carried on a guilty
commerce with a chosen few, that she had taken into her
house a young woman of suspicious character; that
Dupon
was one of her favourite paramours; that she had
heard young Simpson sayBy Gd Miss needn't a
made such a demned fuss when Hunter! Oh, virtue,
thrice empty name! Can you stand this, Charles?
can you suffer your orphan sister's reputation to be
blasted
thus? I do not ask you, I would not have you risk your
safety in a quarrel with these wretchesNo, but I would
have you take me away from here.
I pass over three weeks, which were weeks of
suffering
indeed! Although I suffered on a double account,
yet I lost my own griefs in my assiduity to console the
afflicted Mrs. Cary and her daughter, whom it was
evident
incurred this reproach on my account.
Mrs. Cary resolved to remove to Philadelphia, an
old acquaintance of her father whom she knew in better
days, lived in that cityhe had written many friendly
letters to her, inviting her to come and reside there.
She proposed taking me with her if I wished to go, and
share her fortune, let it be what it might. Yes,
madam
,
said I, thanking her, I will never forsake you. Our
clothes were packed up; the day was set for our
departure
.
In the mean time I determined to make one more
effort
to obtain my dear departed mother's necklace from
the Simpsons. The money I cared nothing about; but
to leave Boston without the necklace, was like tearing
the heart out of my body. I plucked up resolution enough
to sit down and write to old Mr. Simpson, who, to do
him justice, is not a bad man, if it were not for the
subjection
in which he is held by his wife.
I disclosed the whole business, which had hitherto
been kept a secret from him. Mrs. Jones, the friend of
Mrs. Cary, undertook to deliver the letter. I informed
Mr. Simpson that I was about to leave Boston, and that
the money his daughters borrowed of me they were
welcome
to keep; but the necklace and rings I must have,
as they were all that remained to me of my dear
mother
.
Mrs. Jones said, when the old gentleman read the
letter, he was very angry, and commanded them to send
the jewels.
It is, said he, a darnation shame to detain any
thing belonging to her.
By Ned, said young Simpson, that's a pretty
high move.
The old woman joined with him, she is an
impudent
liar; Clarissa bought the necklace from her, she
gave her another for it, and a pea-green silk dress, as
good as new.
Yes, indeed papa, that is the truth, I wish I had
mine back again.
But the moneywhat did you want?
She's a lying slut.
Mrs. Jones said they all fell on the old man
Finally
,
Charles, not to trouble you further, I had to
leave Boston without them.
The day arrived when we were to leave Boston
our trunks were in the front roomwe had breakfasted
Mrs. Cary had put on her bonnet to go and pay the
rent, and deliver up the keys of the house; but an officer
stepped in and seized the trunks; Mrs. Cary now paid
to him the rent, and also his fee.
Nothing remained for us but to set out as soon as
possible. Our trunks were conveyed on boardI sent
Betsey, the only domestic Mrs. Cary had, and who
determined
not to forsake us, for a bottle of wine; we left
out three glasses for the purpose of taking something to
enable us to walk to the vessel.
Mrs. Jones was with usthe wine camewe took
a glass roundnot a word was uttered. We walked
along silent and slow. Mrs. Jones, the only kind friend
we had, walked with us. I am now on board.Mrs.
Jones takes this to the Post-Office.
Your heart-broken Sister.Sir
I received your favour this day: I am truly glad to
hear that you have returned, and that Mary is at length
happy. I have never heard of Dupon since Mrs. Cary
left hereold Mr. Simpson is dead. His oldest
daughter
,
Clarissa, ran away with Hunter, it is supposed, as
she was missing the night he escaped from prison, and
has never been heard of since.
It was thought by some that she assisted him in
getting
out; some say they went to Philadelphia, others
say to New-York. It was thought that this conduct of
his daughter, and that of his profligate son, broke the
old man's heart.
The family is now in great distress, having had
almost
every thing sold by the creditors of Mr. Simpson.
The young Simpson roams about the town a despised
vagabond. Dear sir please to give my love and best
respects to the ladies, and tell Mary I wish her a great
deal of happiness, and shall expect a bride's favour.
Yours, respectfully, SARAH JONES.Sir
I hasten to reply to both yours of this instant.
Hunter
owns the property mentioned in your letter. You
refer to me for information respecting its value: this I
would wish to decline.In the first place I am not a
judge; and in the second place the price of property is
so fluctuating that it is not easy to say. It might sell to
day six per cent higher than it would to-morrow.
It rents at present for  dollars per annum:
perhaps it might sell for  thousand dollars. I
have  thousand dollars in my hands, subject to
Hunter's order. There is no incumbrance on the
property
,
at least none that I know of.
I have just seen Mr. P he says Dupon left this
city two years ago, supercargo for a trading house in
Kingston, Jamaica.
He superintended some commercial concerns for the
house of P & Co. in this city, as being concerned
with the aforesaid house in Liverpool. Dupon was to
have returned to the United States, but hearing his
father
was in bad health, and of some other indispensable
business, he proceeded to Liverpool, and sent an agent
here who has continued to act for the firm ever since.
This is all the information, sir, that I am able to give
you respecting him.
Your obedient servant, S.Dear Sir.Agreeably to my promise, I
communicate
the following particulars relative to Miss Simpson.
She continues to mend every day; I think her cure
will be perfected in the course of three or four weeks.
The girl you left here, still attends her with unremitting
attention.
I yesterday for the first time informed her that you
were brother to the young lady that formerly lived at her
father's, and that your name was Burlington. She was
much agitated, and I said no more to her for some time.
When she asked, what was become of Miss Mary?
I told her she was in Philadelphia, and was to be
married
in a few days, to a Mr. Wilson an old suitor, and
that you had recovered your property, with every other
circumstance that related to your present happy
independence
.
She was greatly astonishedsighing deeply, she said
had you known how unworthy she was of your
compassion
,
and the cruel treatment your sister received from
her, you would have left her to that fate she so justly
deserved
.
I thought I would let her rest upon her own
ideas awhile, and enquired how she came to fall into the
distressing situation in which you found her.
She answered, that she had been seduced by a wretch
from her father's house, that her father was a
respectable
man in Boston, he had one son and three daughters;
she was the eldest. She then went on to relate the story
of your sister, the plots that were laid to ensuare her,
and the falsehoods she propagated to injure hershe
took the whole of the blame on herself. She said she
reigned mistress in the family, and would have every
thing as she pleased, not even her father or mother dared
to contradict her.
On mentioning her parents, she burst into a flood of
tears, and it was several minutes before she was able to
proceedI was a very undutiful child, I broke my
father's
heartno wonder God has sent his judgments
upon
me.
I asked her what had become of the man who
seduced
her, what was his name, and place of residence, and
whether it was to him she owed the complaint, under
which she had so nearly fallen a sacrifice?
She said his name was Hunterthat he had been
partly reared in New-York, but was often in Boston
that he had been guilty of crimes, was thrown into
prison
,
and while there contrived to write to her, and
entreated
her to aid him in getting out: that through her
means he was let out with a false key, which she hired
a man to make at a great expence. She had agreed to
run off with him to North-Carolina, and get married:
(poor fool that I was)but at that time I really loved
him, was blind to his faults, and believed every thing
that he said. I met him at a place agreed upon, with
only one small trunk of clothes, and as many more as I
could tie in a handkerchief. I had bespoke a passage to
Norfolk, in Virginiafrom there we were to go by land
to Carolina. As the vessel was to sail by day-light in
the morning, and as the keeper of the prison would not
discover the cheat until the usual time of taking breakfast
to the prisoners, the prospect of our getting off was
favourable
.
I had stolen five hundred dollars from my
father
the night before we sailedthis with a little change
and a gold watch which Hunter had, was all our
dependence
,
and we left Boston under feigned names.
We had a quick passage to Norfolk; there we
tarried
a week, and I passed for his sister. At Norfolk he
spent his time with gamblers at the gaming table, where
he won all their money. From this place instead of
going
to North-Carolina, we took shipping for Charleston,
South-Carolina, which was against my will. I urged
him to go to North-Carolina, where we could have our
marriage celebrated with more facility, but he was
inflexible
.
I now, for the first time, began to suspect his
sincerity
;
but it was too late. I set off with him to
Charleston
,
where we passed for man and wife, and took
lodgings
in an obscure part of the town. Flushed with his
success at Norfolk, he became a gambler by profession,
and spent his time wholly with gamblers, and the most
abandoned characters; he would be out whole nights,
rioting in all manner of debaucheryhe would often
bring his companions to my room, where they would
drink and carouse till day-light: singing lewd songs,
demolishing glasses, bottles, chairs, and tables; cursing,
swearing, and very often fighting. It was in vain to
remonstrate against these unparalleled scenes.
Not to tire you, sir, we lived in this manner nine
months; during which time he had extorted my last
dollar
for stakessometimes he won, but oftener lost, and
being detected by the police officers, he decamped I
knew not where, leaving me without a single dollar,
and in daily expectation of being confined. When I
*24
found he was indeed gone, I congratulated myself, as he
eternally disturbed my quiet. I sent for the landlord
and candidly confessed the whole truth to him, begging
him to dispose of some jewels upon the best terms he
could, pay himself for the rent which was due, and
purchase
the requisites for my confinement: and told him if
that was not sufficient, I had some good clothes left,
which he would have the goodness to dispose of, in order
to make himself sure. The landlord was a humane,
goodhearted
man, or I do not know what would have become
of me. Matters being thus arranged, I waited the issue
with an aching heart.
In the meantime I wrote home to my oldest sister,
calling myself Mrs. Hunter. This was the first time I
had written home since I left Boston. In this letter I
concealed my misfortunes, but begged her to implore the
forgiveness of my parents, and write to me as quick
as possiblethat if my parents refused to forgive
me, I would never see them more. In short, sir, my
child died, and I had every attention paid to me during
my illness which I had a right to expect.
When I recovered my health, I took in sewing and
all sorts of needle-work, and not having heard from my
parents, I determined not to return to Boston until I
was sure of being forgiven. I saw no company except
my landlord and his wife, who treated me with great
kindness and respect. I set up a milliner's shop,
worked
day und night, and made money fast. At length I
received the long-looked-for letter from my sister. It
brought news that my father was dead! that he never
was well from the time I had cloped, that the family was
in the deepest distress, that my father's creditors rushed
upon the family without delay or mercy, and his
property
fell by a great deal short of paying his debts, that
my brother had abandoned himself to drunkeness and
debauchery
,
that she and her other sister had taken a small
room and followed mantua-making for the purpose of
maintaining themselves and their aged mother. That
my mother when pressed upon the subject of my
forgiveness
,
said she never would, though she would be glad
if I would come and see my sisters.
This melancholy news almost drove me distracted.
My father dead! I could never forgive myself, and was
for a long time inconsolable! Not to be tedious, I
continued
in Charleston where I got plenty of work,
intending
to make a little sum for the relief of my mother,
besides
as much as would clothe me decently, and pay my
passage to Boston; to this end, I doubled my diligence,
I sat up late and early, got a handsome custom. I sat
behind my counter all day, to attend my customers, and
worked every moment I had to spare. It was about six
months or nearly that from the time I received the letter
from my sister, when upon counting my money I found
it amounted to two hundred and sixty dollars; I owed
about as much as my stock would sell for, so that I could
count nothing upon that.
I had sat up late that night, the embers on the hearth
were dead, my candle was burnt to the snuff, when I
was roused from my reverie by a gentle tap at the door;
I ran and hid my money under the head of my bed, and
thinking none other than the landlady was at the door,
stepped to it to see what was the matter, when who
should it be but Hunter! His appearance was so sudden
and unexpected, that it deprived me both of speech and
motion. He took the advantage of my situation, and
caught me in his arms`My dear Clarissa,' said he,
`forgive me, take pity on me, and give me something to
eat, for I am starving.' His pathetic address, added to
his miserable situation, softened me into pity; my
resolution
gave way, and his tears which flowed plentifully,
obtained his pardon. I opened a drawer where I kept
wine, buiscuit, cheese, &c., lighted a candle and sat the
whole affair upon the table, bidding him go and eat; he
sat down and eat voraciously, thanking, and praying God
to bless me all the while. After eating sometime, `dear
Clarissa,' said he, `come and take a glass of wine with
me'I refused: `I will drink none then,' said he
mournfully
.
I went to the table and filled two glasses and we
drank, he pressed my hand to his lips; in short, he
spent the night with me and several weeks, during which
time we were married. This was done very privately,
no one being present but the landlord, who alone knew
that we had never been married before. All went on
very well; I attended to my business as usual, still
thinking I would go and see my mother, and return, as
my husband dare not show his face there. We had
agreed that he should remain in Charleston, I would
visit my mother, obtain some relief from Hunter's father,
if I could see him, and return. Hunter's father I knew
was wealthy, and he was his only child, and although he
had not heard from him since he had been imprisoned in
Boston, yet I hoped the time was not far distant when I
was to be independent and happy.
In the meantime I made arrangements for my
journey
,
and packing up a few clothes in a small trunk, I
deposited the money which I intended as a present for
my mother, in the bottom of the trunk, taking out barely
enough to bear my expences. Matters being thus
arranged
,
I went to bed, fully intending to set out next
morning by six o'clock, but in the night my treacherous
husband decamped, taking my trunk with him and all
my hopes.
My situation next morning you may easily
imagine
it
was beyond description. But I soon found that
this part of his conduct was but a trifle, when compared
with what a few days brought to light. I found myself
infected with a disease which your goodness has
relieved
.
I sold off my stock, which was little more than
sufficient to pay my debts, applied to a physician,
received
advice and medicine: and as I had understood
Hunter
to say that his father had large possessions in this
city, I set sail in the first vessel that sailed, intending
upon my arrival here to find out Hunter's father and
disclose
the whole matter to him.
When I arrived here, after much enquiry I was
informed
that such a man as I enquired for did live in the
city, but was scarcely ever at home; that he had been
absent for the last three months, no one knew whither.
It is about six weeks since I landed in New-York, where
I intended to remain until Hunter's father returned. In
the meantime from neglect or some cause unknown to
me, my complaint instead of growing better grew worse,
probably from the distress of mind and fatigue I
underwent
.
When Mr. Burlington came so fortunately, or
unfortunately rather (for it was my earnest wish to die)
I had just sold the last thing I had to purchase a little
wood and procure medical aid. And even this was not
mine, but I will tell him all, I will confess to him how
cruel I was to his angelic sister, I will go on my knees
to him, I will tell him that I did defraud his sister out
of muchYes, I will tell him that I did keep a
necklace
of her's through all my wants and distress, and fully
intended to redeem it if I ever got well, for the purpose
of returning it to the right owner, for I have never
prospered
since I had it: and if I live, I intend to refund
every
thing belonging to Miss Mary.
She then begged of me, since I was so good, she
said, to go and see the jeweller and charge him not to
dispose of the necklace; that it was not her own, but
belonged to another, and that she would redeem it when
she got well.
I desired her to make herself easy, that you were in
the shop when the little girl came in with it, and that
you took it out of the girl's hand and knew it to be your
sister's, and to that circumstance she owed her recovery:
for the moment you discovered her, you came for me,
that you paid me my fee, purchased the necessaries she
saw, and hired the nurse, paying her wages in advance;
and that you and your sister being now independently
rich, she would find it no hard matter to obtain your
forgiveness
.
She was amazed at hearing thisclasping her hands
together and raising her eyes to heaven, thank God, said
she, how glad I am to hear it; I hope I shall live to see
them both, see them happy, and acknowledge my crimes
to the innocent Mary, I shall never be happy until I do
that.
I told her that she had better compose herself for
the present, that she had exerted herself rather too much;
she might rely firmly upon my attention until she was
perfectly well, and that you would then furnish her with
money to go where she wished.
Thus, sir, I have detailed to you the story of this
unfortunate woman I shall be happy to hear from you
at all times, and take pleasure in your correspondence.
Respectfully yours.